[]



TABLE OF CONTENTS


1.  Cover
2.  Title Page
3.  Dedication
4.  Contents
5.  Foreword
6.  Author’s Note
7.  Introduction: We Can’t Get There from Here
8.  1. The Challenges of Talking to White People About Racism
9.  2. Racism and White Supremacy
10. 3. Racism After the Civil Rights Movement
11. 4. How Does Race Shape the Lives of White People?
12. 5. The Good/Bad Binary
13. 6. Anti-Blackness
14. 7. Racial Triggers for White People
15. 8. The Result: White Fragility
16. 9. White Fragility in Action
17. 10. White Fragility and the Rules of Engagement
18. 11. White Women’s Tears
19. 12. Where Do We Go from Here?
20. Resources for Continuing Education
21. Acknowledgments
22. Notes
23. Copyright


Guide

1.  Cover
2.  Copyright
3.  4.  1 The Challenges of Talking to White People About Racism



PRAISE FOR _WHITE FRAGILITY_


“_White Fragility_ is a rare and incisive examination of the system of
white-body supremacy, which binds us all as Americans. Robin DiAngelo
explicates the underlying Western ideologies of individualism and
presumed objectivity that tighten those bonds. But she doesn’t just
analyze this system. With authenticity and clarity, she provides the
antidote to white fragility and a road map for developing white racial
stamina and humility. _White Fragility_ loosens the bonds of white
supremacy and binds us back together as human beings.”

—RESMAA MENAKEM,

author of _My Grandmother’s Hands_ and _Rock the Boat_

“What an amazingly powerful book Robin DiAngelo has written! This
remarkable book encourages folks to embrace a more deeply nuanced
exploration of white culture and dominance and, as such, will be a great
contribution in promoting the necessary policy change and healing that
this country requires. Dr. DiAngelo’s work in deconstructing whiteness
is not only brilliant, it is written in a way that is crystal clear and
accessible to each and every reader. While this is a powerful scholarly
analysis of white fragility, it is also an invitation to engage in deep
personal inquiry and collective change. As a woman of color, I find hope
in this book because of its potential to disrupt the patterns and
relationships that have emerged out of long-standing colonial principles
and beliefs. _White Fragility_ is an essential tool toward authentic
dialogue and action. May it be so!”

—SHAKTI BUTLER,

president of World Trust and director of _Mirrors of Privilege: Making
Whiteness Visible_

“As powerful forces of white racism again swell, DiAngelo invites white
progressives to have a courageous conversation about their culture of
complicity. To eradicate racism, she encourages white people to
relinquish ingrained hyper-attachment to individualism and embrace
predictable patterns of their own racial group. _White Fragility_
provides important antiracist understanding and essential strategies for
well-intentioned white people who truly endeavor to be a part of the
solution.”

—GLENN E. SINGLETON,

author of _Courageous Conversations About Race_

“White fragility is the secret ingredient that makes racial
conversations so difficult and achieving racial equity even harder. But
by exposing it and showing us all—including white folks—how it operates
and how it hurts us, individually and collectively, Robin DiAngelo has
performed an invaluable service. An indispensable volume for
understanding one of the most important (and yet rarely appreciated)
barriers to achieving racial justice.”

—TIM WISE,

author of _White Like Me: Reflections on Race from a Privileged Son_

“In _White Fragility,_ Robin DiAngelo demonstrates an all-too-rare
ability to enter the racial conversation with complexity, nuance, and
deep respect. Her writing establishes her mastery in accessing the
imaginal, metaphoric mind, where the possibility for transformation
resides. With an unwavering conviction that change is possible, her
message is clear: the incentive for white engagement in racial justice
work is ultimately self-liberation.”

—LETICIA NIETO,

coauthor of _Beyond Inclusion, Beyond Empowerment: A Developmental
Strategy to Liberate Everyone_

[]

_These ceremonials in honor of white supremacy,_
_performed from babyhood, slip from the_
_conscious mind down deep into muscles . . ._
_and become difficult to tear out._

—LILLIAN SMITH, _Killers of the Dream_ (1949)



FOREWORD


_Keyser Söze, Beyoncé,
and the Witness Protection Program_

MICHAEL ERIC DYSON

One metaphor for race, and racism, won’t do. They are, after all,
exceedingly complicated forces. No, we need many metaphors, working in
concert, even if in different areas of the culture through a clever
division of linguistic labor. Race is a condition. A disease. A card. A
plague. Original sin. For much of American history, race has been black
culture’s issue; racism, a black person’s burden. Or substitute any
person of color for black and you’ve got the same problem. Whiteness,
however, has remained constant. In the equation of race, another
metaphor for race beckons; whiteness is the unchanging variable. Or, to
shift metaphors, whiteness has been, to pinch Amiri Baraka’s resonant
phrase, the “changing same,” a highly adaptable and fluid force that
stays on top no matter where it lands. In a sense, whiteness is at once
the means of dominance, the end to which dominance points, and the point
of dominance, too, which, in its purest form, in its greatest fantasy,
never ends.

To be sure, like the rest of race, whiteness is a fiction, what in the
jargon of the academy is termed a social construct, an agreed-on myth
that has empirical grit because of its effect, not its essence. But
whiteness goes even one better: it is a category of identity that is
most useful when its very existence is denied. That’s its twisted
genius. Whiteness embodies Charles Baudelaire’s admonition that “the
loveliest trick of the Devil is to persuade you that he does not exist.”
Or, as an alter ego of the character Keyser Söze says in the film _The
Usual Suspects,_ “The greatest trick the devil ever played was to
convince the world that he didn’t exist.” The Devil. Racism. Another
metaphor. Same difference.

Robin DiAngelo is here to announce, in the words of evangelicals—and
rappers Rick Ross and Jay-Z—“The Devil Is a Lie.” Whiteness, like race,
may not be _true_—it’s not a biologically heritable characteristic that
has roots in physiological structures or in genes or chromosomes. But it
is _real_, in the sense that societies and rights and goods and
resources and privileges have been built on its foundation. DiAngelo
brilliantly names a whiteness that doesn’t want to be named, disrobes a
whiteness that dresses in camouflage as humanity, unmasks a whiteness
costumed as American, and fetches to center stage a whiteness that would
rather hide in visible invisibility.

It is not enough to be a rhetorician and a semiotician to deconstruct
and demythologize whiteness. One must be a magician of the political and
the social, an alchemist of the spiritual and psychological too. One
must wave off racist stereotypes and conjure a rich history of
combatting white supremacy and white privilege and white lies—a history
that has often been buried deep in the dark, rich, black American soil.
DiAngelo knows that what she is saying to white folk in this book is
what so many black folks have thought and believed and said over the
years but couldn’t be heard because white ears were too sensitive, white
souls too fragile.

DiAngelo joins the front ranks of white antiracist thinkers with a
stirring call to conscience and, most important, consciousness in her
white brothers and sisters. White fragility is a truly generative idea;
it is a crucial concept that inspires us to think more deeply about how
white folk understand their whiteness and react defensively to being
called to account for how that whiteness has gone under the radar of
race for far too long. DiAngelo is wise and withering in her relentless
assault on what Langston Hughes termed “the ways of white folks.” But
she is clear-eyed and unsentimental in untangling the intertwined
threads of social destiny and political prescription that bind white
identity to moral neutrality and cultural universality.

DiAngelo bravely challenges the collapse of whiteness into national
identity. No less an authority than Beyoncé Knowles recently remarked,
“It’s been said that racism is so American that when we protest racism,
some assume we’re protesting America.” DiAngelo proves that Beyoncé is
right, that the flow of white identity into American identity—of racist
beliefs into national beliefs—must be met head-on with a full-throated
insistence that what it means to be American is not what it means to be
white, at least not exclusively, or even primarily. This nation is far
more complicated in its collective self-understanding. DiAngelo, in a
masterly way, takes apart the notion that identity politics is a
scourge, at least when it involves people of color or women. She blows
down the house of white racial cards built on the premise that it can,
or should, rest on something beyond identity politics.

DiAngelo forces us to see that all politics have rested on identities,
and that those identities are critical features of wrestling with how we
have gone wrong in the effort to set things right—which too often has
meant make them white. We cannot possibly name the nemeses of democracy
or truth or justice or equality if we cannot name the identities to
which they have been attached. For most of our history, straight white
men have been involved in a witness protection program that guards their
identities and absolves them of their crimes while offering them a
future free of past encumbrances and sins.

Robin DiAngelo is the new racial sheriff in town. She is bringing a
different law and order to bear upon the racial proceedings. Instead of
covering up for a whiteness that refused to face up to its benefits and
advantages, its errors and faults, she has sought to uphold the humanity
of the unjustly maligned while exposing the offenses of the undeservedly
celebrated.

White fragility is an idea whose time has come. It is an idea that
registers the hurt feelings, shattered egos, fraught spirits, vexed
bodies, and taxed emotions of white folk. In truth, their suffering
comes from recognizing that they are white—that their whiteness has
given them a big leg up in life while crushing others’ dreams, that
their whiteness is the clearest example of the identity politics they
claim is harmful to the nation, and that their whiteness has shielded
them from growing up as quickly as they might have done had they not so
heavily leaned on it to make it through life. _White Fragility_ is a
vital, necessary, and beautiful book, a bracing call to white folk
everywhere to see their whiteness for what it is and to seize the
opportunity to make things better now. Robin DiAngelo kicks all the
crutches to the side and demands that white folk finally mature and face
the world they’ve made while seeking to help remake it for those who
have neither their privilege nor their protection.



AUTHOR’S NOTE



IDENTITY POLITICS


The United States was founded on the principle that all people are
created equal. Yet the nation began with the attempted genocide of
Indigenous people and the theft of their land. American wealth was built
on the labor of kidnapped and enslaved Africans and their descendants.
Women were denied the right to vote until 1920, and black women were
denied access to that right until 1964. The term _identity politics_
refers to the focus on the barriers specific groups face in their
struggle for equality. We have yet to achieve our founding principle,
but any gains we have made thus far have come through identity politics.

The identities of those sitting at the tables of power in this country
have remained remarkably similar: white, male, middle- and upper-class,
able-bodied. Acknowledging this fact may be dismissed as political
correctness, but it is still a fact. The decisions made at those tables
affect the lives of those not at the tables. Exclusion by those at the
table doesn’t depend on willful intent; we don’t have to intend to
exclude for the results of our actions to be exclusion. While implicit
bias is always at play because all humans have bias, inequity can occur
simply through homogeneity; if I am not aware of the barriers you face,
then I won’t see them, much less be motivated to remove them. Nor will I
be motivated to remove the barriers if they provide an advantage to
which I feel entitled.

All progress we have made in the realm of civil rights has been
accomplished through identity politics: women’s suffrage, the American
with Disabilities Act, Title 9, federal recognition of same-sex
marriage. A key issue in the 2016 presidential election was the white
working class. These are all manifestations of identity politics.

Take women’s suffrage. If being a woman denies you the right to vote,
you ipso facto cannot grant it to yourself. And you certainly cannot
vote for your right to vote. If men control all the mechanisms that
exclude women from voting as well as the mechanisms that can reverse
that exclusion, women must call on men for justice. You could not have
had a conversation about women’s right to vote and men’s need to grant
it without naming women and men. Not naming the groups that face
barriers only serves those who already have access; the assumption is
that the access enjoyed by the controlling group is universal. For
example, although we are taught that women were granted suffrage in
1920, we ignore the fact that it was white women who received full
access or that it was white men who granted it. Not until the 1960s,
through the Voting Rights Act, were all women—regardless of race—granted
full access to suffrage. Naming who has access and who doesn’t guides
our efforts in challenging injustice.

This book is unapologetically rooted in identity politics. I am white
and am addressing a common white dynamic. I am mainly writing to a white
audience; when I use the terms _us_ and _we,_ I am referring to the
white collective. This usage may be jarring to white readers because we
are so rarely asked to think about ourselves or fellow whites in racial
terms. But rather than retreat in the face of that discomfort, we can
practice building our stamina for the critical examination of white
identity—a necessary antidote to white fragility. This raises another
issue rooted in identity politics: in speaking as a white person to a
primarily white audience, I am yet again centering white people and the
white voice. I have not found a way around this dilemma, for as an
insider I can speak to the white experience in ways that may be harder
to deny. So, though I am centering the white voice, I am also using my
insider status to challenge racism. To not use my position this way is
to uphold racism, and that is unacceptable; it is a “both/and” that I
must live with. I would never suggest that mine is the only voice that
should be heard, only that it is one of the many pieces needed to solve
the overall puzzle.

People who do not identify as white may also find this book helpful for
understanding why it is so often difficult to talk to white people about
racism. People of color cannot avoid understanding white consciousness
to some degree if they are to be successful in this society, yet nothing
in dominant culture affirms their understanding or validates their
frustrations when they interact with white people. I hope that this
exploration affirms the cross-racial experiences of people of color and
provides some useful insight.

This book looks at the United States and the general context of the West
(United States, Canada, and Europe). It does not address nuances and
variations within other sociopolitical settings. However, these patterns
have also been observed in white people in other white settler societies
such as Australia, New Zealand, and South Africa.



WHAT ABOUT MULTIRACIAL PEOPLE?


Throughout this book, I argue that racism is deeply complex and nuanced,
and given this, we can never consider our learning to be complete or
finished. One example of this complexity is in the very use of the
racial categories “white” and “people of color.” I use the terms _white_
and _people of color_ to indicate the two macro-level, socially
recognized divisions of the racial hierarchy. Yet in using these terms,
I am collapsing a great deal of variation. And though I believe (for
reasons explained in chapter 1) that temporarily suspending
individuality to focus on group identity is healthy for white people,
doing so has very different impacts on people of color. For multiracial
people in particular, these binary categories leave them in a
frustrating “middle.”

Multiracial people, because they challenge racial constructs and
boundaries, face unique challenges in a society in which racial
categories have profound meaning. The dominant society will assign them
the racial identity they most physically resemble, but their own
internal racial identity may not align with the assigned identity. For
example, though the musician Bob Marley was multiracial, society
perceived him as black and thus responded to him as if he were black.
When multiracial people’s racial identity is ambiguous, they will face
constant pressure to explain themselves and “choose a side.” Racial
identity for multiracial people is further complicated by the racial
identity of their parents and the racial demographics of the community
in which they are raised. For example, though a child may look black and
be treated as black, she may be raised primarily by a white parent and
thus identify more strongly as white.

The dynamics of what is termed “passing”—being perceived as white—will
also shape a multiracial person’s identity, as passing will grant him or
her society’s rewards of whiteness. However, people of mixed racial
heritage who pass as white may also experience resentment and isolation
from people of color who cannot pass. Multiracial people may not be seen
as “real” people of color or “real” whites. (It is worth noting that
though the term “passing” refers to the ability to blend in as a white
person, there is no corresponding term for the ability to pass as a
person of color. This highlights the fact that, in a racist society, the
desired direction is always toward whiteness and away from being
perceived as a person of color.)

I will not be able to do justice to the complexity of multiracial
identity. But for the purposes of grappling with white fragility, I
offer multiracial people the concept of _saliency._ We all occupy
multiple and intersecting social positionalities. I am white, but I am
also a cisgender woman, able-bodied, and middle-aged. These identities
don’t cancel out one another; each is more or less salient in different
contexts. For example, in a group in which I am the only woman, gender
will likely be very salient for me. When I am in a group that is all
white except for one person of color, race will likely be my most
salient identity. As you read, it will be for you to decide what speaks
to your experience and what doesn’t, and in what contexts. My hope is
that you may gain insight into why people who identify as white are so
difficult in conversations regarding race and/or gain insight into your
own racial responses as you navigate the roiling racial waters of daily
life.



INTRODUCTION



WE CAN’T GET THERE FROM HERE


_I am a white woman. I am standing beside a black woman. We are facing a
group of white people seated in front of us. We are in their workplace
and have been hired by their employer to lead them in a dialogue about
race. The room is filled with tension and charged with hostility. I have
just presented a definition of racism that includes the acknowledgment
that whites hold social and institutional power over people of color. A
white man is pounding his fist on the table. As he pounds, he yells, “A
white person can’t get a job anymore!” I look around the room and see
forty employees, thirty-eight of whom are white. Why is this white man
so angry? Why is he being so careless about the impact of his anger? Why
doesn’t he notice the effect this outburst is having on the few people
of color in the room? Why are all the other white people either sitting
in silent agreement with him or tuning out? I have, after all, only
articulated a definition of racism._

White people in North America live in a society that is deeply separate
and unequal by race, and white people are the beneficiaries of that
separation and inequality. As a result, we are insulated from racial
stress, at the same time that we come to feel entitled to and deserving
of our advantage. Given how seldom we experience racial discomfort in a
society we dominate, we haven’t had to build our racial stamina.
Socialized into a deeply internalized sense of superiority that we
either are unaware of or can never admit to ourselves, we become highly
fragile in conversations about race. We consider a challenge to our
racial worldviews as a challenge to our very identities as good, moral
people. Thus, we perceive any attempt to connect us to the system of
racism as an unsettling and unfair moral offense. The smallest amount of
racial stress is intolerable—the mere suggestion that being white has
meaning often triggers a range of defensive responses. These include
emotions such as anger, fear, and guilt and behaviors such as
argumentation, silence, and withdrawal from the stress-inducing
situation. These responses work to reinstate white equilibrium as they
repel the challenge, return our racial comfort, and maintain our
dominance within the racial hierarchy. I conceptualize this process as
_white fragility._ Though white fragility is triggered by discomfort and
anxiety, it is born of superiority and entitlement. White fragility is
not weakness per se. In fact, it is a powerful means of white racial
control and the protection of white advantage.

Summarizing the familiar patterns of white people’s responses to racial
discomfort as white fragility has resonated for many people. The
sensibility is so familiar because whereas our personal narratives vary,
we are all swimming in the same racial water. For me, the recognition
has come through my work. I have a rare job; on a daily basis I lead
primarily white audiences in discussions of race, something many of us
avoid at all costs.

In the early days of my work as what was then termed a diversity
trainer, I was taken aback by how angry and defensive so many white
people became at the suggestion that they were connected to racism in
any way. The very idea that they would be required to attend a workshop
on racism outraged them. They entered the room angry and made that
feeling clear to us throughout the day as they slammed their notebooks
down on the table, refused to participate in exercises, and argued
against any and all points.

I couldn’t understand their resentment or disinterest in learning more
about such a complex social dynamic as racism. These reactions were
especially perplexing when there were few or no people of color in their
workplace, and they had the opportunity to learn from my cofacilitators
of color. I assumed that in these circumstances, an educational workshop
on racism would be appreciated. After all, didn’t the lack of diversity
indicate a problem or at least suggest that some perspectives were
missing? Or that the participants might be undereducated about race
because of scant cross-racial interactions?

It took me several years to see beneath these reactions. At first I was
intimidated by them, and they held me back and kept me careful and
quiet. But over time, I began to see what lay beneath this anger and
resistance to discuss race or listen to people of color. I observed
consistent responses from a variety of participants. For example, many
white participants who lived in white suburban neighborhoods and had no
sustained relationships with people of color were absolutely certain
that they held no racial prejudice or animosity. Other participants
simplistically reduced racism to a matter of nice people versus mean
people. Most appeared to believe that racism ended in 1865 with the end
of slavery. There was both knee-jerk defensiveness about any suggestion
that being white had meaning and a refusal to acknowledge any advantage
to being white. Many participants claimed white people were now the
oppressed group, and they deeply resented anything perceived to be a
form of affirmative action. These responses were so predictable—so
consistent and reliable—I was able to stop taking the resistance
personally, get past my own conflict avoidance, and reflect on what was
behind them.

I began to see what I think of as the pillars of whiteness—the
unexamined beliefs that prop up our racial responses. I could see the
power of the belief that only bad people were racist, as well as how
individualism allowed white people to exempt themselves from the forces
of socialization. I could see how we are taught to think about racism
only as discrete acts committed by individual people, rather than as a
complex, interconnected system. And in light of so many white
expressions of resentment toward people of color, I realized that we see
ourselves as entitled to, and deserving of, more than people of color
deserve; I saw our investment in a system that serves us. I also saw how
hard we worked to deny all this and how defensive we became when these
dynamics were named. In turn, I saw how our defensiveness maintained the
racial status quo.

Personal reflections on my own racism, a more critical view of media and
other aspects of culture, and exposure to the perspectives of many
brilliant and patient mentors of color all helped me to see how these
pillars of racism worked. It became clear that if I believed that only
bad people who intended to hurt others because of race could ever do so,
I would respond with outrage to any suggestion that I was involved in
racism. Of course that belief would make me feel falsely accused of
something terrible, and of course I would want to defend my character
(and I had certainly had many of my own moments of responding in just
those ways to reflect on). I came to see that the way we are taught to
define racism makes it virtually impossible for white people to
understand it. Given our racial insulation, coupled with misinformation,
any suggestion that we are complicit in racism is a kind of unwelcome
and insulting shock to the system.

If, however, I understand racism as a system into which I was
socialized, I can receive feedback on my problematic racial patterns as
a helpful way to support my learning and growth. One of the greatest
social fears for a white person is being told that something that we
have said or done is racially problematic. Yet when someone lets us know
that we have just done such a thing, rather than respond with gratitude
and relief (after all, now that we are informed, we won’t do it again),
we often respond with anger and denial. Such moments can be experienced
as something valuable, even if temporarily painful, only after we accept
that racism is unavoidable and that it is impossible to completely
escape having developed problematic racial assumptions and behaviors.

None of the white people whose actions I describe in this book would
identify as racist. In fact, they would most likely identify as racially
progressive and vehemently deny any complicity with racism. Yet all
their responses illustrate white fragility and how it holds racism in
place. These responses spur the daily frustrations and indignities
people of color endure from white people who see themselves as
open-minded and thus not racist. This book is intended for us, for white
progressives who so often—despite our conscious intentions—make life so
difficult for people of color. I believe that _white progressives cause
the most daily damage to people of color._ I define a white progressive
as any white person who thinks he or she is not racist, or is less
racist, or in the “choir,” or already “gets it.” White progressives can
be the most difficult for people of color because, to the degree that we
think we have arrived, we will put our energy into making sure that
others see us as having arrived. None of our energy will go into what we
need to be doing for the rest of our lives: engaging in ongoing
self-awareness, continuing education, relationship building, and actual
antiracist practice. White progressives do indeed uphold and perpetrate
racism, but our defensiveness and certitude make it virtually impossible
to explain to us how we do so.

Racism has been among the most complex social dilemmas since the
founding of this country. While there is no biological race as we
understand it (see chapter 2), race as a social construct has profound
significance and shapes every aspect of our lives.¹ Race will influence
whether we will survive our birth, where we are most likely to live,
which schools we will attend, who our friends and partners will be, what
careers we will have, how much money we will earn, how healthy we will
be, and even how long we can expect to live.² This book does not attempt
to provide the solution to racism. Nor does it attempt to prove that
racism exists; I start from that premise. My goal is to make visible how
one aspect of white sensibility continues to hold racism in place: white
fragility.

I will explain the phenomenon of white fragility, how we develop it, how
it protects racial inequality, and what we might do about it.



CHAPTER 1



THE CHALLENGES OF TALKING TO WHITE PEOPLE ABOUT RACISM



WE DON’T SEE OURSELVES IN RACIAL TERMS


I am a white American raised in the United States. I have a white frame
of reference and a white worldview, and I move through the world with a
white experience. My experience is not a universal human experience. It
is a particularly white experience in a society in which race matters
profoundly; a society that is deeply separate and unequal by race.
However, like most white people raised in the US, I was not taught to
see myself in racial terms and certainly not to draw attention to my
race or to behave as if it mattered in any way. Of course, I was made
aware that _somebody’s_ race mattered, and if race was discussed, it
would be theirs, not mine. Yet a critical component of cross-racial
skill building is the ability to sit with the discomfort of being seen
racially, of having to proceed as if our race matters (which it does).
Being seen racially is a common trigger of white fragility, and thus, to
build our stamina, white people must face the first challenge: naming
our race.



OUR OPINIONS ARE UNINFORMED


I have never met a white person without an opinion on racism. It’s not
really possible to grow up in the United States or spend any significant
time here—or any other culture with a history of Western
colonization—without developing opinions on racism. And white people’s
opinions on racism tend to be strong. Yet race relations are profoundly
complex. We must be willing to consider that unless we have devoted
intentional and ongoing study, our opinions are necessarily uninformed,
even ignorant. How can I say that if you are white, your opinions on
racism are most likely ignorant, when I don’t even know you? I can say
so because nothing in mainstream US culture gives us the information we
need to have the nuanced understanding of arguably the most complex and
enduring social dynamic of the last several hundred years.

For example, I can be seen as qualified to lead a major or minor
organization in this country with no understanding whatsoever of the
perspectives or experiences of people of color, few if any relationships
with people of color, and virtually no ability to engage critically with
the topic of race. I can get through graduate school without ever
discussing racism. I can graduate from law school without ever
discussing racism. I can get through a teacher-education program without
ever discussing racism. If I am in a program considered progressive, I
might have a single required “diversity” course. A handful of faculty
will have fought for years to get me this course, likely having had to
overcome resistance from the majority of their white colleagues, and
will still be fighting to keep the course. In this diversity course, we
might read “ethnic” authors and learn about heroes and heroines from
various groups of color, but there’s no guarantee we’ll discuss racism.

In fact, when we try to talk openly and honestly about race, white
fragility quickly emerges as we are so often met with silence,
defensiveness, argumentation, certitude, and other forms of pushback.
These are not natural responses; they are social forces that prevent us
from attaining the racial knowledge we need to engage more productively,
and they function powerfully to hold the racial hierarchy in place.
These forces include the ideologies of individualism and meritocracy,
narrow and repetitive media representations of people of color,
segregation in schools and neighborhoods, depictions of whiteness as the
human ideal, truncated history, jokes and warnings, taboos on openly
talking about race, and white solidarity.

Interrupting the forces of racism is ongoing, lifelong work because the
forces conditioning us into racist frameworks are always at play; our
learning will never be finished. Yet our simplistic definition of
racism—as intentional acts of racial discrimination committed by immoral
individuals—engenders a confidence that we are not part of the problem
and that our learning is thus complete. The claims we offer up as
evidence are implausible. For example, perhaps you’ve heard someone say
“I was taught to treat everyone the same” or “People just need to be
taught to respect one another, and that begins in the home.” These
statements tend to end the discussion and the learning that could come
from sustained engagement. Further, they are unconvincing to most people
of color and only invalidate their experiences. Many white people simply
do not understand the process of socialization, and this is our next
challenge.



WE DON’T UNDERSTAND SOCIALIZATION


When I talk to white people about racism, their responses are so
predictable I sometimes feel as though we are all reciting lines from a
shared script. And on some level, we are, because we are actors in a
shared culture. A significant aspect of the white script derives from
our seeing ourselves as both objective and unique. To understand white
fragility, we have to begin to understand why we cannot fully be either;
we must understand the forces of socialization.

We make sense of perceptions and experiences through our particular
cultural lens. This lens is neither universal nor objective, and without
it, a person could not function in any human society. But exploring
these cultural frameworks can be particularly challenging in Western
culture precisely because of two key Western ideologies: individualism
and objectivity. Briefly, individualism holds that we are each unique
and stand apart from others, even those within our social groups.
Objectivity tells us that it is possible to be free of all bias. These
ideologies make it very difficult for white people to explore the
collective aspects of the white experience.

Individualism is a story line that creates, communicates, reproduces,
and reinforces the concept that each of us is a unique individual and
that our group memberships, such as race, class, or gender, are
irrelevant to our opportunities. Individualism claims that there are no
intrinsic barriers to individual success and that failure is not a
consequence of social structures but comes from individual character.
According to the ideology of individualism, race is irrelevant. Of
course, we do occupy distinct race, gender, class, and other positions
that profoundly shape our life chances in ways that are not natural,
voluntary, or random; opportunity is not equally distributed across
race, class, and gender. On some level, we know that Bill Gates’s son
was born into a set of opportunities that will benefit him throughout
his life, whether he is mediocre or exceptional. Yet even though Gates’s
son has clearly been handed unearned advantage, we cling tightly to the
ideology of individualism when asked to consider our own unearned
advantages.

Regardless of our protestations that social groups don’t matter and that
we see everyone as equal, we know that to be a man as defined by the
dominant culture is a different experience from being a woman. We know
that to be viewed as old is different from being viewed as young, rich
is different from poor, able-bodied different from having a disability,
gay different from heterosexual, and so on. These groups matter, but
they don’t matter naturally, as we are often taught to believe. Rather,
we are taught that they matter, and the social meaning ascribed to these
groups creates a difference in lived experience. We are taught these
social meanings in myriad ways, by a range of people, and through a
variety of mediums. This training continues after childhood and
throughout our lives. Much of it is nonverbal and is achieved through
watching and comparing ourselves to others.

We are socialized into these groups collectively. In mainstream culture,
we all receive the same messages about what these groups mean, why being
in one group is a different experience from being in another. And we
also know that it is “better” to be in one of these groups than to be in
its opposite—for example, to be young rather than old, able-bodied
rather than have a disability, rich rather than poor. We gain our
understanding of group meaning collectively through aspects of the
society around us that are shared and unavoidable: television, movies,
news items, song lyrics, magazines, textbooks, schools, religion,
literature, stories, jokes, traditions and practices, history, and so
on. These dimensions of our culture shape our group identities.

Our understanding of ourselves is necessarily based on our comparisons
with others. The concept of pretty has no meaning without the concept of
ugly, smart means little without the idea of not-smart or “stupid,” and
deserving has no meaning without the concept of undeserving. We come to
understand who we are by understanding who we are not. But because of
our society’s emphasis on individuality, many of us are unskilled at
reflecting on our group memberships. To understand race relations today,
we must push against our conditioning and grapple with how and why
racial group memberships matter.

In addition to challenging our sense of ourselves as individuals,
tackling group identity also challenges our belief in objectivity. If
group membership is relevant, then we don’t see the world from the
universal human perspective but from the perspective of a particular
kind of human. In this way, both ideologies are disrupted. Thus,
reflecting on our racial frames is particularly challenging for many
white people, because we are taught that to have a racial viewpoint is
to be biased. Unfortunately, this belief protects our biases, because
denying that we have them ensures that we won’t examine or change them.
This will be important to remember when we consider our racial
socialization, because there is a vast difference between what we
verbally tell our children and all the other ways we train them into the
racial norms of our culture.

For many white people, the mere title of this book will cause resistance
because I am breaking a cardinal rule of individualism_—I am
generalizing._ I am proceeding as if I could know anything about someone
just because the person is white. Right now you may be thinking of all
the ways that you are different from other white people and that if I
just knew how you had come to this country, or were close to these
people, grew up in this neighborhood, endured this struggle, or had this
experience, then I would know that you were different—that you were not
racist. I’ve witnessed this common reflex countless times in my work.

For example, I recently gave a talk to a group of about two hundred
employees. There were no more than five people of color in their
organization, and of these five, only two were African American. Over
and over, I emphasized the importance of white people having racial
humility and of not exempting ourselves from the unavoidable dynamics of
racism. As soon as I was done speaking, a line of white people
formed—ostensibly to ask me questions—but more typically to reiterate
the same opinions on race they held when they had entered the room. The
first in line was a white man who explained that he was Italian American
and that Italians were once considered black and discriminated against,
so didn’t I think that white people experience racism too? That he could
be in that overwhelmingly white room of coworkers and exempt himself
from an examination of his whiteness because Italians were once
discriminated against is an all-too-common example of individualism. A
more fruitful form of engagement (because it expands rather than
protects his current worldview) would have been to consider how Italian
Americans were able to become white and how that assimilation has shaped
his experiences in the present _as a white man._ His claims did not
illustrate that he was different from other white people when it comes
to race. I can predict that many readers will make similar claims of
exception precisely because we are products of our culture, not separate
from it.

As a sociologist, I am quite comfortable generalizing; social life is
patterned and predictable in measurable ways. But I understand that my
generalizations may cause some defensiveness for the white people about
whom I am generalizing, given how cherished the ideology of
individualism is in our culture. There are, of course, exceptions, but
patterns are recognized as such precisely because they are recurring and
predictable. We cannot understand modern forms of racism if we cannot or
will not explore patterns of group behavior and their effects on
individuals. I ask readers to make the specific adjustments they think
are necessary to their situation, rather than reject the evidence
entirely. For example, perhaps you grew up in poverty, or are an
Ashkenazi Jew of European heritage, or were raised in a military family.
Perhaps you grew up in Canada, Hawaii, or Germany, or had people of
color in your family. None of these situations exempts you from the
forces of racism, because no aspect of society is outside of these
forces.

Rather than use what you see as unique about yourself as an exemption
from further examination, a more fruitful approach would be to ask
yourself, “I am white and I have had X experience. How did X shape me as
a result of _also being white_?” Setting aside your sense of uniqueness
is a critical skill that will allow you to see the big picture of the
society in which we live; individualism will not. For now, try to let go
of your individual narrative and grapple with the collective messages we
all receive as members of a larger shared culture. Work to see how these
messages have shaped your life, rather than use some aspect of your
story to excuse yourself from their impact.



WE HAVE A SIMPLISTIC UNDERSTANDING OF RACISM


The final challenge we need to address is our definition of “racist.” In
the post–civil rights era, we have been taught that racists are mean
people who intentionally dislike others because of their race; racists
are immoral. Therefore, if I am saying that my readers are racist or,
even worse, that all white people are racist, I am saying something
deeply offensive; I am questioning my readers’ very moral character. How
can I make this claim when I don’t even know my readers? Many of you
have friends and loved ones of color, so how can you be racist? In fact,
since it’s racist to generalize about people according to race, I am the
one being racist! So let me be clear: If your definition of a racist is
someone who holds conscious dislike of people because of race, then I
agree that it is offensive for me to suggest that you are racist when I
don’t know you. I also agree that if this is your definition of racism,
and you are against racism, then you are not racist. Now breathe. I am
not using this definition of racism, and I am not saying that you are
immoral. If you can remain open as I lay out my argument, it should soon
begin to make sense.

In light of the challenges raised here, I expect that white readers will
have moments of discomfort reading this book. This feeling may be a sign
that I’ve managed to unsettle the racial status quo, which is my goal.
The racial status quo is comfortable for white people, and we will not
move forward in race relations if we remain comfortable. The key to
moving forward is what we do with our discomfort. We can use it as a
door out—blame the messenger and disregard the message. Or we can use it
as a door in by asking, Why does this unsettle me? What would it mean
for me if this were true? How does this lens change my understanding of
racial dynamics? How can my unease help reveal the unexamined
assumptions I have been making? Is it possible that because I am white,
there are some racial dynamics that I can’t see? Am I willing to
consider that possibility? If I am not willing to do so, then why not?

If you are reading this and are still making your case for why you are
different from other white people and why none of this applies to you,
stop and take a breath. Now return to the questions above, and keep
working through them. To interrupt white fragility, we need to build our
capacity to sustain the discomfort of not knowing, the discomfort of
being racially unmoored, the discomfort of racial humility. Our next
task is to understand how the forces of racial socialization are
constantly at play. The inability to acknowledge these forces inevitably
leads to the resistance and defensiveness of white fragility. To
increase the racial stamina that counters white fragility, we must
reflect on the whole of our identities—and our racial group identity in
particular. For white people, this means first struggling with what it
means to be white.



CHAPTER 2



RACISM AND WHITE SUPREMACY


Many of us have been taught to believe that there are distinct
biological and genetic differences between races. This biology accounts
for visual differences such as skin color, hair texture, and eye shape,
and traits that we believe we see such as sexuality, athleticism, or
mathematical ability. The idea of race as a biological construct makes
it easy to believe that many of the divisions we see in society are
natural. But race, like gender, is socially constructed. The differences
we see with our eyes—differences such as hair texture and eye color—are
superficial and emerged as adaptations to geography.¹ Under the skin,
there is no true biological race. The external characteristics that we
use to define race are unreliable indicators of genetic variation
between any two people.²

However, the belief that race and the differences associated with it are
biological is deep-seated. To challenge the belief in race as biology,
we need to understand the social and economic investments that drove
science to organize society and its resources along racial lines and why
this organization is so enduring.



SOCIAL CONSTRUCTION OF RACE IN THE UNITED STATES


Freedom and equality—regardless of religion or class status—were radical
new ideas when the United States was formed. At the same time, the US
economy was based on the abduction and enslavement of African people,
the displacement and genocide of Indigenous people, and the annexation
of Mexican lands. Further, the colonizers who came were not free of
their own cultural conditioning; they brought with them deeply
internalized patterns of domination and submission.³

The tension between the noble ideology of equality and the cruel reality
of genocide, enslavement, and colonization had to be reconciled. Thomas
Jefferson (who himself owned hundreds of enslaved people) and others
turned to science. Jefferson suggested that there were natural
differences between the races and asked scientists to find them.⁴ If
science could prove that black people were naturally and inherently
inferior (he saw Indigenous people as culturally deficient—a shortcoming
that could be remedied), there would be no contradiction between our
professed ideals and our actual practices. There were, of course,
enormous economic interests in justifying enslavement and colonization.
Race science was driven by these social and economic interests, which
came to establish cultural norms and legal rulings that legitimized
racism and the privileged status of those defined as white.

Drawing on the work of Europeans before them, American scientists began
searching for the answer to the perceived inferiority of non-Anglo
groups. Illustrating the power of our questions to shape the knowledge
we validate, these scientists didn’t ask, “Are blacks (and others)
inferior?” They asked, “Why are blacks (and others) inferior?” In less
than a century, Jefferson’s suggestion of racial difference became
commonly accepted scientific “fact.”⁵

The idea of racial inferiority was created to justify unequal treatment;
belief in racial inferiority is not what triggered unequal treatment.
Nor was fear of difference. As Ta-Nehisi Coates states, “But race is the
child of racism, not the father.”⁶ He means that first we exploited
people for their resources, not according to how they looked.
Exploitation came first, and then the ideology of unequal races to
justify this exploitation followed. Similarly, historian Ibram Kendi, in
his National Book Award–winning work _Stamped from the Beginning,_
explains: “The beneficiaries of slavery, segregation, and mass
incarceration have produced racist ideas of Black people being best
suited for or deserving of the confines of slavery, segregation, or the
jail cell. Consumers of these racist ideas have been led to believe
there is something wrong with Black people, and not the policies that
have enslaved, oppressed, and confined so many Black people.”⁷ Kendi
goes on to argue that if we truly believe that all humans are equal,
then disparity in condition can only be the result of systemic
discrimination.



THE PERCEPTION OF RACE


Race is an evolving social idea that was created to legitimize racial
inequality and protect white advantage. The term “white” first appeared
in colonial law in the late 1600s. By 1790, people were asked to claim
their race on the census, and by 1825, the perceived degrees of blood
determined who would be classified as Indian. From the late 1800s
through the early twentieth century, as waves of immigrants entered the
United States, the concept of a white race was solidified.⁸

When slavery in the United States was abolished in 1865, whiteness
remained profoundly important as legalized racist exclusion and violence
against African Americans continued in new forms. To have
citizenship—and the rights citizenship imbued—you had to be legally
classified as white. People with nonwhite racial classifications began
to petition the courts to be reclassified. Now the courts were in the
position to decide who was white and who was not. For example, Armenians
won their case to be reclassified as white with the help of a scientific
witness who claimed they were scientifically “Caucasian.” In 1922, the
Supreme Court ruled that the Japanese could not be legally white,
because they were scientifically classified as “Mongoloid.” A year
later, the court stated that Asian Indians were not legally white, even
though they were also scientifically classified as “Caucasian.” To
justify these contradictory rulings, the court stated that being white
was based on the common understanding of the white man. In other words,
people already seen as white got to decide who was white.⁹

The metaphor of the United States as the great melting pot, in which
immigrants from around the world come together and melt into one unified
society through the process of assimilation, is a cherished idea. Once
new immigrants learn English and adapt to American culture and customs,
they become Americans. In reality, only European immigrants were allowed
to melt, or assimilate, into dominant culture in the nineteenth and
twentieth centuries, because, regardless of their ethnic identities,
these immigrants were perceived to be white and thus could belong.

Race is a social construction, and thus who is included in the category
of white changes over time. As the Italian American man from my workshop
noted, European ethnic groups such as the Irish, Italian, and Polish
were excluded in the past. But where they may have been originally
divided in terms of origin, European immigrants became racially united
through assimilation.¹⁰ This process of assimilation—speaking English,
eating “American” foods, discarding customs that set them apart—reified
the perception of American as white. Racial identification in the larger
society plays a fundamental role in identity development, in how we see
ourselves.

If we “look white,” we are treated as white in society at large. For
example, people of southern European heritage, such as Spanish or
Portuguese, or from the former Soviet Union, especially if they are new
immigrants or were raised by immigrants, are likely to have a stronger
sense of ethnic identity than will someone of the same ethnicity whose
ancestors have been here for generations. Yet although their internal
identity may be different, if they “pass” as white, they will still have
a white experience externally. If they look white, the default
assumption will be that they are white and thus they will be responded
to as white. The incongruity between their internal ethnic identity
(e.g., Portuguese, Spanish) and external racial experience (white) would
provide a more complex or nuanced sense of identity than that of someone
who doesn’t have a strong ethnic identity. However, they are still
granted white status and the advantages that come with that status.
Today, these advantages are de facto rather than de jure, but are
nonetheless powerful in shaping our daily lives. It is on each of us who
pass as white to identify how these advantages shape us, not to deny
them wholescale.

Because race is a product of social forces, it has also manifested
itself along class lines; poor and working-class people were not always
perceived as fully white.¹¹ In a society that grants fewer opportunities
to those not seen as white, economic and racial forces are inseparable.
However, poor and working-class whites were eventually granted full
entry into whiteness as a way to exploit labor. If poor whites were
focused on feeling superior to those below them in status, they were
less focused on those above. The poor and working classes, if united
across race, could be a powerful force. But racial divisions have served
to keep them from organizing against the owning class who profits from
their labor.¹² Still, although working-class whites experience classism,
they aren’t also experiencing racism. I grew up in poverty and felt a
deep sense of shame about being poor. But I also always knew that I was
white, and that it was better to be white.



RACISM


To understand racism, we need to first distinguish it from mere
prejudice and discrimination. Prejudice is pre-judgment about another
person based on the social groups to which that person belongs.
Prejudice consists of thoughts and feelings, including stereotypes,
attitudes, and generalizations that are based on little or no experience
and then are projected onto everyone from that group. Our prejudices
tend to be shared because we swim in the same cultural water and absorb
the same messages.

All humans have prejudice; we cannot avoid it. If I am aware that a
social group exists, I will have gained information about that group
from the society around me. This information helps me make sense of the
group from my cultural framework. People who claim not to be prejudiced
are demonstrating a profound lack of self-awareness. Ironically, they
are also demonstrating the power of socialization—we have all been
taught in schools, through movies, and from family members, teachers,
and clergy that it is important not to be prejudiced. Unfortunately, the
prevailing belief that prejudice is bad causes us to deny its
unavoidable reality.

Prejudice is foundational to understanding white fragility because
suggesting that white people have racial prejudice is perceived as
saying that we are bad and should be ashamed. We then feel the need to
defend our character rather than explore the inevitable racial
prejudices we have absorbed so that we might change them. In this way,
our misunderstanding about what prejudice is protects it.

Discrimination is _action_ based on prejudice. These actions include
ignoring, exclusion, threats, ridicule, slander, and violence. For
example, if hatred is the emotion we feel because of our prejudice,
extreme acts of discrimination, such as violence, may follow. These
forms of discrimination are generally clear and recognizable. But if
what we feel is more subtle, such as mild discomfort, the discrimination
is likely to also be subtle, even hard to detect. Most of us can
acknowledge that we do feel some unease around certain groups of people,
if only a heightened sense of self-consciousness. But this feeling
doesn’t come naturally. Our unease comes from living separate from a
group of people while simultaneously absorbing incomplete or erroneous
information about them. When the prejudice causes me to act
differently—I am less relaxed around you or I avoid interacting with
you—I am now discriminating. Prejudice always manifests itself in action
because the way I see the world drives my actions in the world. Everyone
has prejudice, and everyone discriminates. Given this reality, inserting
the qualifier “reverse” is nonsensical.

When a racial group’s collective prejudice is backed by the power of
legal authority and institutional control, it is transformed into
racism, a far-reaching system that functions independently from the
intentions or self-images of individual actors. J. Kēhaulani Kauanui,
professor of American studies and anthropology at Wesleyan University,
explains, “Racism is a structure, not an event.”¹³ American women’s
struggle for suffrage illustrates how institutional power transforms
prejudice and discrimination into structures of oppression. Everyone has
prejudice and discriminates, but structures of oppression go well beyond
individuals. While women could be prejudiced and discriminate against
men in individual interactions, women as a group could not deny men
their civil rights. But men as a group could and did deny women their
civil rights. Men could do so because they controlled all the
institutions. Therefore, the only way women could gain suffrage was for
men to grant it to them; women could not grant suffrage to themselves.

Similarly, racism—like sexism and other forms of oppression—occurs when
a racial group’s prejudice is backed by legal authority and
institutional control. This authority and control transforms individual
prejudices into a far-reaching system that no longer depends on the good
intentions of individual actors; it becomes the default of the society
and is reproduced automatically. Racism is a system. And I would be
remiss if I did not acknowledge the intersection of race and gender in
the example of suffrage; _white_ men granted suffrage to women, but only
granted full access to white women. Women of color were denied full
access until the Voting Rights Act of 1964.

The system of racism begins with ideology, which refers to the big ideas
that are reinforced throughout society. From birth, we are conditioned
into accepting and not questioning these ideas. Ideology is reinforced
across society, for example, in schools and textbooks, political
speeches, movies, advertising, holiday celebrations, and words and
phrases. These ideas are also reinforced through social penalties when
someone questions an ideology and through the limited availability of
alternative ideas. Ideologies are the frameworks through which we are
taught to represent, interpret, understand, and make sense of social
existence.¹⁴ Because these ideas are constantly reinforced, they are
very hard to avoid believing and internalizing. Examples of ideology in
the United States include individualism, the superiority of capitalism
as an economic system and democracy as a political system, consumerism
as a desirable lifestyle, and meritocracy (anyone can succeed if he or
she works hard).

The racial ideology that circulates in the United States rationalizes
racial hierarchies as the outcome of a natural order resulting from
either genetics or individual effort or talent. Those who don’t succeed
are just not as naturally capable, deserving, or hardworking. Ideologies
that obscure racism as a system of inequality are perhaps the most
powerful racial forces because once we accept our positions within
racial hierarchies, these positions seem natural and difficult to
question, even when we are disadvantaged by them. In this way, very
little external pressure needs to be applied to keep people in their
places; once the rationalizations for inequality are internalized, both
sides will uphold the relationship.

Racism is deeply embedded in the fabric of our society. It is not
limited to a single act or person. Nor does it move back and forth, one
day benefiting whites and another day (or even era) benefiting people of
color. The direction of power between white people and people of color
is historic, traditional, and normalized in ideology. Racism differs
from individual racial prejudice and racial discrimination in the
historical accumulation and ongoing use of institutional power and
authority to support the prejudice and to systematically enforce
discriminatory behaviors with far-reaching effects.

People of color may also hold prejudices and discriminate against white
people, but they lack the social and institutional power that transforms
their prejudice and discrimination into racism; the impact of their
prejudice on whites is temporary and contextual. Whites hold the social
and institutional positions in society to infuse their racial prejudice
into the laws, policies, practices, and norms of society in a way that
people of color do not. A person of color may refuse to wait on me if I
enter a shop, but people of color cannot pass legislation that prohibits
me and everyone like me from buying a home in a certain neighborhood.

People of color may also hold prejudices and discriminate against their
own and other groups of color, but this bias ultimately holds them down
and, in this way, reinforces the system of racism that still benefits
whites. Racism is a society-wide dynamic that occurs at the group level.
When I say that only whites can be racist, I mean that in the United
States, only whites have the collective social and institutional power
and privilege over people of color. People of color do not have this
power and privilege over white people.

Many whites see racism as a thing of the past, and of course, we are
well served not to acknowledge it in the present. Yet racial disparity
between whites and people of color continues to exist in every
institution across society, and in many cases is increasing rather than
decreasing. Although segregation may make these disparities difficult
for whites to see and easy to deny, racial disparities and their effects
on overall quality of life have been extensively documented by a wide
range of agencies. Among those documenting these challenges are the US
Census Bureau, the United Nations, academic groups such as the UCLA
Civil Rights Project and the Metropolis Project, and nonprofits such as
the NAACP and the Anti-Defamation League.¹⁵

Scholar Marilyn Frye uses the metaphor of a birdcage to describe the
interlocking forces of oppression.¹⁶ If you stand close to a birdcage
and press your face against the wires, your perception of the bars will
disappear and you will have an almost unobstructed view of the bird. If
you turn your head to examine one wire of the cage closely, you will not
be able to see the other wires. If your understanding of the cage is
based on this myopic view, you may not understand why the bird doesn’t
just go around the single wire and fly away. You might even assume that
the bird liked or chose its place in the cage.

But if you stepped back and took a wider view, you would begin to see
that the wires come together in an interlocking pattern—a pattern that
works to hold the bird firmly in place. It now becomes clear that a
network of systematically related barriers surrounds the bird. Taken
individually, none of these barriers would be that difficult for the
bird to get around, but because they interlock with each other, they
thoroughly restrict the bird. While some birds may escape from the cage,
most will not. And certainly those that do escape will have to navigate
many barriers that birds outside the cage do not.

The birdcage metaphor helps us understand why racism can be so hard to
see and recognize: we have a limited view. Without recognizing how our
position in relation to the bird defines how much of the cage we can
see, we rely on single situations, exceptions, and anecdotal evidence
for our understanding, rather than on broader, interlocking patterns.
Although there are always exceptions, the patterns are consistent and
well documented: People of color are confined and shaped by forces and
barriers that are not accidental, occasional, or avoidable. These forces
are systematically related to each other in ways that restrict their
movement.

Individual whites may be “against” racism, but they still benefit from a
system that privileges whites as a group. David Wellman succinctly
summarizes racism as “a system of advantage based on race.”¹⁷ These
advantages are referred to as _white privilege,_ a sociological concept
referring to advantages that are taken for granted by whites and that
cannot be similarly enjoyed by people of color in the same context
(government, community, workplace, schools, etc.).¹⁸ But let me be
clear: stating that racism privileges whites does not mean that
individual white people do not struggle or face barriers. It does mean
that we do not face the particular barriers of racism.

As with prejudice and discrimination, we can remove the qualifier
_reverse_ from any discussion of racism. By definition, racism is a
deeply embedded historical system of institutional power. It is not
fluid and does not change direction simply because a few individuals of
color manage to excel.



WHITENESS AS A POSITION OF STATUS


Being perceived as white carries more than a mere racial classification;
it is a social and institutional status and identity imbued with legal,
political, economic, and social rights and privileges that are denied to
others. Reflecting on the social and economic advantages of being
classified as white, critical race scholar Cheryl Harris coined the
phrase “whiteness as property.” Tracing the evolving concept of
whiteness across legal history, she explains:

By according whiteness an actual legal status, an aspect of identity was
converted into an external object of property, moving whiteness from
privileged identity to a vested interest. The law’s construction of
whiteness defined and affirmed critical aspects of identity (who is
white); of privilege (what benefits accrue to that status); and, of
property (what legal entitlements arise from that status). Whiteness at
various times signifies and is deployed as identity, status, and
property, sometimes singularly, sometimes in tandem.¹⁹

Harris’s analysis is useful because it shows how identity and
perceptions of identity can grant or deny resources. These resources
include self-worth, visibility, positive expectations, psychological
freedom from the tether of race, freedom of movement, the sense of
belonging, and a sense of entitlement to all the above.

We might think of whiteness as all the aspects of being white—aspects
that go beyond mere physical differences and are related to the meaning
and resultant material advantage of being defined as white in society:
what is granted and how it is granted based on that meaning. Instead of
the typical focus on how racism hurts people of color, to examine
whiteness is to focus on how racism elevates white people.

Whiteness rests upon a foundational premise: the definition of whites as
the norm or standard for human, and people of color as a deviation from
that norm. Whiteness is not acknowledged by white people, and the white
reference point is assumed to be universal and is imposed on everyone.
White people find it very difficult to think about whiteness as a
specific state of being that could have an impact on one’s life and
perceptions.

People of color, including W. E. B. Du Bois and James Baldwin, have been
writing about whiteness for decades, if not centuries. These writers
urged white people to turn their attention onto themselves to explore
what it means to be white in a society that is so divided by race. For
example, in 1946, a French reporter asked expatriate writer Richard
Wright his thoughts on the “Negro problem” in the United States. Wright
replied, “There isn’t any Negro problem; there is only a white
problem.”²⁰

As Wright pointed out, racism against people of color doesn’t occur in a
vacuum. Yet the idea that racism in the United States can operate
outside white people is reinforced through celebrations such as Black
History Month, in which we study the Civil War and civil rights eras as
if they occurred separately from all US history. In addition to the
general way these color-based celebrations take whites out of the
equation, there are specific ways that the achievements of people of
color are separated from the overall social context and depoliticized,
for instance, in stories we tell about black cultural heroes.

The story of Jackie Robinson is a classic example of how whiteness
obscures racism by rendering whites, white privilege, and racist
institutions invisible. Robinson is often celebrated as the first
African American to break the color line and play in major-league
baseball. While Robinson was certainly an amazing baseball player, this
story line depicts him as racially special, a black man who broke the
color line himself. The subtext is that Robinson finally had what it
took to play with whites, as if no black athlete before him was strong
enough to compete at that level. Imagine if instead, the story went
something like this: “Jackie Robinson, the first black man whites
allowed to play major-league baseball.” This version makes a critical
distinction because no matter how fantastic a player Robinson was, he
simply could not play in the major leagues if whites—who controlled the
institution—did not allow it. Were he to walk onto the field before
being granted permission by white owners and policy makers, the police
would have removed him.

Narratives of racial exceptionality obscure the reality of ongoing
institutional white control while reinforcing the ideologies of
individualism and meritocracy. They also do whites a disservice by
obscuring the white allies who, behind the scenes, worked hard and long
to open the field to African American players. These allies could serve
as much-needed role models for other whites (although we also need to
acknowledge that in the case of the desegregation of baseball, there was
an economic incentive for these allies).

I am not against Black History Month. But it should be celebrated in a
way that doesn’t reinforce whiteness. For those who ask why there is no
White History Month, the answer illustrates how whiteness works. White
history is implied in the absence of its acknowledgment; white history
is the norm for history. Thus, our need to qualify that we are speaking
about black history or women’s history suggests that these contributions
lie outside the norm.

Ruth Frankenberg, a premier white scholar in the field of whiteness
studies, describes whiteness as multidimensional. These dimensions
include a location of structural advantage, a standpoint from which
white people look at ourselves, at others, and at society, and a set of
cultural practices that are not named or acknowledged.²¹ To say that
whiteness is a location of structural advantage is to recognize that to
be white is to be in a privileged position within society and its
institutions—to be seen as an insider and to be granted the benefits of
belonging. This position automatically bestows unearned advantages.
Whites control all major institutions of society and set the policies
and practices that others must live by. Although rare individual people
of color may be inside the circles of power—Colin Powell, Clarence
Thomas, Marco Rubio, Barack Obama—they support the status quo and do not
challenge racism in any way significant enough to be threatening. Their
positions of power do not mean these public figures don’t experience
racism (Obama endured insults and resistance previously unheard-of), but
the status quo remains intact.

To say that whiteness is a standpoint is to say that a significant
aspect of white identity is to see oneself as an individual, outside or
innocent of race—“just human.” This standpoint views white people and
their interests as central to, and representative of, humanity. Whites
also produce and reinforce the dominant narratives of society—such as
individualism and meritocracy—and use these narratives to explain the
positions of other racial groups. These narratives allow us to
congratulate ourselves on our success within the institutions of society
and blame others for their lack of success.

To say that that whiteness includes a set of cultural practices that are
not recognized by white people is to understand racism as a network of
norms and actions that consistently create advantage for whites and
disadvantage for people of color. These norms and actions include basic
rights and benefits of the doubt, purportedly granted to all but which
are actually only consistently afforded to white people. The dimensions
of racism benefiting white people are usually invisible to whites. We
are unaware of, or do not acknowledge, the meaning of race and its
impact on our own lives. Thus we do not recognize or admit to white
privilege and the norms that produce and maintain it. It follows that to
name whiteness, much less suggest that it has meaning and grants
unearned advantage, will be deeply disconcerting and destabilizing, thus
triggering the protective responses of white fragility.



WHITE SUPREMACY


When we look back to the civil rights movement of the 1950s and 1960s,
we might think of white supremacists as the people we saw in photos and
on television, beating blacks at lunch counters, bombing black churches,
and screaming at little Ruby Bridges, the first African American child
to integrate an all-white elementary school in Louisiana in 1960. Today
we might think of the self-described “alt-right” white nationalists
marching with torches in Virginia and shouting “blood and soil” as they
protest the removal of Confederate war memorials. Most white people do
not identify with these images of white supremacists and so take great
umbrage to the term being used more broadly. For sociologists and those
involved in current racial justice movements, however, white supremacy
is a descriptive and useful term to capture the all-encompassing
centrality and assumed superiority of people defined and perceived as
white and the practices based on this assumption. White supremacy in
this context does not refer to individual white people and their
individual intentions or actions but to an overarching political,
economic, and social system of domination. Again, racism is a structure,
not an event. While hate groups that openly proclaim white superiority
do exist and this term refers to them also, the popular consciousness
solely associates _white supremacy_ with these radical groups. This
reductive definition obscures the reality of the larger system at work
and prevents us from addressing this system.

While racism in other cultures exists based on different ideas of which
racial group is superior to another, the United States is a global
power, and through movies and mass media, corporate culture,
advertising, US-owned manufacturing, military presence, historical
colonial relations, missionary work, and other means, white supremacy is
circulated globally. This powerful ideology promotes the idea of
whiteness as the ideal for humanity well beyond the West. White
supremacy is especially relevant in countries that have a history of
colonialism by Western nations.

In his book _The Racial Contract,_ Charles W. Mills argues that the
racial contract is a tacit and sometimes explicit agreement among
members of the peoples of Europe to assert, promote, and maintain the
ideal of white supremacy in relation to all other people of the world.
This agreement is an intentional and integral characteristic of the
social contract, underwriting all other social contracts. White
supremacy has shaped a system of global European domination: it brings
into existence whites and nonwhites, full persons and subpersons. It
influences white moral theory and moral psychology and is imposed on
nonwhites through ideological conditioning and violence. Mills says that
“what has usually been taken . . . as the racist ‘exception’ has really
been the rule; what has been taken as the ‘rule’ . . . [racial equality]
. . . has really been the exception.”²²

Mills describes white supremacy as “the unnamed political system that
has made the modern world what it is today.”²³ He notes that although
white supremacy has shaped Western political thought for hundreds of
years, it is never named. In this way, white supremacy is rendered
invisible while other political systems—socialism, capitalism,
fascism—are identified and studied. In fact, much of white supremacy’s
power is drawn from its invisibility, the taken-for-granted aspects that
underwrite all other political and social contracts.

Mills makes two points that are critical to our understanding of white
fragility. First, white supremacy is never acknowledged. Second, we
cannot study any sociopolitical system without addressing how that
system is mediated by race. The failure to acknowledge white supremacy
protects it from examination and holds it in place.

In Ta-Nehisi Coates’s essay “The Case for Reparations,” he makes a
similar point:

To ignore the fact that one of the oldest republics in the world was
erected on a foundation of white supremacy, to pretend that the problems
of a dual society are the same as the problems of unregulated
capitalism, is to cover the sin of national plunder with the sin of
national lying. The lie ignores the fact that reducing American poverty
and ending white supremacy are not the same. . . . [W]hite supremacy is
not merely the work of hotheaded demagogues, or a matter of false
consciousness, but a force so fundamental to America that it is
difficult to imagine the country without it.²⁴

In light of the reality of historical and continual white supremacy,
white complaints about “reverse” racism by programs intended to
ameliorate the most basic levels of discrimination are profoundly petty
and delusional. As Mills summarizes:

Both globally and within particular nation states, then, white people,
Europeans and their descendants, continue to benefit from the Racial
Contract, which creates a world in their cultural image, political
states differentially favoring their interests, an economy structured
around the racial exploitation of others, and a moral psychology . . .
skewed consciously or unconsciously toward privileging them, taking the
status quo of differing racial entitlement as normatively legitimate,
and not to be investigated further.²⁵

Race scholars use the term _white supremacy_ to describe a
sociopolitical economic system of domination based on racial categories
that benefits those defined and perceived as white. This system of
structural power privileges, centralizes, and elevates white people as a
group. If, for example, we look at the racial breakdown of the people
who control our institutions, we see telling numbers in 2016–2017:

• Ten richest Americans: 100 percent white (seven of whom are among the
ten richest in the world)

• US Congress: 90 percent white

• US governors: 96 percent white

• Top military advisers: 100 percent white

• President and vice president: 100 percent white

• US House Freedom Caucus: 99 percent white

• Current US presidential cabinet: 91 percent white

• People who decide which TV shows we see: 93 percent white

• People who decide which books we read: 90 percent white

• People who decide which news is covered: 85 percent white

• People who decide which music is produced: 95 percent white

• People who directed the one hundred top-grossing films of all time,
worldwide: 95 percent white

• Teachers: 82 percent white

• Full-time college professors: 84 percent white

• Owners of men’s professional football teams: 97 percent white²⁶

These numbers are not describing minor organizations. Nor are these
institutions special-interest groups. The groups listed above are the
most powerful in the country. These numbers are not a matter of “good
people” versus “bad people.” They represent power and control by a
racial group that is in the position to disseminate and protect its own
self-image, worldview, and interests across the entire society.

One of the most potent ways white supremacy is disseminated is through
media representations, which have a profound impact on how we see the
world. Those who write and direct films are our cultural narrators; the
stories they tell shape our worldviews. Given that the majority of white
people live in racial isolation from people of color (and black people
in particular) and have very few authentic cross-racial relationships,
white people are deeply influenced by the racial messages in films.
Consider one statistic from the preceding list: of the hundred
top-grossing films worldwide in 2016, ninety-five were directed by white
Americans (ninety-nine of them by men). That is an incredibly homogenous
group of directors. Because these men are most likely at the top of the
social hierarchy in terms of race, class, and gender, they are the least
likely to have a wide variety of authentic egalitarian cross-racial
relationships. Yet they are in the position to represent the racial
“other.” Their representations of the “other” are thereby extremely
narrow and problematic, and yet they are reinforced over and over.
Further, these biased representations have been disseminated worldwide;
while white supremacy originated in the West, it circulates globally.

White resistance to the term _white supremacy_ prevents us from
examining how these messages shape us. Explicit white supremacists
understand this. Christian Picciolini, a former white nationalist,
explains that white nationalists recognized that they had to distance
themselves from the terms _racist_ and _white supremacy_ to gain broader
appeal. He describes the “alt-right” and white nationalist movements as
the culmination of a thirty-year effort to massage the white supremacist
message: “We recognized back then that we were turning away the average
American white racists and that we needed to look and speak more like
our neighbors. The idea we had was to blend in, normalize, make the
message more palatable.”²⁷ Derek Black, godson of David Duke and former
key youth leader in the white nationalist movement, explains: “My whole
talk was the fact that you could run as Republicans, and say things like
we need to shut down immigration, we need to fight affirmative action,
we need to end globalism, and you could win these positions, maybe as
long as you didn’t get outed as a white nationalist and get all the
controversy that comes along with it.”²⁸

Today’s white nationalists are not the first to recognize the importance
of distancing oneself from more-explicit expressions of white supremacy.
In a 1981 interview, Lee Atwater, Republican political strategist and
adviser to presidents Ronald Reagan and George H. W. Bush, explained
what came to be known as “the Southern strategy”—how to appeal to the
racism of white Southern voters without pronouncing it openly:

You start out in 1954 by saying, “Nigger, nigger, nigger.” By 1968 you
can’t say “nigger”—that hurts you. Backfires. So you say stuff like
forced busing, states’ rights and all that stuff. You’re getting so
abstract now [that] you’re talking about cutting taxes, and all these
things you’re talking about are totally economic things and a byproduct
of them is [that] blacks get hurt worse than whites. And subconsciously
maybe that is part of it. . . . But I’m saying that if it is getting
that abstract, and that coded, that we are doing away with the racial
problem one way or the other. You follow me—because obviously sitting
around saying, “We want to cut this,” is much more abstract than even
the busing thing, and a hell of a lot more abstract than “Nigger,
nigger.”²⁹

Our umbrage at the term _white supremacy_ only serves to protect the
processes it describes and obscure the mechanisms of racial inequality.
Still, I understand that the term is very charged for many white people,
especially older white people who associate the term with extreme hate
groups. However, I hope to have made clear that white supremacy is
something much more pervasive and subtle than the actions of explicit
white nationalists. White supremacy describes the culture we live in, a
culture that positions white people and all that is associated with them
(whiteness) as ideal. White supremacy is more than the idea that whites
are superior to people of color; it is the deeper premise that supports
this idea—the definition of whites as the norm or standard for human,
and people of color as a deviation from that norm.

Naming white supremacy changes the conversation in two key ways: It
makes the system visible and shifts the locus of change onto white
people, where it belongs. It also points us in the direction of the
lifelong work that is uniquely ours, challenging our complicity with and
investment in racism. This does not mean that people of color do not
play a part but that the full weight of responsibility rests with those
who control the institutions.



THE WHITE RACIAL FRAME


Sociologist Joe Feagin coined the term “white racial frame” to describe
how whites circulate and reinforce racial messages that position whites
as superior.³⁰ In this way, the white racial frame rests on, and is a
key mechanism of, white supremacy. The frame is deep and extensive, with
thousands of stored “bits.” These bits are pieces of cultural
information—images, stories, interpretations, omissions, silences—that
are passed along from one person and group to the next, and from one
generation to the next. The bits circulate both explicitly and
implicitly, for example, through movies, television, news, and other
media and stories told to us by family and friends. By constantly using
the white racial frame to interpret social relations and integrating new
bits, whites reinscribe the frame ever deeper.

At the most general level, the racial frame views whites as superior in
culture and achievement and views people of color as generally of less
social, economic, and political consequence; people of color are seen as
inferior to whites in the making and keeping of the nation. At the next
level of framing, because social institutions (education, medicine, law,
government, finance, and the military) are controlled by whites, white
dominance is unremarkable and taken for granted. That whites are
disproportionately enriched and privileged via these institutions is
also taken for granted; we are entitled to more privileges and resources
because we are “better” people. At the deepest level of the white frame,
negative stereotypes and images of racial others as inferior are
reinforced and accepted. At this level, corresponding emotions such as
fear, contempt, and resentment are also stored.

The frame includes both negative understandings of people of color and
positive understandings of whites and white institutions. It is so
internalized, so submerged, that it is never consciously considered or
challenged by most whites. To get a sense of the white racial frame
below the surface of your conscious awareness, think back to the
earliest time that you were aware that people from racial groups other
than your own existed. People of color recall a sense of always having
been aware, while most white people recall being aware by at least age
five. If you lived in a primarily white environment and are having
trouble remembering, think about Disney movies, music videos, sports
heroes, Chinese food, Aunt Jemima syrup, Uncle Ben’s rice, the Taco Bell
Chihuahua, Columbus Day, Apu from _The Simpsons,_ and the donkey from
_Shrek._

Reflect on these representations and ask yourself, Did your parents tell
you that race didn’t matter and that everyone was equal? Did they have
many friends of color? If people of color did not live in your
neighborhood, why didn’t they? Where did they live? What images, sounds,
and smells did you associate with these other neighborhoods? What kind
of activities did you think went on there? Were you encouraged to visit
these neighborhoods, or were you discouraged from visiting these
neighborhoods?

What about schools? What made a school good? Who went to good schools?
Who went to bad schools? If the schools in your area were racially
segregated (as most schools in the United States are), why didn’t you
attend school together? If this is because you lived in different
neighborhoods, why did you live in different neighborhoods? Were “their”
schools considered equal to, better than, or worse than, yours? If there
was busing in your town, in which direction did it go; who was bused
into whose schools? Why did the busing go in one direction and not the
other?

If you went to school together, did you all sit together in the
cafeteria? If not, why not? Were the honors or advanced placement
classes and the lower-track classes equally racially integrated? If not,
why not?

Now think about your teachers. When was the first time you had a teacher
of the same race as yours? Did you often have teachers of the same race
as your own?

Most white people, in reflecting on these questions, realize that they
almost always had white teachers; many did not have a teacher of color
until college. Conversely, most people of color have rarely if ever had
a teacher who reflected their own race(s). Why is it important to
reflect on our teachers in our effort to uncover our racial
socialization and the messages we receive from schools?

As you answer these questions, also consider which races were
geographically closer to you than others. If your school was perceived
as racially diverse, which races were more represented, and how did the
racial distribution affect the sense of value associated with the
school? For example, if white and Asian-heritage students were the
primary racial groups in your school, your school was likely to be seen
as better than a school with more representation from black and Latinx
students. What were you learning about the racial hierarchy and your
place in it from geography?

If you lived and went to school in racial segregation as most people in
the United States do, you had to make sense of the incongruity between
the claim that everyone was equal and the lived reality of segregation.
If you lived in an integrated neighborhood and/or attended an integrated
school, you had to make sense of the segregation in most of society
outside the school, especially in segments considered of higher value or
quality. It is also highly likely that there was still racial separation
within the school. And for those of us who may have grown up in more
integrated environments due to social class or changing neighborhood
demographics, it is unlikely that integration has been sustained in our
current lives. Reflection on these questions provides an entry point
into the deeper messages that we all absorb and that shape our behavior
and responses below the conscious level.

In the US, race is encoded in geography. I can name every neighborhood
in my city and its racial makeup. I can also tell you if a neighborhood
is coming up or down in terms of home equity, and this will be based
primarily on how its racial demographics are changing. Going up? It will
be getting whiter. Going down? It will be getting less white. When I was
a child, posters on my school walls and television shows like _Sesame
Street_ told me explicitly that all people were equal, but we simply do
not live together across race. I had to make sense of this separation.
If we were equal, why did we live separately? It must be normal and
natural to live apart (certainly no adult in my life was complaining
about the separation). And at a deeper level, it must be righteous that
we live apart, since we are better people. How did I get the message
that we were better people? Consider how we talk about white
neighborhoods: good, safe, sheltered, clean, desirable. By definition,
other spaces (not white) are bad, dangerous, crime-ridden and to be
avoided; these neighborhoods are not positioned as sheltered and
innocent. In these ways, the white racial frame is under construction.

Predominately white neighborhoods are not outside of race—they are
_teeming_ with race. Every moment we spend in those environments
reinforces powerful aspects of the white racial frame, including a
limited worldview, a reliance on deeply problematic depictions of people
of color, comfort in segregation with no sense that there might be value
in knowing people of color, and internalized superiority. In turn, our
capacity to engage constructively across racial lines becomes profoundly
limited.

To illustrate an early lesson in white racial framing, imagine that a
white mother and her white child are in the grocery store. The child
sees a black man and shouts out, “Mommy, that man’s skin is black!”
Several people, including the black man, turn to look. How do you
imagine the mother would respond? Most people would immediately put
their finger to their mouth and say, “Shush!” When white people are
asked what the mother might be feeling, most agree that she is likely to
feel anxiety, tension, and embarrassment. Indeed, many of us have had
similar experiences wherein the message was clear: we should not talk
openly about race.

When I use this example with my students, sometimes a student will say
that the mother is just teaching her child to be polite. In other words,
naming this man’s race would be impolite. But why? What is shameful
about being black—so shameful that we should pretend that we don’t
notice?³¹ The mother’s reaction would probably be the same if the man
had a visible disability of some kind or was obese. But if the child had
seen a white person and shouted out, “Mommy, that man’s skin is white!”
it is unlikely that the mother would feel the same anxiety, tension, and
embarrassment that would have accompanied the first statement.

Now imagine that the child had shouted out how handsome the man was, or
how strong. These statements would probably be met with chuckles and
smiles. The child would not likely be shushed, because we consider these
statements compliments.

The example of a child publicly calling out a black man’s race and
embarrassing the mother illustrates several aspects of white children’s
racial socialization. First, children learn that it is taboo to openly
talk about race. Second, they learn that people should pretend not to
notice undesirable aspects that define some people as less valuable than
others (a large birthmark on someone’s face, a person using a
wheelchair). These lessons manifest themselves later in life, when white
adults drop their voices before naming the race of someone who isn’t
white (and especially so if the race being named is _black_), as if
blackness were shameful or the word itself were impolite. If we add all
the comments we make about people of color privately, when we are less
careful, we may begin to recognize how white children are taught to
navigate race.



CHAPTER 3



RACISM AFTER THE CIVIL RIGHTS MOVEMENT


_“Children today are so open. When the old folks die off, we will
finally be free of racism.”_

_“I grew up in a small rural community, so I was very sheltered. I
didn’t learn anything about racism.”_

_“I judge people by what they do, not who they are.”_

_“I don’t see color; I see people.”_

_“We are all red under the skin.”_

_“I marched in the sixties.”_

_New racism_ is a term coined by film professor Martin Barker to capture
the ways in which racism has adapted over time so that modern norms,
policies, and practices result in similar racial outcomes as those in
the past, while not appearing to be explicitly racist.¹ Sociologist
Eduardo Bonilla-Silva captures this dynamic in the title of his book
_Racism Without Racists: Color-Blind Racism and the Persistence of
Racial Inequality in America._² He says that though virtually no one
claims to be racist anymore, racism still exists. How is that possible?
Racism can still exist because it is highly adaptive. Because of this
adaptability, we must be able to identify how it changes over time. For
example, after a white nationalist march and the murder of a
counter-protester, the president of the United States said that there
are “very fine people on both sides.” This comment would have been
unthinkable from a high-ranking public official just a few years ago.
Yet if we asked the president if he was a racist, I am confident that he
would reply with a resounding no (in fact, he recently stated that he
was “the least racist” person one could ever meet). In this chapter, I
review various ways that racism has adapted over time to continue to
produce racial disparity while it exempts virtually all white people
from any involvement in, or benefit from, racism.

All systems of oppression are adaptive; they can withstand and adjust to
challenges and still maintain inequality. Take, for instance, the
federal recognition of same-sex marriage and accommodations for people
with disabilities. While the overall systems of heterosexism and ableism
are still with us, they have adapted in limited ways. These adaptations
are held up as reassurance to those who fought long and hard for a
particular change that equality has now been achieved. These
milestones—such as the recognition of same-sex marriage, the passage of
the Americans with Disabilities Act, Title 9, the election of Barack
Obama—are, of course, significant and worthy of celebration. But systems
of oppression are deeply rooted and not overcome with the simple passage
of legislation. Advances are also tenuous, as we can see in recent
challenges to the rights of LGBTQI (lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender,
queer or questioning, and intersex) people. Systems of oppression are
not completely inflexible. But they are far less flexible than popular
ideology would acknowledge, and the collective impact of the inequitable
distribution of resources continues across history.



COLOR-BLIND RACISM


What is termed color-blind racism is an example of racism’s ability to
adapt to cultural changes.³ According to this ideology, if we pretend
not to notice race, then there can be no racism. The idea is based on a
line from the famous “I Have a Dream” speech given by Dr. Martin Luther
King in 1963 during the March on Washington for Jobs and Freedom.

At the time of King’s speech, it was much more socially acceptable for
white people to admit to their racial prejudices and belief in white
racial superiority. But many white people had never witnessed the kind
of violence to which blacks were subjected. Because the struggle for
civil rights was televised, whites across the nation watched in horror
as black men, women, and children were attacked by police dogs and fire
hoses during peaceful protests and beaten and dragged away from lunch
counters. Once the Civil Rights Act of 1964 was passed (a landmark civil
rights and US labor law that outlaws discrimination based on race,
color, religion, sex, or national origin), it was less acceptable for
white people to admit to racial prejudice; they did not want to be
associated with the racist acts they had witnessed on television (in
addition to the fact that discrimination was now illegal). One line of
King’s speech in particular—that one day he might be judged by the
content of his character and not the color of his skin—was seized upon
by the white public because the words were seen to provide a simple and
immediate solution to racial tensions: pretend that we don’t see race,
and racism will end. Color blindness was now promoted as the remedy for
racism, with white people insisting that they didn’t see race or, if
they did, that it had no meaning to them.

Clearly, the civil rights movement didn’t end racism; nor have claims of
color blindness. But reducing King’s work to this simplistic idea
illustrates how movements for social change are co-opted, stripped of
their initial challenge, and used against the very cause from which they
originated. For example, a common response in the name of color
blindness is to declare that an individual who says that race matters is
the one who is racist. In other words, it is racist to acknowledge race.

Consider color-blind ideology from the perspective of a person of color.
An example I often share occurred when I was co-leading a workshop with
an African American man. A white participant said to him, “I don’t see
race; I don’t see you as black.” My co-trainer’s response was, “Then how
will you see racism?” He then explained to her that he was black, he was
confident that she could see this, and that his race meant that he had a
very different experience in life than she did. If she were ever going
to understand or challenge racism, she would need to acknowledge this
difference. Pretending that she did not notice that he was black was not
helpful to him in any way, as it denied his reality—indeed, it refused
his reality—and kept hers insular and unchallenged. This pretense that
she did not notice his race assumed that he was “just like her,” and in
so doing, she projected her reality onto him. For example, I feel
welcome at work so you must too; I have never felt that my race
mattered, so you must feel that yours doesn’t either. But of course, we
do see the race of other people, and race holds deep social meaning for
us.

We might think of conscious racial awareness as the tip of an iceberg,
the superficial aspects of our racial socialization: our intentions
(always good!) and what we are supposed to acknowledge seeing
(nothing!). Meanwhile, under the surface is the massive depth of racist
socialization: messages, beliefs, images, associations, internalized
superiority and entitlement, perceptions, and emotions. Color-blind
ideology makes it difficult for us to address these unconscious beliefs.
While the idea of color blindness may have started out as a
well-intentioned strategy for interrupting racism, in practice it has
served to deny the reality of racism and thus hold it in place.

Racial bias is largely unconscious, and herein lies the deepest
challenge—the defensiveness that ensues upon any suggestion of racial
bias.⁴ This defensiveness is classic white fragility because it protects
our racial bias while simultaneously affirming our identities as
open-minded. Yes, it’s uncomfortable to be confronted with an aspect of
ourselves that we don’t like, but we can’t change what we refuse to see.

Countless studies show empirically that people of color are
discriminated against in the workplace.⁵ Imagine you had empirical
evidence that your coworker was unintentionally discriminating against
people of color during the hiring process. Given your belief in
equality, you would probably think that it was imperative to inform the
person so that he or she could stop. You pointed this discrimination out
in the most diplomatic way possible. Still, what do you think your
colleague’s response would be? Would you hear gratitude that you had
brought that fact to the person’s attention? Probably not. More likely,
your coworker would respond with hurt, anger, and defensiveness,
insisting that he or she had not racially discriminated but had chosen
the most qualified candidates. And the individual would sincerely
believe that this was true, even though you had empirical evidence that
it was not. This defensiveness is rooted in the false but widespread
belief that racial discrimination can only be intentional. Our lack of
understanding about implicit bias leads to aversive racism.



AVERSIVE RACISM


Aversive racism is a manifestation of racism that well-intentioned
people who see themselves as educated and progressive are more likely to
exhibit.⁶ It exists under the surface of consciousness because it
conflicts with consciously held beliefs of racial equality and justice.
Aversive racism is a subtle but insidious form, as aversive racists
enact racism in ways that allow them to maintain a positive self-image
(e.g., “I have lots of friends of color”; “I judge people by the content
of their character, not the color of their skin”).

Whites enact racism while maintaining a positive self-image in many
ways:

• Rationalizing racial segregation as unfortunate but necessary to
access “good schools”

• Rationalizing that our workplaces are virtually all white because
people of color just don’t apply

• Avoiding direct racial language and using racially coded terms such as
_urban, underprivileged, diverse, sketchy,_ and _good neighborhoods_

• Denying that we have few cross-racial relationships by proclaiming how
diverse our community or workplace is

• Attributing inequality between whites and people of color to causes
other than racism

Consider a conversation I had with a white friend. She was telling me
about a (white) couple she knew who had just moved to New Orleans and
bought a house for a mere twenty-five thousand dollars. “Of course,” she
immediately added, “they also had to buy a gun, and Joan is afraid to
leave the house.” I immediately knew they had bought a home in a black
neighborhood. This was a moment of white racial bonding between this
couple who shared the story of racial danger and my friend, and then
between my friend and me, as she repeated the story. Through this tale,
the four of us fortified familiar images of the horror of black space
and drew boundaries between “us” and “them” without ever having to
directly name race or openly express our disdain for black space.

Notice that the need for a gun is a key part of this story—it would not
have the degree of social capital it holds if the emphasis were on the
price of the house alone. Rather, the story’s emotional power rests on
why a house would be that cheap—because it is in a black neighborhood
where white people literally might not get out alive. Yet while very
negative and stereotypical representations of blacks were reinforced in
that exchange, not naming race provided plausible deniability. In fact,
in preparing to share this incident, I texted my friend and asked her
the name of the city her friends had moved to. I also wanted to confirm
my assumption that she was talking about a black neighborhood. I share
the text exchange here:

“Hey, what city did you say your friends had bought a house in for
$25,000?”

“New Orleans. They said they live in a very bad neighborhood and they
each have to have a gun to protect themselves. I wouldn’t pay 5 cents
for that neighborhood.”

“I assume it’s a black neighborhood?”

“Yes. You get what you pay for. I’d rather pay $500,000 and live
somewhere where I wasn’t afraid.”

“I wasn’t asking because I want to live there. I’m writing about this in
my book, the way that white people talk about race without ever coming
out and talking about race.”

“I wouldn’t want you to live there it’s too far away from me!”

Notice that when I simply ask what city the house is in, she repeats the
story about the neighborhood being so bad that her friends need guns.
When I ask if the neighborhood is black, she is comfortable confirming
that it is. But when I tell her that I am interested in how whites talk
about race without talking about race, she switches the narrative. Now
her concern is about not wanting me to live so far away. This is a
classic example of aversive racism: holding deep racial disdain that
surfaces in daily discourse but not being able to admit it because the
disdain conflicts with our self-image and professed beliefs.

Readers may be asking themselves, “But if the neighborhood is really
dangerous, why is acknowledging this danger a sign of racism?” Research
in implicit bias has shown that perceptions of criminal activity are
influenced by race. White people will perceive danger simply by the
presence of black people; we cannot trust our perceptions when it comes
to race and crime.⁷ But regardless of whether the neighborhood is
actually more or less dangerous than other neighborhoods, what is
salient about this exchange is how it functions racially and what that
means for the white people engaged in it. For my friend and me, this
conversation did not increase our awareness of the danger of some
specific neighborhood. Rather, the exchange reinforced our fundamental
beliefs about black people. Toni Morrison uses the term _race talk_ to
capture “the explicit insertion into everyday life of racial signs and
symbols that have no meaning other than positioning African Americans
into the lowest level of the racial hierarchy.”⁸ Casual race talk is a
key component of white racial framing because it accomplishes the
interconnected goals of elevating whites while demeaning people of
color; race talk always implies a racial “us” and “them.”

Consider an experience I had with aversive racism. My last academic
position was in a state I had never been to before my interview.
Throughout the three days of interviewing, other white people warned me
not to buy a home in Springfield or Holyoke if I took the position,
especially if I had children. While no one openly named race, the racial
coding was not lost on me. I now knew where the people of color were
concentrated in the area. At the same time, because no one directly
mentioned race, we could all deny that this was what we were actually
talking about. Returning to my hotel room the first night, I looked up
the demographics. Sure enough, Springfield and Holyoke had significantly
high populations, close to 50 percent, of black and brown people.
Starting on day one of my visit, my fellow whites had communicated the
racial boundaries to me.⁹

My teacher-education students also engaged in race talk—reinforcing the
boundaries between “us” and “them” while positioning us as superior.
They engaged in race talk when they expressed fear about being placed in
“dangerous” neighborhoods while describing their hometowns as
“sheltered.” These depictions are relentlessly strengthened by news
stories that position violent crime committed in primarily white
suburban communities as shocking, yet claiming that one has grown up in
a sheltered environment raises a question that begs to be answered:
“Sheltered from what and in contrast to whom?” If we grow up in
environments with few if any people of color, are we not in fact less
sheltered from racist conditioning because we have to rely on narrow and
repetitive media representations, jokes, omissions, and warnings for our
understanding of people of color?

Conversely, positioning white spaces as sheltered and those who are
raised in them as racially innocent taps into classic narratives of
people of color as _not_ innocent. Racist images and resultant white
fears can be found at all levels of society, and myriad studies
demonstrate that whites believe that people of color (and blacks in
particular) are dangerous.¹⁰

Whites rarely consider how sheltered and safe their spaces may be from
the perspective of people of color (e.g., Trayvon Martin’s experience in
a gated white community). Because it reverses the actual direction of
racial danger, this narrative may be one of the most pernicious.

When you consider the moral judgment we make about people we deem as
racist in our society, the need to deny our own racism—even to
ourselves—makes sense. We believe we are superior at a deeply
internalized level and act on this belief in the practice of our lives,
but we must deny this belief to fit into society and maintain our
self-identity as good, moral people. Unfortunately, aversive racism only
protects racism, because we can’t challenge our racial filters if we
can’t consider the possibility that we have them. Of course, some whites
explicitly avow racism. We might consider these whites actually more
aware of, and honest about, their biases than those of us who consider
ourselves open-minded yet who have rarely thought critically about the
biases we inevitably hold or how we may be expressing them.



CULTURAL RACISM


The body of research about children and race demonstrates that white
children develop a sense of white superiority as early as preschool.¹¹
This early start shouldn’t be surprising, as society sends constant
messages that to be white is better than to be a person of color.

Despite the claims of many white young adults that racism is in the past
and that they were taught to see everyone as equal, research shows
otherwise. For example, polls sponsored by MTV in 2014 show that
millennials profess more tolerance and a deeper commitment to equality
and fairness than previous generations did.¹² At the same time,
millennials are committed to an ideal of color blindness that leaves
them uncomfortable with, and confused about, race and opposed to
measures to reduce racial inequality. Perhaps most significantly, 41
percent of white millennials believe that government pays too much
attention to minorities, and 48 percent believe that discrimination
against whites is as big a problem as discrimination against people of
color. Many in this generation claim that the election of Barack Obama
as president shows that we are postracial. These polls were conducted
before the presidency of Donald Trump, but as his election has made
clear, we are far from being postracial.

Another significant study that was based on the practices of millennials
rather than their claims was conducted by sociologists Leslie Picca and
Joe Feagin.¹³ They asked 626 white college students at twenty-eight
colleges across the United States to keep journals and record every
instance of racial issues, racial images, and racial understanding that
they observed or were part of for six to eight weeks. The students
recorded more than seventy-five hundred accounts of blatantly racist
comments and actions by the white people in their lives (friends,
families, acquaintances, strangers). These accounts come from the
generation most likely to claim they were taught to see everyone as
equal—those who grew up in the age of color-blind ideology after the
civil rights movement. Picca and Feagin’s study provides empirical
evidence that racism continues to be explicitly expressed by whites,
even those who are young and profess to be progressive. Consider these
examples from their study:

“As I sit in a room with a bunch of frat guys, Phil walks in chanting
‘rotchie, rotchie, rotchie!!’ I ask . . . what that term means and I am
answered with a giggle and a quick ‘it’s slang for nigger, like
niggerotchie.’ . . . ” [Eileen]

“Robby was there telling a joke. . . . He glanced to see if anyone was
around. He starts, ‘A black man, a Latin man, and a white guy find a
magical lamp on the beach [racist joke ensues].’ I thought it was pretty
funny and I wasn’t the only one. But, I’m glad he waited till no one was
around to tell it. If you didn’t know Robby you might misunderstand.”
[Ashley]¹⁴

Several common dynamics are illustrated in the thousands of examples
Picca and Feagin collected. The first is how much explicit racism young
people are exposed to and participate in. The second is the idea that if
someone is a good person, he or she cannot be racist, as demonstrated in
the student’s note that if someone overheard, the person might
“misunderstand” Robby. This sort of racism makes for a very challenging
dynamic in which whites are operating under the false assumption that we
can’t simultaneously be good people and participate in racism, at the
same time that we are dishonest about what we really think and do
regarding people of color.

The study also reveals a consistent pattern in how these comments and
actions were expressed. The majority of incidents occurred in what the
researchers describe as the _backstage_—in all-white company. Further,
they found that whites involved in these incidents most often played
predictable roles. Typically, there was a protagonist who initiated the
racist act, a cheerleader who encouraged it through laughter or
agreement, the spectators who stood in silence, and (very rarely) a
dissenter who objected. Virtually all dissenters were subjected to a
form of peer pressure in which they were told that it was only a joke
and that they should lighten up.

The researchers document that in front-stage settings (those in which
people of color were present), the white students displayed a range of
racially conscious behaviors, including the following:

• Acting overly nice

• Avoiding contact (e.g., crossing a street or not going to a particular
bar or club)

• Mimicking “black mannerisms and speech”

• Being careful not to use racial terms or labels

• Using code words to talk negatively about people of color

• Occasional violence directed at people of color

In backstage settings, where people of color were not present, white
students often used humor to reinforce racial stereotypes about people
of color, particularly blacks. Picca and Feagin argue that the purpose
of these backstage performances is to create white solidarity and to
reinforce the ideology of white and male supremacy. This behavior keeps
racism circulating, albeit in less formal but perhaps more powerful ways
than in the past. Today we have a cultural norm that insists we hide our
racism from people of color and deny it among ourselves, but not that we
actually challenge it. In fact, we are socially penalized for
challenging racism.

I am often asked if I think the younger generation is less racist. No, I
don’t. In some ways, racism’s adaptations over time are more sinister
than concrete rules such as Jim Crow. The adaptations produce the same
outcome (people of color are blocked from moving forward) but have been
put in place by a dominant white society that won’t or can’t admit to
its beliefs. This intransigence results in another pillar of white
fragility: the refusal to know.



CHAPTER 4



HOW DOES RACE SHAPE THE LIVES OF WHITE PEOPLE?


_White People: I don’t want you to understand me
better; I want you to understand yourselves. Your
survival has never depended on your knowledge of
white culture. In fact, it’s required your ignorance._

—Ijeoma Oluo

To understand how white people become so difficult in conversations
about race, we need to understand the underlying foundation of white
fragility: how being white shapes our perspectives, experiences, and
responses. Every aspect of being white discussed in this chapter is
shared by virtually all white people in the Western context generally
and the US context specifically. At the same time, no person of color in
this context can make these same claims.



BELONGING


I was born into a culture in which I belonged, racially. Indeed, the
forces of racism were shaping me even before I took my first breath. If
I were born in a hospital, regardless of the decade in which I was born,
any hospital would be open to me because my parents were white. If my
parents attended a childbirth preparation class, the instructor was most
likely white, the videos they watched in class most likely depicted
white people, and their fellow classmates with whom they built
connections and community were also most likely white. When my parents
read their birthing manuals and other written materials, the pictures
most likely depicted primarily white mothers and fathers, doctors and
nurses. If they took a parenting class, the theories and models of child
development were based on white racial identity. The doctors and nurses
attending my birth were in all likelihood white. Although my parents may
have been anxious about the birth process, they did not have to worry
about how they would be treated by the hospital staff because of their
race. The years of research demonstrating racial discrimination in
health care assure me that my parents were more likely to have been
treated well by hospital personnel and to receive a higher caliber of
care than would people of color.¹

Conversely, the people who cleaned my mother’s hospital room, did the
laundry, cooked and cleaned in the cafeteria, and maintained the
facilities were most likely people of color. The very context in which I
entered the world was organized hierarchically by race. Based on this
hierarchy, we could predict whether I would survive my birth based on my
race.

As I move through my daily life, my race is unremarkable. I belong when
I turn on the TV, read best-selling novels, and watch blockbuster
movies. I belong when I walk past the magazine racks at the grocery
store or drive past billboards. I belong when I see the overwhelming
number of white people on lists of the “Most Beautiful.” I may feel
inadequate in light of my age or weight, but I will belong racially. For
example, in 2017, singer Rhianna introduced a makeup line for women of
all skin colors. Gratitude from women of color poured in. Many of their
tweets included the exclamation “Finally!”² These are tweets I have
never needed to send.

I belong when I look at my teachers, counselors, and classmates. I
belong when I learn about the history of my country throughout the year
and when I am shown its heroes and heroines—George Washington, Thomas
Jefferson, Abraham Lincoln, Robert E. Lee, Amelia Earhart, Susan B.
Anthony, John Glenn, Sally Ride, and Louisa May Alcott.³ I belong when I
look through my textbooks and at the pictures on my classroom walls. I
belong when I speak to my children’s teachers, when I talk to their camp
counselors, when I consult with their doctors and dentists. No matter
how I might explain why all these representations are overwhelmingly
white, they still shape my identity and worldview.

In virtually every situation or context deemed normal, neutral or
prestigious in society, I belong racially. This belonging is a deep and
ever-present feeling that has always been with me. Belonging has settled
deep into my consciousness; it shapes my daily thoughts and concerns,
what I reach for in life, and what I expect to find. The experience of
belonging is so natural that I do not have to think about it. The rare
moments in which I don’t belong racially come as a surprise—a surprise
that I can either enjoy for its novelty or easily avoid if I find it
unsettling.

For example, I was invited to the retirement party of a white friend.
The party was a pot-luck picnic held in a public park. As I walked down
the slope toward the picnic shelters, I noticed two parties going on
side by side. One gathering was primarily composed of white people, and
the other appeared to be all black people. I experienced a sense of
disequilibrium as I approached and had to choose which party was my
friend’s. I felt a mild sense of anxiety as I considered that I might
have to enter the all-black group, then mild relief as I realized that
my friend was in the other group. This relief was amplified as I thought
that I might have mistakenly walked over to the black party! All these
thoughts and feelings happened in just a few seconds, but they were a
rare moment of racial self-awareness. The mere possibility that I might
have to experience not belonging racially was enough to raise racial
discomfort.

It is rare for me to experience a sense of not belonging racially, and
these are usually very temporary, easily avoidable situations. Indeed,
throughout my life, I have been warned that I should avoid situations in
which I might be a racial minority. These situations are often presented
as scary, dangerous, or “sketchy.” Yet if the environment or situation
is viewed as good, nice, or valuable, I can be confident that as a white
person, I will be seen as racially belonging there.



FREEDOM FROM THE BURDEN OF RACE


Because I haven’t been socialized to see myself or to be seen by other
whites in racial terms, I don’t carry the psychic weight of race; I
don’t have to worry about how others feel about my race. Nor do I worry
that my race will be held against me. While I may feel unease in an
upper-class environment, I will take for granted that I belong racially
in these settings. I certainly will not be the only white person there,
unless the event is specifically organized by, or celebrating, people of
color. George Zimmerman would not have stopped me as I walked through a
gated suburban neighborhood.

Patrick Rosal writes poignantly about the pain of being mistaken for the
help at a black-tie event celebrating National Book Award winners.⁴ I
have witnessed this assumption of servitude many times as I checked into
hotels with colleagues of color. I have made this assumption myself when
I have been unable to hide my surprise that the black man is the school
principal or when I ask a Latinx woman kneeling in her garden if this is
her home.

As I consider career choices I will have countless role models across a
vast array of fields. When I apply for a job, virtually anyone in a
position to hire me will share my race. And although I may encounter a
token person of color during the hiring process, if I am not
specifically applying to an organization founded by people of color, the
majority of those I interact with will share my race. Once hired, I
won’t have to deal with my coworkers’ resentment that I only got the job
because I am white; I am assumed to be the most qualified.⁵ If there are
people of color in the organization who resent my hire, I can easily
dismiss them and rest assured that their feelings won’t carry much
weight. If resentment from employees of color does manage to come to my
attention, I can find copious validation and other support from my white
coworkers, who will reassure me that our colleagues of color are the
ones who are biased. With race as a nonissue, I can focus on my work and
productivity and be seen as a team player. This is yet another example
of the concept of whiteness as property discussed earlier: whiteness has
psychological advantages that translate into material returns.

As I move through my day, racism just isn’t my problem. While I am aware
that race has been used unfairly against people of color, I haven’t been
taught to see this problem as any responsibility of mine; as long as I
personally haven’t done anything I am aware of, racism is a nonissue.
This freedom from responsibility gives me a level of racial relaxation
and emotional and intellectual space that people of color are not
afforded as they move through their day. They don’t lack these benefits
just because they are members of a numerical minority and I am not
(white men are a numerical minority). People of color lack these
benefits because they are racialized within a culture of white
supremacy—a culture in which they are seen as inferior, if they are seen
at all.

Raised in a culture of white supremacy, I exude a deeply internalized
assumption of racial superiority. Having to navigate white people’s
internalized assumption of racial superiority is a great psychic drain
for people of color, but I have no need to concern myself with that.



FREEDOM OF MOVEMENT


I am free to move in virtually any space seen as normal, neutral, or
valuable. While I might worry about my class status in some settings,
for example, when attending a “high-society” event such as a museum
opening or an art auction, I will not have to worry about my race. In
fact, my race will work in my favor in these settings, granting me the
initial benefit of the doubt that I belong there.⁶ I also will certainly
not be the only white person there, unless the event is specifically
organized by, or celebrating, people of color.

In the early years of my career as a workplace diversity trainer, I
co-led the workshops with Deborah, an African American woman. After a
particularly grueling travel schedule, I proposed that we get away for a
relaxing weekend and suggested Lake Coeur d’Alene in Idaho. Deborah
laughed at the suggestion and let me know that visiting northern Idaho
did not sound like a relaxing weekend for her. Besides being a very
small town, Lake Coeur d’Alene is near Hayden Lake, where the Aryan
Nation was building a compound.⁷ Although not all people who live in the
area are avowed white nationalists, the knowledge that some people might
be part of this openly racist group was terrifying for Deborah. Even if
there were no organized white nationalist encampments in the area,
Deborah did not want to be isolated in a virtually all-white environment
and have to interact with white people who may have never met a black
person before. Yet as a white person, I did not have to consider any of
this; all places I perceive as beautiful are open to me racially, and my
expectation is that I will have a pleasant and relaxing experience
there.



JUST PEOPLE


Another way that my life has been shaped by being white is that my race
is held up as the norm for humanity. Whites are “just people”—our race
is rarely if ever named. Think about how often white people mention the
race of a person if they are not white: my black friend, the Asian
woman. I enjoy young adult literature but am taken aback by how
consistently the race of characters of color is named and how only those
characters’ races are named.

To use an example from school, consider the writers we are all expected
to read; the list usually includes Ernest Hemingway, John Steinbeck,
Charles Dickens, Fyodor Dostoevsky, Mark Twain, Jane Austen, and William
Shakespeare. These writers are seen as representing the universal human
experience, and we read them precisely because they are presumed to be
able to speak to us all. Now consider the writers we turn to during
events promoting diversity—events such as Multicultural Authors Week and
Black History Month. These writers usually include Maya Angelou, Toni
Morrison, James Baldwin, Amy Tan, and Sandra Cisneros. We go to these
writers for the black or Asian perspective; Toni Morrison is always seen
as a black writer, not just a writer. But when we are not looking for
the black or Asian perspective, we return to white writers, reinforcing
the idea of whites as just human, and people of color as particular
kinds (racialized) of humans. This also allows white (male) writers to
be seen as not having an agenda or any particular perspective, while
racialized (and gendered) writers do.

Virtually any representation of _human_ is based on white people’s norms
and images—“flesh-colored” makeup, standard emoji, depictions of Adam
and Eve, Jesus and Mary, educational models of the human body with white
skin and blue eyes.⁸ Take, for example, a photograph that was circulated
widely and featured in the _Daily Mail._ The photo of a blond, blue-eyed
white woman is captioned “What Would a Scientifically Perfect Face Look
Like?” Below the image is the question “Is this the perfect face?”⁹ This
one example illustrates several concepts discussed thus far: the white
racial frame, whiteness as the human norm, whiteness as ideal beauty,
and whiteness as naturally superior. Not only is the idea behind the
claim racially problematic in its own right, but it rests on and
reinforces the backdrop of an earlier era of scientific racism.

Consider models for child development and its stages, and how our
culture talks about children as a collective group. Theorists present
human development as if it were universal. Occasionally, we may
distinguish between boys and girls, but even then, the categories are
presumed to include all boys or all girls. Now consider all the dynamics
I have discussed thus far. Is an Asian or an Indigenous child’s
development the same as a white child’s within the context of white
supremacy?



WHITE SOLIDARITY


White solidarity is the unspoken agreement among whites to protect white
advantage and not cause another white person to feel racial discomfort
by confronting them when they say or do something racially problematic.
Educational researcher Christine Sleeter describes this solidarity as
white “racial bonding.” She observes that when whites interact, they
affirm “a common stance on race-related issues, legitimating particular
interpretations of groups of color, and drawing conspiratorial we-they
boundaries.”¹⁰ White solidarity requires both silence about anything
that exposes the advantages of the white position and tacit agreement to
remain racially united in the protection of white supremacy. To break
white solidarity is to break rank.

We see white solidarity at the dinner table, at parties, and in work
settings. Many of us can relate to the big family dinner at which Uncle
Bob says something racially offensive. Everyone cringes but no one
challenges him because nobody wants to ruin the dinner. Or the party
where someone tells a racist joke but we keep silent because we don’t
want to be accused of being too politically correct and be told to
lighten up. In the workplace, we avoid naming racism for the same
reasons, in addition to wanting to be seen as a team player and to avoid
anything that may jeopardize our career advancement. All these familiar
scenarios are examples of white solidarity. (Why speaking up about
racism would ruin the ambiance or threaten our career advancement is
something we might want to talk about.)

The very real consequences of breaking white solidarity play a
fundamental role in maintaining white supremacy. We do indeed risk
censure and other penalties from our fellow whites. We might be accused
of being politically correct or might be perceived as angry, humorless,
combative, and not suited to go far in an organization. In my own life,
these penalties have worked as a form of social coercion. Seeking to
avoid conflict and wanting to be liked, I have chosen silence all too
often.

Conversely, when I kept quiet about racism, I was rewarded with social
capital such as being seen as fun, cooperative, and a team player.
Notice that within a white supremacist society, I am rewarded for not
interrupting racism and punished in a range of ways—big and small—when I
do. I can justify my silence by telling myself that at least I am not
the one who made the joke and that therefore I am not at fault. But my
silence is not benign because it protects and maintains the racial
hierarchy and my place within it. Each uninterrupted joke furthers the
circulation of racism through the culture, and the ability for the joke
to circulate depends on my complicity.

People of color certainly experience white solidarity as a form of
racism, wherein we fail to hold each other accountable, to challenge
racism when we see it, or to support people of color in the struggle for
racial justice.



THE GOOD OLD DAYS


As a white person, I can openly and unabashedly reminisce about “the
good old days.” Romanticized recollections of the past and calls for a
return to former ways are a function of white privilege, which manifests
itself in the ability to remain oblivious to our racial history.
Claiming that the past was socially better than the present is also a
hallmark of white supremacy. Consider any period in the past from the
perspective of people of color: 246 years of brutal enslavement; the
rape of black women for the pleasure of white men and to produce more
enslaved workers; the selling off of black children; the attempted
genocide of Indigenous people, Indian removal acts, and reservations;
indentured servitude, lynching, and mob violence; sharecropping; Chinese
exclusion laws; Japanese American internment; Jim Crow laws of mandatory
segregation; black codes; bans on black jury service; bans on voting;
imprisoning people for unpaid work; medical sterilization and
experimentation; employment discrimination; educational discrimination;
inferior schools; biased laws and policing practices; redlining and
subprime mortgages; mass incarceration; racist media representations;
cultural erasures, attacks, and mockery; and untold and perverted
historical accounts, and you can see how a romanticized past is strictly
a white construct. But it is a powerful construct because it calls out
to a deeply internalized sense of superiority and entitlement and the
sense that any advancement for people of color is an encroachment on
this entitlement.

The past was great for white people (and white men in particular)
because their positions went largely unchallenged. In understanding the
power of white fragility, we have to notice that the mere questioning of
those positions triggered the white fragility that Trump capitalized on.
There has been no actual loss of power for the white elite, who have
always controlled our institutions and continue to do so by a very wide
margin. Of the fifty richest people on earth, twenty-nine are American.
Of these twenty-nine, all are white, and all but two are men (Lauren
Jobs inherited her husband’s wealth, and Alice Walton her father’s).

Similarly, the white working class has always held the top positions
within blue-collar fields (the overseers, labor leaders, and fire and
police chiefs). And although globalization and the erosion of workers’
rights has had a profound impact on the white working class, white
fragility enabled the white elite to direct the white working class’s
resentment toward people of color. The resentment is clearly
misdirected, given that the people who control the economy and who have
managed to concentrate more wealth into fewer (white) hands than ever
before in human history are the white elite.

Consider this data on the distribution of wealth:

• Since 2015, the richest 1 percent has owned more wealth than the rest
of the planet owns.¹¹

• Eight men own the same amount of wealth as do the poorest half of the
world.

• The incomes of the poorest 10 percent of people increased by less than
three dollars a year between 1988 and 2011, while the incomes of the
richest 1 percent increased 182 times as much.

• In Bloomberg’s daily ranking of the world’s five hundred richest
people, the world’s wealthiest three (Bill Gates, Warren Buffet, and
Jeff Bezos), all white American men, have total net worths of $85
billion, $79 billion, and $73 billion, respectively.¹² By comparison,
the 2015 gross domestic product of Sri Lanka was $82 billion; Luxembourg
$58 billion; and Iceland, $16 billion.¹³

• Of the world’s ten richest people, nine are white men.¹⁴

• In 2015–2016, the world’s ten biggest corporations together had
revenue greater than that of the government revenues of 180 countries
combined.

• In the US, over the last thirty years, the growth in the incomes of
the bottom 50 percent has been zero, whereas incomes of the top 1
percent have grown by 300 percent.

The call to Make America Great Again worked powerfully in service of the
racial manipulation of white people, diverting blame away from the white
elite and toward various peoples of color—for example, undocumented
workers, immigrants, and the Chinese—for the current conditions of the
white working class.

The romanticized “traditional” family values of the past are also
racially problematic. White families fled from cities to the suburbs to
escape the influx of people of color, a process socialogists term _white
flight._ They wrote covenants to keep schools and neighborhoods
segregated and forbade cross-racial dating.

Consider the extreme resistance to busing and other forms of school
integration from white parents. In the landmark Supreme Court decision
_Brown v. Board of Education,_ the court ruled that separate was
inherently unequal and that schools needed to desegregate “with all
deliberate speed.” Busing children from one neighborhood into a school
in another to account for residential segregation became a major
strategy of desegregation (notably, white children were generally not
bused into predominately black schools; instead, black children endured
long bus rides to attend predominately white schools). Regina Williams,
a black student from Roxbury, Massachusetts, was bused into a school in
South Boston. She described her first day in a formerly all-white school
as “like a war zone.” School officials, politicians, the courts, and the
media gave precedence to the desires of white parents who overwhelmingly
and vehemently opposed school desegregation. It has not been African
Americans who resist integration efforts; it has always been whites.¹⁵
The practice of our lives as a white collective has rarely been in
alignment with the values we profess.

At the minimum, this idealization of the past is another example of
white experiences and perceptions positioned as universal. How might
this nostalgia sound to any person of color who is aware of this
country’s history? The ability to erase this racial history and actually
believe that the past was better than the present “for everybody” has
inculcated a false consciousness for me personally and as a national
citizen.



WHITE RACIAL INNOCENCE


Because we are not raised to see ourselves in racial terms or to see
white space as racialized space, we position ourselves as innocent of
race. On countless occasions, I have heard white people claim that
because they grew up in segregation, they were sheltered from race. At
the same time, we turn to people of color, who may also have grown up in
racially segregated spaces (because of decades of de jure and de facto
policies that blocked them from moving into white neighborhoods) to
learn about racism. But why aren’t people of color who grew up in
segregation also innocent of race? I ask my readers to reflect deeply on
the idea that white segregation is racially innocent.

Because people of color are not seen as racially innocent, they are
expected to speak to issues of race (but must do so on white terms).
This idea—that racism is not a white problem—enables us to sit back and
let people of color take very real risks of invalidation and retaliation
as they share their experiences. But we are not required to take similar
cross-racial risks. They—not we—have race, and thus they are the holders
of racial knowledge. In this way, we position ourselves as standing
outside hierarchical social relations.

White flight may be seen as another aspect of white racial innocence, as
it is often justified by beliefs that people of color (again, especially
black people) are more prone to crime and that if “too many” black
people move into a neighborhood, crime will increase, home values will
go down, and the neighborhood will deteriorate. For example, in a study
of race and perceptions of crime conducted by sociologists Heather
Johnson and Thomas Shapiro, white families consistently discussed fear
of crime and associated crime with people of color. In their minds, the
more people of color in an area (specifically, blacks and Latinos), the
more dangerous the area was perceived to be. Research matching census
data and police department crime statistics show that this association
does not hold, but these statistics do not quell white fears. For most
whites, the percentage of young men of color in a neighborhood is
directly correlated with perceptions of the neighborhood crime level.¹⁶

Deeply held white associations of black people with crime distort
reality and the actual direction of danger that has historically existed
between whites and blacks. The vast history of extensive and brutal
explicit violence perpetrated by whites and their ideological
rationalizations are all trivialized through white claims of racial
innocence. The power we now wield and have wielded for centuries is thus
obscured.

It has been well documented that blacks and Latinos are stopped by
police more often than whites are for the same activities and that they
receive harsher sentences than whites do for the same crimes. Research
has also shown that a major reason for this racial disparity can be
attributed to the beliefs held by judges and others about the cause of
the criminal behavior.¹⁷ For example, the criminal behavior of white
juveniles is often seen as caused by external factors—the youth comes
from a single-parent home, is having a hard time right now, just
happened to be at the wrong place at the wrong time, or was bullied at
school. Attributing the cause of the action to external factors lessens
the person’s responsibility and classifies the person as a victim him or
herself. But black and Latinx youth are not afforded this same
compassion.

When black and Latinx youth go before a judge, the cause of the crime is
more often attributed to something internal to the person—the youth is
naturally more prone to crime, is more animalistic, and has less
capacity for remorse (similarly, a 2016 study found that half of a
sample of medical students and residents believe that blacks feel less
pain¹⁸). Whites continually receive the benefit of the doubt not granted
to people of color—our race alone helps establish our innocence.

For those of us who work to raise the racial consciousness of whites,
simply getting whites to acknowledge that our race gives us advantages
is a major effort. The defensiveness, denial, and resistance are deep.
But acknowledging advantage is only a first step, and this
acknowledgment can be used in a way that renders it meaningless and
allows us white people to exempt ourselves from further responsibility.
For example, I have often heard whites dismissively say, “Just because
of the color of my skin, I have privilege.” Statements like this
describe privilege as if it’s a fluke—something that just happens to us
as we move through life, with no involvement or complicity on our part.

Critical race scholar Zeus Leonardo critiques the concept of white
privilege as something white people receive unwittingly. He says that
this concept is analogous to suggesting that a person could walk through
life with other people stuffing money into his or her pockets without
any awareness or consent on the walker’s part. Leonardo challenges this
conceptualization, which positions white privilege as innocence, by
arguing that “for white racial hegemony to saturate everyday life, it
has to be secured by a process of domination, or those acts, decisions,
and policies that white subjects perpetrate on people of color.”¹⁹
Viewing privilege as something that white people are just handed
obscures the systematic dimensions of racism that must be actively and
passively, consciously and unconsciously, maintained.

The expectation that people of color should teach white people about
racism is another aspect of white racial innocence that reinforces
several problematic racial assumptions. First, it implies that racism is
something that happens to people of color and has nothing to do with us
and that we consequently cannot be expected to have any knowledge of it.
This framework denies that racism is a relationship in which both groups
are involved. By leaving it to people of color to tackle racial issues,
we offload the tensions and social dangers of speaking openly onto them.
We can ignore the risks ourselves and remain silent on questions of our
own culpability.

Second, this request requires nothing of us and reinforces unequal power
relations by asking people of color to do our work. There are copious
resources available on the subject generated by people of color who are
willing to share the information; why haven’t we sought it out before
this conversation?

Third, the request ignores the historical dimensions of race relations.
It disregards how often people of color have indeed tried to tell us
what racism is like for them and how often they have been dismissed. To
ask people of color to tell us how they experience racism without first
building a trusting relationship and being willing to meet them halfway
by also being vulnerable shows that we are not racially aware and that
this exchange will probably be invalidating for them.



SEGREGATED LIVES


On a television talk show in 1965, James Baldwin responded passionately
to a Yale professor’s argument that Baldwin always concentrated on
color:

I don’t know if white Christians hate Negros or not, but I know that we
have a Christian church that is white and a Christian church which is
black. I know that the most segregated hour in American life is high
noon on Sunday. . . . I don’t know whether the labor unions and their
bosses really hate me . . . but I know I am not in their unions. I don’t
know if the real estate lobby is against black people but I know that
the real estate lobbyists keep me in the ghetto. I don’t know if the
Board of Education hates Black people, but I know the textbooks they
give my children to read and the schools that we have to go to. Now this
is the evidence. You want me to make an act of faith risking . . . my
life . . . on some idealism which you assure me exists in America which
I have never seen.²⁰

Life in the United States is deeply shaped by racial segregation. Of all
racial groups, whites are the most likely to choose segregation and are
the group most likely to be in the social and economic position to do
so.²¹ Growing up in segregation (our schools, workplaces, neighborhoods,
shopping districts, places of worship, entertainment, social gatherings,
and elsewhere) reinforces the message that our experiences and
perspectives are the only ones that matter. We don’t see people of color
around us, and few if any adults acknowledge a lack of racial diversity
as a problem. In fact, the classification of which neighborhoods are
good and which are bad is always based on race. These assessments may
also be based on economic divisions among whites, but if black and
Latinx students attend a school in significant numbers (significant in
the white mind), whites will perceive the school as bad. If there _are_
people of color around us, we are seldom encouraged to build
cross-racial friendships.

Segregation is often lessened somewhat for poor urban whites who may
live near and have friendships with people of color on the local level
because white poverty brings white people into proximity with people of
color in a way that suburban and middle-class life does not (except
during gentrification, when the mixing is temporary). Urban whites from
the lower classes may have more integrated lives on the micro level, but
we still receive the message that achievement means moving away from the
neighborhoods and schools that illuminate our poverty. Upward mobility
is the great class goal in the United States, and the social environment
gets tangibly whiter the higher up you climb. Whiter environments, in
turn, are seen as the most desirable.

For upwardly mobile whites from the lower classes, reaching toward the
most valuable places in society usually means leaving friends and
neighbors of color behind. For example, I grew up urban and poor and
lived in apartment buildings in crowded rental-based neighborhoods. In
my childhood, there were many people of color around me. But I knew that
if I was to improve my life, I would not stay in these neighborhoods;
upward mobility would take me to whiter spaces, and it has. I did not
maintain those early relationships with people of color, and no one who
guided me encouraged me to do so. Segregation was still operating in my
life at the wider societal level: it dictated what I learned in school,
read in books, saw on TV, and learned to value if I wanted to improve my
life.

Meritocracy is a precious ideology in the United States, but
neighborhoods and schools are demonstrably not equal; they are separate
and unequal. Tax bases, school resources, curricula, textbooks,
opportunities for extracurricular activities, and the quality of the
teaching staff differ widely between school districts. Who is not aware
that schools in the United States are vastly unequal? Without white
people’s interest or effort invested in changing a system that serves
them at the expense of others, advantage is passed down from generation
to generation. Rather than change these conditions so that public
education is equal for all, we allow other people’s children to endure
conditions that would be unacceptable for our own.

A 2009 study published in the _American Journal of Education_ found that
while suburban parents, who are mostly white, say they are selecting
schools on the basis of test scores, the racial makeup of a school
actually plays a larger role in their school decisions. Amy Stuart
Wells, a professor of sociology and education at Columbia University’s
Teachers College, found the same coded language when she studied how
white parents choose schools in New York City. She writes, “In a
postracial era, we don’t have to say it’s about race or the color of the
kids in the building. . . . We can concentrate poverty and kids of color
and then fail to provide the resources to support and sustain those
schools, and then we can see a school full of black kids and say, ‘Oh,
look at their test scores.’ It’s all very tidy now, this whole
system.”²² Readers have no doubt heard schools and neighborhoods
discussed in these terms and know that this talk is racially coded;
“urban” and “low test scores” are code for “not white” and therefore
less desirable.

While many whites see spaces inhabited by more than a few people of
color as undesirable and even dangerous, consider another perspective. I
have heard countless people of color describe how painful an experience
it was to be one of only a few people of color in their schools and
neighborhoods. Although many parents of color want the advantages
granted by attending predominantly white schools, they also worry about
the stress and even the danger they are putting their children in. These
parents understand that the predominantly white teaching force has
little if any authentic knowledge about children of color and has been
socialized (often unconsciously) to see children of color as inferior
and even to fear them. Imagine how unsafe white schools, which are so
precious to white parents, might appear to parents of color.

The most profound message of racial segregation may be that the absence
of people of color from our lives is no real loss. Not one person who
loved me, guided me, or taught me ever conveyed that segregation
deprived me of anything of value. I could live my entire life without a
friend or loved one of color and not see that as a diminishment of my
life. In fact, my life trajectory would almost certainly ensure that I
had few, if any, people of color in my life. I might meet a few people
of color if I played certain sports in school, or if there happened to
be one or two persons of color in my class, but when I was outside of
that context, I had no proximity to people of color, much less any
authentic relationships. Most whites who recall having a friend of color
in childhood rarely keep these friendships into adulthood. Yet if my
parents had thought it was valuable to have cross-racial relationships,
they would have ensured that I had them, even if it took effort—the same
effort so many white parents expend to send their children across town
so they can attend a better (whiter) school.

Pause for a moment and consider the profundity of this message: we are
taught that we lose nothing of value through racial segregation.
Consider the message we send to our children—as well as to children of
color—when we describe white segregation as good.

In summary, our socialization engenders a common set of racial patterns.
These patterns are the foundation of white fragility:

• Preference for racial segregation, and a lack of a sense of loss about
segregation

• Lack of understanding about what racism is

• Seeing ourselves as individuals, exempt from the forces of racial
socialization

• Failure to understand that we bring our group’s history with us, that
history matters

• Assuming everyone is having or can have our experience

• Lack of racial humility, and unwillingness to listen

• Dismissing what we don’t understand

• Lack of authentic interest in the perspectives of people of color

• Wanting to jump over the hard, personal work and get to “solutions”

• Confusing disagreement with not understanding

• Need to maintain white solidarity, to save face, to look good

• Guilt that paralyzes or allows inaction

• Defensiveness about any suggestion that we are connected to racism

• A focus on intentions over impact

My psychosocial development was inculcated in a white supremacist
culture in which I am in the superior group. Telling me to treat
everyone the same is not enough to override this socialization; nor is
it humanly possible. I was raised in a society that taught me that there
was no loss in the absence of people of color—that their absence was a
good and desirable thing to be sought and maintained—while simutaneously
denying that fact. This attitude has shaped every aspect of my
self-identity: my interests and investments, what I care about or don’t
care about, what I see or don’t see, what I am drawn to and what I am
repelled by, what I can take for granted, where I can go, how others
respond to me, and what I can ignore. Most of us would not choose to be
socialized into racism and white supremacy. Unfortunately, we didn’t
have that choice. While there is variation in how these messages are
conveyed and how much we internalize them, nothing could have exempted
us from these messages completely. Now it is our responsibility to
grapple with how this socialization manifests itself in our daily lives
and how it shapes our responses when it is challenged.



CHAPTER 5



THE GOOD/BAD BINARY


_He’s not a racist. He is a really nice guy._

This chapter explores what is perhaps the most effective adaptation of
racism in recent history: the good/bad binary.¹ Prior to the civil
rights movement, it was socially acceptable for white people to openly
proclaim their belief in their racial superiority. But when white
Northerners saw the violence black people—including women and
children—endured during the civil rights protests, they were appalled.
These images became the archetypes of racists. After the civil rights
movement, to be a good, moral person and to be complicit with racism
became mutually exclusive. You could not be a good person and
participate in racism; only bad people were racist. (These images of
black persecution in the South during the civil rights movement of the
1960s also allowed Northern whites to position racists as always
Southern.)

To accomplish this adaptation, racism first needed to be reduced to
simple, isolated, and extreme acts of prejudice. These acts must be
intentional, malicious, and based on conscious dislike of someone
because of race. Racists were those white people in the South, smiling
and picnicking at the base of lynching trees; store owners posting
Whites Only signs over drinking fountains; and good ol’ boys beating
innocent children such as Emmett Till to death. In other words, racists
were mean, ignorant, old, uneducated, Southern whites. Nice people,
well-intended people, open-minded middle-class people, people raised in
the “enlightened North,” could not be racist.

  --------------- -------------------
  RACIST = BAD    NOT RACIST = GOOD
  Ignorant        Progressive
  Bigoted         Educated
  Prejudiced      open-minded
  Mean-spirited   Well-intentioned
  Old             Young
  Southern        Northern
  --------------- -------------------

While making racism bad seems like a positive change, we have to look at
how this functions in practice. Within this paradigm, to suggest that I
am racist is to deliver a deep moral blow—a kind of character
assassination. Having received this blow, I must defend my character,
and that is where all my energy will go—to deflecting the charge, rather
than reflecting on my behavior. In this way, the good/bad binary makes
it nearly impossible to talk to white people about racism, what it is,
how it shapes all of us, and the inevitable ways that we are conditioned
to participate in it. If we cannot discuss these dynamics or see
ourselves within them, we cannot stop participating in racism. The
good/bad binary made it effectively impossible for the average white
person to understand—much less interrupt—racism.

As African American scholar and filmmaker Omowale Akintunde says:
“Racism is a systemic, societal, institutional, omnipresent, and
epistemologically embedded phenomenon that pervades every vestige of our
reality. For most whites, however, racism is like murder: the concept
exists, but someone has to commit it in order for it to happen. This
limited view of such a multilayered syndrome cultivates the sinister
nature of racism and, in fact, perpetuates racist phenomena rather than
eradicates them.”²

The good/bad frame is a false dichotomy. All people hold prejudices,
especially across racial lines in a society deeply divided by race. I
can be told that everyone is equal by my parents, I can have friends of
color, and I may not tell racist jokes. Yet I am still affected by the
forces of racism as a member of a society in which racism is the
bedrock. I will still be seen as white, treated as white, and experience
life as a white person. My identity, personality, interests, and
investments will develop from a white perspective. I will have a white
worldview and a white frame of reference. In a society in which race
clearly matters, our race profoundly shapes us. If we want to challenge
this construct, we must make an honest accounting of how it is manifest
in our own lives and in the society around us.

Although individual racist acts do occur, these acts are part of a
larger system of interlocking dynamics. The focus on individual
incidences masks the personal, interpersonal, cultural, historical, and
structural analysis that is necessary to challenge this larger system.
The simplistic idea that racism is limited to individual intentional
acts committed by unkind people is at the root of virtually all white
defensiveness on this topic. To move beyond defensiveness, we have to
let go of this common belief.

The good/bad binary certainly obscures the structural nature of racism
and makes it difficult for us to see or understand. Equally problematic
is the impact of such a worldview on our actions. If, as a white person,
I conceptualize racism as a binary and I place myself on the “not
racist” side, what further action is required of me? No action is
required, because I am not a racist. Therefore, racism is not my
problem; it doesn’t concern me and there is nothing further I need to
do. This worldview guarantees that I will not build my skills in
thinking critically about racism or use my position to challenge racial
inequality.

The good/bad binary is at play virtually every day in my work as a
consultant on issues of racial justice. My job is to help individuals
and organizations see how racism is manifesting itself in their
practices and outcomes. I am typically received well when speaking in
general terms—for example, “Your requirement that applicants have an
advanced degree rather than equivalent experience is automatically
disqualifying some of the applicants that could bring the perspectives
and experiences you say you are looking for.” Yet when I point out a
concrete moment in the room in which someone’s racism is manifesting
itself, white fragility erupts.

For example, I was working with a group of educators who had been
meeting regularly for at least eight sessions. The group was composed of
the equity teams for a public school system, self-selected by people who
wanted to support equity efforts in their schools. I had just finished
an hour-long presentation titled “Seeing the Water: Whiteness in Daily
Life.” This presentation is designed to make visible the relentless
messages of white superiority and the resulting and inevitable
internalization of these messages for white people. The room appeared to
be with me—open and receptive, with many nodding along in agreement.
Then a white teacher raised her hand and told a story about an
interaction she had as she drove alongside a group of parents protesting
the achievement gap in her school. She then proceeded to imitate one
mother in particular who offended her. “You don’t understand our
children!” this mother had called out to her as she drove by. By the
stereotypical way that the white teacher imitated the mother, we all
knew that the mother was black. The room seemed to collectively hold its
breath at her imitation, which was bordering on racial mockery. While
the teacher’s concluding point was that, on reflection, she came to
realize that the mother was right and that she really didn’t understand
children of color, the emotional thrust of the story was her umbrage at
the mother for making this assumption. For the room, the emotional
impact was on her stereotypical imitation of an angry black woman.

As this story came to a close, I had a decision to make. Should I act
with integrity and point out what was racially problematic about the
story? After all, making racism visible was literally what I had been
hired to do. Further, several African American teachers in the room had
certainly noticed the reinforcement of a racist stereotype. To not
intervene would be, yet again, another white person choosing to protect
white feelings rather than interrupt racism—a white person who billed
herself as a racial justice consultant, no less! Yet I would be taking
the risk of losing the group, given the likelihood that the woman would
become defensive and shut down and the room would split into those who
thought I had mistreated her and those who didn’t. I decided to do what
would retain my moral and professional integrity and serve as a model
for other white people.

As diplomatically as possible, I said, “I understand that you gained
valuable insight from that interaction and I thank you for sharing that
insight with us. And I am going to ask you to consider not telling that
story in that way again.”

When she immediately began to protest, I interrupted her to continue. “I
am offering you a teachable moment,” I said, “and I am only asking that
you to try to listen with openness.” I then laid out what was racially
problematic about how she told the story and offered her a way to share
her learning without reinforcing racist stereotypes, for the same story
could easily be told and the same conclusions drawn without the racially
charged imitation of the mother.

She defensively interrupted me several times but eventually appeared to
be listening. Shortly after this intervention, we took a break. Several
African American teachers came up to thank me, as did one white teacher
who found my intervention a refreshing and much-needed example of how to
break with white solidarity. Several white people also approached to let
me know how upset the teacher was and that she was quitting the group.

Thus is the power of the good/bad binary and how it informs white
fragility. Even a white person on an equity team participating in a
class based on the premise that racism is structured into our society
and that white complicity is an inevitable result could not handle
feedback on how her racism was unintentionally manifesting itself.

If you are white and have ever been challenged to look at your own
racism—perhaps you told a problematic joke or made a prejudiced
assumption and someone brought it to your attention—it is common to feel
defensive. If you believe that you are being told you are a bad person,
all your energy is likely to go toward denying this possibility and
invalidating the messenger rather than trying to understand why what
you’ve said or done is hurtful. You will probably respond with white
fragility. But unfortunately, white fragility can only protect the
problematic behavior you feel so defensive about; it does not
demonstrate that you are an open person who has no problematic racial
behavior.

The dominant paradigm of racism as discrete, individual, intentional,
and malicious acts makes it unlikely that whites will acknowledge any of
our actions as racism. For example, I often read about a government
official, a teacher, or another public servant expressing shockingly
racist statements and still insisting that he or she is not racist.
Readers may recall a West Virginia county employee—Pamela Ramsey
Taylor—who held a high-level position as director of county development
and was suspended after posting racist remarks about First Lady Michelle
Obama on Facebook (“It will be so refreshing to have a classy,
beautiful, dignified First Lady back in the White House. I’m tired of
seeing a [_sic_] Ape in heels”). The mayor of the city responded, “Just
made my day Pam.” Taylor’s response to the ensuing uproar was, “My
comment was not intended to be racist at all. I was referring to my day
being made for change in the White House! I am truly sorry for any hard
feeling this may have caused! Those who know me know that I’m not in any
way racist!” Although Taylor was suspended (but eventually got her job
back), I am left wondering what actually qualifies as racism in the
white mind.

When I talk to white people about racism, I hear the same claims—rooted
in the good/bad binary—made again and again. I organize these claims
into two overall categories, both of which label the person as good and
therefore not racist. The first set claims color blindness: “I don’t see
color [_and/or_ race has no meaning to me]; therefore, I am free of
racism.” The second set claims to value diversity: “I know people of
color [_and/or_ have been near people of color, _and/or_ have general
fond regard for people of color]; therefore, I am free of racism.” Both
categories fundamentally rest on the good/bad binary. Although I
organize these narratives into two overall categories, they can be and
often are used interchangeably. They don’t need to make sense; they just
need to position the speaker as a good person—free of racism—and end the
discussion.

Color-blind statements insist that people do not see race, or if they
see it, it has no meaning to them. Color-blind claims include the
following:

• I was taught to treat everyone the same.

• I don’t see color.

• I don’t care if you are pink, purple, or polka-dotted.

• Race doesn’t have any meaning to me.

• My parents were/weren’t racist, so that is why I am not racist.

• Everyone struggles, but if you work hard . . .

• So-and-so just happens to be black, but that has nothing to do with
what I am about to tell you.

• Focusing on race is what divides us.

• If people are respectful to me, I am respectful to them, regardless of
race.

• Children today are so much more open.

• I’m not racist; I’m from Canada.

• I was picked on because I was white/I grew up poor (so I don’t have
race privilege).

The second set I term _color-celebrate._ This set claims that the person
sees and embraces racial difference. Color-celebrate claims include
statements such as these:

• I work in a very diverse environment.

• I have people of color in my family/married a person of color/have
children of color.

• I was in the military.

• I used to live in New York/Hawaii.

• We don’t like how white our neighborhood is, but we had to move here
for the schools.

• I was in the Peace Corps.

• I marched in the sixties.

• We adopted a child from China.

• Our grandchildren are multiracial.

• I was on a mission in Africa.

• I went to a very diverse school/lived in a very diverse neighborhood.

• I lived in Japan and was a minority, so I know what it is like to be a
minority.

• I lived among the [_fill-in-the-blank_] people, so I am actually a
person of color.

• My great-grandmother was a Native American princess.

In my work to unravel the dynamics of racism, I have found a question
that never fails me. This question is _not_ “Is this claim true, or is
it false?”; we will never come to an agreement on a question that sets
up an either/or dichotomy on something as sensitive as racism. Instead I
ask, “How does this claim function in the conversation?” If we apply
this question to these two sets of narratives, one color-blind and the
other color-celebrate, we see that all of these claims ultimately
function in a similar way; they all exempt the person from any
responsibility for or participation in the problem. They take race off
the table, and they close (rather than open) any further exploration. In
so doing, they protect the racial status quo.

These typical white racial claims depend on an underlying framework of
meaning. Identifying this framework can help us understand how we manage
to make such claims in the context of extreme segregation and racial
inequity.

Imagine a pier stretching out over the water. Viewed from above, the
pier appears to simply float there. The top of the pier—the part that we
can see—signifies the surface aspect of these claims. Yet while the pier
seems to float effortlessly, it is, of course, not floating at all; it
is propped up by a structure submerged under the water. The pier rests
on pillars embedded in the ocean floor. In the same way that a pier sits
on submerged pillars that are not immediately visible, the beliefs
supporting our racial claims are hidden from our view. To topple the
pier, we need to access and uproot the pillars.

The above claims are all meant to provide evidence of the speaker’s lack
of racism. For example, in a conversation about racism, when white
people say that they work in a diverse environment or that they have
people of color in their family, they are giving me their evidence that
they are not racist. If this is their evidence, how are they defining
racism? In other words, what underlying system of meaning leads them to
make that claim? If working near people of color is the evidence that
distinguishes them from a racist, then evidently a racist cannot work
near people of color. This claim rests on a definition of racism as
_conscious intolerance_; a racist is someone who presumably cannot
tolerate even the sight of a person of color. According to this logic,
because they know or work with people of color, or lived in New York,
where they saw people of color all around them, and have spoken with and
smiled at people of color, they cannot participate in racism. When we go
beneath the surface of these claims, we can see their superficiality,
for even an avowed white nationalist who would march openly in the
streets chanting “blood and soil!” can interact with people of color,
and very likely does so. In fact, I have seen black reporters
interviewing open and avowed white supremacists on television, with both
parties proceeding calmly and respectfully.

Someone who claims to have been taught to treat everyone the same is
simply telling me that he or she doesn’t understand socialization. It is
not possible to teach someone to treat everyone the same. We can be
told, and often are told, to treat everyone the same, but we cannot
successfully be taught to do so because human beings are not objective.
Further, we wouldn’t _want_ to treat everyone the same because people
have different needs and different relationships with us. Differential
treatment in itself is not the problem. For example, I wouldn’t give a
document with a twelve-point font to a person with low vision, even
though someone else wouldn’t have any trouble reading it. The problem is
the misinformation that circulates around us and causes our differential
treatment to be inequitable.

The feedback I have heard repeatedly from people of color is that when
they hear a white person claim to have been taught to treat everyone the
same, they are not thinking, “All right! I am now talking to a woke
white person!” Quite the opposite; some version of eye-rolling is taking
place as they sign the white person off as unaware and brace themselves
for yet another exchange based in white denial and invalidation.

As a culture, we don’t claim that gender roles and gender conditioning
disappear the moment we love someone of the “opposite” gender. I
identify as a woman and am married to someone who identifies as a man,
yet I would never say, “Because I am married to a man, I have a
gender-free life.” We understand that gender is a very deep social
construct, that we have different experiences depending on our gender
roles, assignments, and expressions, and that we will wrestle with these
differences throughout the life of our relationship. Yet when the topic
is race, we claim that it is completely inoperative if there is any
level of fond regard. In an even more ludicrous form of reality, we even
go as far as to claim that racial conditioning disappears if we can
calmly walk by people of color on the streets of large cities.

While the implication that a racist could not tolerate knowing, working
next to, or walking among people of color is rather ridiculous, the sad
fact is many whites have no cross-racial friendships at all. Perhaps
this is why we rely on such flimsy evidence to certify ourselves as
racism-free. But even those that have cross-racial friendships and use
these as evidence of their lack of racism still invoke the binary of
racist = bad / not racist = good binary. They see their friendship as
proof that they are on the not-racist side of the binary. Yet
cross-racial friendships do not block out the dynamics of racism in the
society at large, and these dynamics continue unabated. The white person
will still receive white privilege that a friend of color does not, even
when the two people engage in activities together. Nor do these
friendships block out all the messages that we have internalized and
that are reinforced in this society. In fact, racism invariably
manifests itself within cross-racial friendships as well. Racism cannot
be absent from your friendship. No person of color whom I’ve met has
said that racism isn’t at play in his or her friendships with white
people. Some whites are more thoughtful, aware, and receptive to
feedback than others, but no cross-racial relationship is free from the
dynamics of racism in this society.

Many whites believe that if they are not talking about racism with their
friends of color or if their friends are not giving them feedback about
racism, then racism is a non-issue. But just because you and your friend
don’t talk about racism does not mean it isn’t at play. Indeed, this
silence is one of the ways that racism is manifest, for it is an imposed
silence. Many people of color have told me that they initially tried to
talk about racism with their white friends, but their friends got
defensive or invalidated their experiences, so they stopped sharing
their experiences. If racism is not a topic of discussion between a
white person and a person of color who are friends, this absence of
conversation may indicate a lack of cross-racial trust.

The good/bad binary is powerful and enduring. In what follows, I offer
counternarratives to a few of its most popular claims. Notice how each
of these claims labels the person making them as not racist, thereby
exempting them from further involvement or responsibility.

“I WAS TAUGHT TO TREAT EVERYONE THE SAME.”

As explained above, no one can be taught to treat people equitably,
because humans cannot be 100 percent objective. For example, I could
lecture you for hours that it is not nice to judge, that no one likes to
be judged—“You wouldn’t want to be judged, would you?”—and so on. At the
end of that lecture, you would still continue to judge, because it is
impossible not to. We can try to examine our judgments, hold them more
lightly, and so forth, but to be free of judgment? Not possible. Nor can
we treat everyone the same. Indeed, the person professing to treat
everyone the same is stating a value that he or she holds, but the claim
closes off any further reflection. Once we understand the power of
implicit bias, for example, we know that we must deepen rather than
close off further reflection. Although deepr reflection won’t free us of
unconscious inequitable treatment of others, it will get us closer than
will outright denial.

“I MARCHED IN THE SIXTIES.”

Someone who tells me that they marched in the 1960s—like the person who
tells me they know people of color—is telling me that they see racism as
a simple matter of racial intolerance (which clearly they don’t have or
they could not have tolerated marching alongside black people during the
civil rights movement). They are also telling me that they believe that
racism is uncomplicated and unchanging. Yet in the 1960s, we thought
race was biological. We used terms like _Oriental_ and _colored._
Nevertheless, in the light of an action they took more than fifty years
ago, they see their racial learning as finished for life. Their action
certifies them as free of racism, and there is no more discussion or
reflection required. It also assumes that absolutely no racism—even
unconsciously—was perpetrated toward blacks by well-meaning whites
during the civil rights movement. Yet the testimony of black civil
rights activists tells us otherwise. How many white people who marched
in the 1960s had authentic cross-racial relationships with African
Americans?

Certainly there was (and still is) racial segregation throughout the
North, too, perhaps not as explicitly enforced but surely enforced
implicitly in countless ways. Perhaps many of those white Northerners
who came down South to save black people had some patronizing or
condescending attitudes? Might many have dominated discussions, not
listened to others, and assumed to know what was best? Did they say many
racially problematic things that Southern blacks were forced to endure?
Had I been old enough, I probably would have marched in the 1960s, and
yet as far as into the 1990s, I was saying and doing racially
problematic things. Although I do them less often and less blatantly
today, I still do them. Again, the claim that someone is not racist
because the person marched in the 1960s rests on the simplistic
definition of racism as a conscious intolerance of black people.

“I WAS THE MINORITY AT MY SCHOOL, SO I WAS THE ONE WHO EXPERIENCED
RACISM.”

While everyone of every race holds prejudice and can discriminate
against someone of another race, in the US and other white/settler
nations, only white people are in the position to oppress people of
color collectively and throughout the whole of society. This claim
defines racism as a fluid dynamic that changes direction according to
each group’s ratio in a given space. While a white person may have been
picked on—even mercilessly—by being in the numerical minority in a
specific context, the individual was experiencing race prejudice and
discrimination, _not racism._ This distinction is not meant to minimize
the white person’s experience, but aims to clarify and to prevent
rendering the terms interchangeable and thus meaningless.

Moreover, the society at large is still reinforcing white supremacy, and
everyone in the school was affected by it. It is likely that white
students at such a school were treated better by teachers and that
higher expectations were held for them. Their textbooks, the curriculum,
and the administration still reinforced a preference for whiteness.
Outside the school (and in many aspects within it), these students were
still granted white privilege as they moved through society.

For most whites, being the minority in their school or neighborhood is
usually temporary. They are probably no longer the minority in their
environment as upward mobility generally entails moving away from
integrated spaces or those in which people of color are the majority.

“MY PARENTS WERE NOT RACIST, AND THEY TAUGHT ME NOT TO BE RACIST.”

Whether you define racism as racial prejudices and individual acts or as
a system of racial inequality that benefits whites at the expense of
people of color (as antiracists do), your parents could not have taught
you not to be racist, and your parents could not have been free of
racism themselves. A racism-free upbringing is not possible, because
racism is a social system embedded in the culture and its institutions.
We are born into this system and have no say in whether we will be
affected by it. I understand that many parents tell their children to
not be racist, but the practice of our lives is more powerful than the
words we say, and living a segregated life is a powerful message of
practice. Of course, there are degrees, and it is certainly more
constructive to be told that racism is wrong rather than right, but that
is still not enough to completely inoculate us from the culture at
large.

Let’s imagine that what the person really meant was this: “My parents
were not racially prejudiced, and they taught me not to be racially
prejudiced.” This statement would still be false because it is not
humanly possible to be free of prejudice. This statement simply
indicates that the person is uneducated about the socialization process
and the inescapable dynamics of human culture. A person’s parents might
have said that they were not prejudiced and thus denied their prejudice.
They may have told their children that they should not be prejudiced,
the result being that, like their parents, the children deny their
prejudice. The parents may have sincerely hoped and believed that they
were raising their children to not be prejudiced. But we can’t teach
humans to have no prejudice at all. The human brain just does not work
that way as we process information about others. Most of us only teach
our children not to admit to prejudice. A parent training a child not to
say certain things that are overtly racist is teaching the child
self-censorship rather than how to examine the deeply embedded racial
messages we all absorb. Ideally, we would teach our children how to
recognize and challenge prejudice, rather than deny it.

“CHILDREN TODAY ARE SO MUCH MORE OPEN.”

As for the claim that children are so much more open, research over the
past two decades indicates that children are vastly more sophisticated
in their awareness of racial hierarchies than most people believe.³ Even
when race is not explicitly discussed, children internalize both
implicit and explicit messages about it from their environment.

For example, psychology researchers Maria Monteiro, Dalila de França,
and Ricardo Rodrigues tested 283 white children aged six to seven, and
nine to ten years old. The children were asked to allocate money to
white and black children, sometimes with a white adult in the room and
sometimes with no adult in the room, to see if having an adult present
influenced their behavior. The researchers found that the younger group
discriminated against black children in both conditions, while the older
group discriminated against the black children only when no adult was
present. This finding is significant because it shows that the older
children clearly had racial prejudice and acted on it, but hid it when a
white adult was present. Thus, the children showed that they did not
become less racially biased with age, but that they had learned to hide
their racism in front of adults.⁴ Monteiro and her colleagues found
racial hostility in white children as young as three years old. However,
most white parents and teachers believe that children are color-blind.⁵
This false belief keeps us from honestly addressing racism with children
and exploring with them how racism has shaped the inequities that they
already observe.

“RACE HAS NOTHING TO DO WITH IT.”

How often have we heard someone preface a story about race with the
statement, “Race had nothing to do with this, but . . . ” or “She just
happened to be black, and . . . ”? Let’s look closer at why the person
feels that it is necessary to make this opening point, as it usually
illustrates just the opposite. The racist = bad / not racist = good
binary is reflected in these statements because according to the binary,
if race had anything to do with it, then the person telling the story
would be racially implicated and thus no longer positioned as
color-blind or outside race. Further, if the story is about a conflict
between the storyteller and a person of color, then the storyteller
might sound racist, and that would mean that the speaker is a bad
person. If, however, the speaker understands racism as an institutional
system into which we are all socialized, then he or she wouldn’t make
this disclaimer because the person understands that the conflict cannot
be free of racial dimensions.

We bring our racial histories with us, and contrary to the ideology of
individualism, we represent our groups and those who have come before
us. Our identities are not unique or inherent but constructed or
produced through social processes. What’s more, we don’t see through
clear or objective eyes—we see through racial lenses. On some level,
race is always at play, even in its supposed absence.

“FOCUSING ON RACE IS WHAT DIVIDES US.”

The idea that talking about racism is itself racist has always struck me
as odd. It is rooted in the concept that race doesn’t matter; thus, to
talk about it gives it undeserved weight. Many things that we talk about
every day don’t really matter. Precisely because these topics of
conversation don’t matter, they are easy to talk about. We know race
matters a great deal, but for many of the reasons already discussed, we
feel the need to deny its importance. Ironically, this denial is a
fundamental way in which white people maintain unequal racial power.

I have heard this response many times in the context of cross-racial
discussions, most often at the point in which white racial power is
named. Many whites see the naming of white racial power as divisive. For
them, the problem is not the power inequity itself; the problem is
_naming_ the power inequity. This naming breaks the pretense of unity
and exposes the reality of racial division.

Even though participants of color repeatedly state that whites’ refusal
to acknowledge racial difference and power dynamics actually maintains
racial inequity, white participants continue to insist that not talking
about difference is necessary for unity. Although the participants are
purportedly engaged in these discussions to explore differences in
racial perspectives and experiences, as soon as these differences
appear, many whites react as if there has been a violation. Of course,
white norms _are_ violated by naming white power. But unequal power
relations cannot be challenged if they are not acknowledged.

Refusing to engage in an authentic exploration of racial realities
erases (and denies) alternate racial experiences. If we block out other
realities by not discussing them, we can pretend that they don’t exist,
thereby assuming a shared racial experience. Not talking about race
allows us to maintain our sense of ourselves as unique individuals,
outside collective socialization and group experience. While it isn’t
comfortable for most whites to talk about racism, we must do so if we
want to challenge—rather than protect—racism. To avoid talking about
racism can only hold our misinformation in place and prevent us from
developing the necessary skills and perspectives to challenge the status
quo.



IN CONCLUSION


Most of us alive before and during the 1960s have had images from the
civil rights conflicts of that time held up as the epitome of racism.
Today we have images of white nationalists marching in Charlottesville,
Virginia, to hold up. And while speaking up against these explicitly
racist actions is critical, we must also be careful not to use them to
keep ourselves on the “good” side of a false binary. I have found it
much more useful to think of myself as on a continuum. Racism is so
deeply woven into the fabric of our society that I do not see myself
escaping from that continuum in my lifetime. But I can continually seek
to move further along it. I am not in a fixed position on the continuum;
my position is dictated by what I am actually doing at a given time.
Conceptualizing myself on an active continuum changes the question from
whether I am or am not racist to a much more constructive question: Am I
actively seeking to interrupt racism in this context? And perhaps even
more importantly, how do I know?



CHAPTER 6



ANTI-BLACKNESS


_But all our phrasing—race relations, racial chasm, racial justice,
racial profiling, white privilege, even white supremacy—serves to
obscure that racism is a visceral experience, that it dislodges brains,
blocks airways, rips muscle, extracts organs, cracks bones, breaks
teeth. . . . You must always remember that the sociology, the history,
the economics, the graphs, the charts, the regressions all land, with
great violence, upon the body._

—Ta-Nehisi Coates, _Between the World and Me_

Racism is complex and nuanced, and its manifestations are not the same
for every group of color. To challenge the ideologies of racism such as
individualism and color blindness, we as white people must suspend our
perception of ourselves as unique and/or outside race. Exploring our
collective racial identity interrupts a key privilege of dominance—the
ability to see oneself only as an individual. We need to discuss white
people as a group—even if doing so jars us—in order to disrupt our
unracialized identities.

For people of color, the privilege of being seen (and seeing themselves)
as unique individuals outside the context of race cannot be taken for
granted. Talking about race and racism in general terms such as _white
people_ is constructive for whites because it interrupts individualism.
But racial generalization also reinforces something problematic for
people of color—the continual focus on their group identity.
Furthermore, it collapses many racial groups into one generic category,
thereby denying the specific ways that different groups experience
racism. While people of color share some experiences of racism overall,
there are also variations based on a specific group’s history. These
variations include how group members have adapted to the dominant
culture, how they have been represented, how they have been positioned
in relation to other groups of color, and the “role” the group has been
assigned by dominant society. The messages I have internalized about
people of Asian heritage, for example, are not the same as those I have
internalized for Indigenous people, and a key aspect of challenging
these messages is to identify their differences and how they shape my
attitudes toward various groups of color. Further, there are myriad
groups within these categories, and I have different attitudes here too.
For example, my stereotypes about Japanese people are not the same as my
stereotypes about Chinese people, and these stereotypes inform different
responses.

In this chapter, I will address the uniquely anti-black sentiment
integral to white identity. In doing so, I do not wish to minimize the
racism that other groups of color experience. However, I believe that in
the white mind, black people are the ultimate racial “other,” and we
must grapple with this relationship, for it is a foundational aspect of
the racial socialization underlying white fragility.

I remind my readers that I am addressing white people at the societal
level. I have friends who are black and whom I love deeply. I do not
have to suppress feelings of hatred and contempt as I sit with them; I
see their humanity. But on the macro level, I also recognize the deep
anti-black feelings that have been inculcated in me since childhood.
These feelings surface immediately—in fact, before I can even think—when
I conceptualize black people in general. The sentiments arise when I
pass black strangers on the street, see stereotypical depictions of
black people in the media, and hear the thinly veiled warnings and jokes
passed between white people. These are the deeper feelings that I need
to be willing to examine, for these feelings can and do seep out without
my awareness and hurt those whom I love.

As discussed in previous chapters, we live in a culture that circulates
relentless messages of white superiority. These messages exist
simultaneously with relentless messages of black inferiority. But
anti-blackness goes deeper than the negative stereotypes all of us have
absorbed; anti-blackness is foundational to our very identities as white
people. Whiteness has always been predicated on blackness. As discussed
in chapter 2, there was no concept of race or a white race before the
need to justify the enslavement of Africans. Creating a separate and
inferior black race simultaneously created the “superior” white race:
one concept could not exist without the other. In this sense, whites
need black people; blackness is essential to the creation of white
identity.

Scholars have argued that whites split off from themselves and project
onto black people the aspects that we don’t want to own in ourselves.¹
For example, the white masters of enslaved Africans consistently
depicted the Africans as lazy and childlike, even as they toiled at
backbreaking work from sunup to sundown. Today, we depict blacks as
dangerous, a portrayal that perverts the true direction of violence
between whites and blacks since the founding of this country. This
characterization causes aversion and hostility toward black people and
feelings of superiority toward ourselves, but we cannot morally
acknowledge any of these feelings. To reiterate, I am speaking here of
the collective white consciousness. An individual white person may not
be explicitly aware of these feelings, but I am often amazed at how
quickly they surface with even the slightest challenge.

Consider the enduring white resentment about the perceived injustices of
affirmative action programs. There is empirical evidence that people of
color (especially black people) have been discriminated against in
hiring since the ending of enslavement and into the present.² In the
late 1960s, a program was instituted to help ameliorate this
discrimination: affirmative action.

There is a great amount of misinformation about affirmative action, as
evidenced in the idea of special rights. For example, people commonly
believe that if a person of color applies for a position, he or she must
be hired over a white person; that black people are given preferential
treatment in hiring; and that a specific number of people of color must
be hired to fill a quota.

All these beliefs are patently untrue. Affirmative action is a tool to
ensure that _qualified_ minority applicants are given the same
employment opportunities as white people. It is a flexible program—there
are no quotas or requirements as commonly understood. Moreover, _white
women_ have been the greatest beneficiaries of affirmative action,
although the program did not initially include them. Corporations are
more likely to favor white women and immigrants of color of elite
backgrounds from outside the United States when choosing their
executives.³ No employer is required to hire an unqualified person of
color, but companies are required to be able to articulate why they
didn’t hire a qualified person of color (and this requirement is rarely
enforced). Additionally, affirmative action never applied to private
companies—only to state and governmental agencies.

Still, this program has been systematically chipped away at, and several
states have eliminated affirmative action programs altogether. In turn,
African Americans continue to be the most underrepresented group at the
organizational leadership level. In 2018, affirmative action has all but
been dismantled. Yet invariably, I will encounter a white male—bristling
with umbrage—who raises the issue of affirmative action. It seems that
we white people just cannot let go of our outrage over how unfair this
toothless attempt to rectify centuries of injustice has been to _us._
And this umbrage consistently surfaces in overwhelmingly white
leadership groups that have asked me to come in and help them recruit
and retain more people of color.

Copious research attests to the disdain of whites for African Americans,
from the school-to-prison pipeline, to mass incarceration, to white
flight.⁴ For example, on attitude surveys, most whites say they would
prefer neighborhoods that are no more than 30 percent black, and more
than half of whites say they would not move into a neighborhood that is
30 percent black or more. Studies of actual mobility patterns not only
confirm these preferences, but also show that whites downplay them.
White flight has been triggered when a formerly white neighborhood
reaches 7 percent black, and in neighborhoods with more than a few black
families, white housing demand tends to disappear.⁵ (That is, the demand
disappears unless white people need that housing because of unaffordable
home prices in other neighborhoods. In that case, black people are
pushed out as gentrification increases. Brooklyn, Harlem, Oakland, and
Seattle are prime examples.)

A 2015 study by the American Sociological Foundation found that the
highest level of segregation is between blacks and whites, the lowest is
between Asians and whites, and the level between Latinx and whites
occupies an intermediate position. A majority of whites, in both the
expression of their beliefs and the practice of their lives, do not want
to integrate with blacks.

We see anti-black sentiment in how quickly images of brutality toward
black children (let alone black adults) are justified by the white
assumption that it must have been deserved. Such beliefs would be
unimaginable if we had been shown images of white teens being thrown
across schoolrooms, of white kindergarteners handcuffed, of a white
child shot while playing with a toy gun in the park. We see anti-black
sentiment in the immediate rejoinder to Black Lives Matter that _all_
lives matter, that _blue_ lives matter. And in the absurdly false
comparison between the white nationalist and “alt-right” movement (now
directly connected to the White House) with the Black Panther Party of
the 1960s. We see anti-blackness in how much more harshly we criticize
blacks, by every measure. We see it in the president of the United
States positioning the avowed white supremacist neo-Nazis marching
openly in the streets—including one man who drove a car into a crowd of
protesters—as equal in character to the people protesting them. As
Coates notes in “The Case for Reparations”:

The early American economy was built on slave labor. The Capitol and the
White House were built by slaves. President James K. Polk traded slaves
from the Oval Office. The laments about “black pathology,” the criticism
of black family structures by pundits and intellectuals, ring hollow in
a country whose existence was predicated on the torture of black
fathers, on the rape of black mothers, on the sale of black children. An
honest assessment of America’s relationship to the black family reveals
the country to be not its nurturer but its destroyer. And this
destruction did not end with slavery.⁶

Anti-blackness is rooted in misinformation, fables, perversions,
projections, and lies. It is also rooted in a lack of historical
knowledge and an inability or unwillingness to trace the effects of
history into the present. But perhaps most fundamentally, anti-blackness
comes from deep guilt about what we have done and continue to do; the
unbearable knowledge of our complicity with the profound torture of
black people from past to present. While the full trauma of this torture
in its various forms—both physically and psychologically—is only borne
by African Americans, there is a kind of moral trauma in it for the
white collective. In his revolutionary book, _My Grandmother’s Hands,_
social worker and therapist Resmaa Menakem refers to white supremacy as
_white body supremacy_ to argue that white supremacy is a form of trauma
that is stored in our collective bodies: “Many African Americans know
trauma intimately—from their own nervous systems, from the experiences
of people they love, and, most often, from both. But African Americans
are not alone in this. A different but equally real form of racialized
trauma lives in the bodies of most white Americans.”⁷ Our projections
allow us to bury this trauma by dehumanizing and then blaming the
victim. If blacks are not human in the same ways that we white people
are human, our mistreatment of them doesn’t count. We are not guilty;
they are. If they are bad, it isn’t unfair. In fact, it is _righteous._

There is a curious satisfaction in the punishment of black people: the
smiling faces of the white crowd picnicking at lynchings in the past,
and the satisfied approval of white people observing mass incarceration
and execution in the present. White righteousness, when inflicting pain
on African Americans, is evident in the glee the white collective
derives from blackface and depictions of blacks as apes and gorillas. We
see it in the compassion toward white people who are addicted to opiates
and the call to provide them with services versus the mandatory
sentencing perpetrated against those addicted to crack. We see it in the
concern about the “forgotten” white working class so critical to the
outcome of the last presidential election, with no concern for blacks,
who remain on the bottom of virtually every social and economic measure.
As Coates points out, “toiling blacks are in their proper state; toiling
whites raise the specter of white slavery.”⁸

Coates refers to white people as “Dreamers” in “the Dream,” falsely
believing that they are actually white. I take this to mean that whites
can only be white if someone is not white—if someone is the opposite of
white. White is a false identity, an identity of false superiority. In
that sense, whiteness isn’t real. The dream is the “perfect world,”
unpolluted by blacks. If whites are to construct this world, blacks must
be separated through state violence. Yet they still must exist, for the
existence of blacks provides the needed other against which whites may
rise. Thus, white identity depends in particular on the projection of
inferiority onto blacks and the oppression this inferior status
justifies for the white collective.

To put it bluntly, I believe that the white collective fundamentally
hates blackness for what it reminds us of: that we are capable and
guilty of perpetrating immeasurable harm and that our gains come through
the subjugation of others. We have a particular hatred for “uppity”
blacks, those who dare to step out of their place and look us in the eye
as equals.⁹ The messages that circulate relentlessly across the
generations reinforce the white belief that blacks are inherently
undeserving (a frankly outrageous belief, given the state-sanctioned
robbery of their labor). We heard this message in the narrative of
“welfare cheats” and “welfare queens” in the Reagan era. We see it today
when commentators slam National Football League (NFL) players who kneel
during the national anthem and exercise their right to protest police
brutality as “ungrateful” and when former congressman Joe Walsh declares
that Stevie Wonder is “another ungrateful black multimillionaire.” We
see it when Robert Jeffress, Dallas evangelical pastor and adviser to
the president of the United States, claims that NFL players who protest
police brutality against African Americans should thank God they don’t
have to worry about being shot in the head “like they would be in North
Korea.” We see it in the outrage of the crowd of white progressives who
showed up to hear Bernie Sanders speak in Seattle and were asked by
black activists to grant four and a half minutes of silence to honor
Michael Brown, an unarmed black man shot by police in Ferguson,
Missouri: “How dare you!” the crowd cried.

Carol Anderson, in her book _White Rage,_ argues that “the trigger for
white rage, inevitably, is black advancement. It is not the mere
presence of black people that is the problem; rather, it is blackness
with ambition, with drive, with purpose, with aspirations, and with
demands for full and equal citizenship. It is blackness that refuses to
accept subjugation, to give up.” She continues: “The truth is that,
despite all this, a black man was elected president of the United
States: the ultimate advancement, and thus the ultimate affront. Perhaps
not surprisingly, voting rights were severely curtailed, the federal
government was shut down, and more than once the Office of the President
was shockingly, openly, and publicly disrespected by other elected
officials.”¹⁰

Anti-blackness is a complex and confusing stew of resentment and
benevolence, for we also use blacks to feel warmhearted and noble. We
are drawn to those who cast their eyes downward in our presence, the
ones we can “save” from the horrors of their black lives with our
abundance and kindness. Consider an example I often use in my
presentations: _The Blind Side,_ a hugely popular movie for which Sandra
Bullock received an Academy Award. This film is a cogent example of
whites as the racially benevolent side of the coin. The film is based on
the “true” story of a family—the Tuohys—who rescued Michael Oher, a
black man who came from impoverished family circumstances and who went
on to become an NFL player. Although the movie was popular with white
audiences, many problematic racial narratives are reinscribed in the
film. In fact, there are no black characters who do _not_ reinforce
negative racial stereotypes. Oher himself is portrayed as a childlike
gentle giant who lives in abject poverty. Sprinkled in are his
drug-addicted single mother with multiple children from unknown fathers,
the incompetent welfare worker, the uppity lawyer, and the menacing gang
members in his drug-infested and crime-ridden neighborhood.

In one pivotal scene, Oher returns to his former neighborhood. As he
walks down the street, he is surrounded by a gang that tries to
intimidate him. While he considers his limited options, Mrs. Tuohy
arrives and confronts the gang members, who quickly back down and
retreat. Rescued by Mrs. Tuohy, Oher is returned back to safe white
suburbia. The scene makes it clear: the only way Oher could be saved
from the terrors of his own black community is through the benevolence
and bravery of a white family.

In the film, white professionals discuss Oher as if he were
developmentally disabled (he certainly comes off as such—he is passive
and inarticulate throughout the movie). His teachers note that on his IQ
test, he scored in the bottom percentile in “ability to learn” but in
the top percentile in “protective instinct”! As a professor of education
who has never heard of a test measuring “protective instinct,” I have
been unable to find evidence of this bizarre measurement. It is highly
problematic that Oher, as a black male, is portrayed as severely lacking
in intellectual abilities but exceptional in something instinctual. His
limited intellectual capacity is reinforced throughout the film, for
example, when the youngest child of the Tuohy household has to teach
Oher how to play football.

According to the film, Oher is never able to understand the rules of the
game, so Mrs. Tuohy appeals to his “protective instinct” by telling him
to pretend one of his new white family members is going to be hurt. Once
his instincts are engaged (rather than his intellect), he is unstoppable
on the field. In a particularly insulting scene, the white child who
tried unsuccessfully to teach Oher how to play football sits at a table
negotiating a contract for him with powerful adult men while Oher sits
in the background, mute.

This film, told from the white perspective and enthusiastically received
by audiences, reinforces some very important dominant ideologies:

• White people are the saviors of black people.

• Some black children may be innocent, but black adults are morally and
criminally corrupt.

• Whites who are willing to save or otherwise help black people, at
seemingly great personal cost, are noble, courageous, and morally
superior to other whites.

• Individual black people can overcome their circumstances, but usually
only with the help of white people.

• Black neighborhoods are inherently dangerous and criminal.

• Virtually all blacks are poor, incompetent, and unqualified for their
jobs; they belong to gangs, are addicted to drugs, and are bad parents.

• The most dependable route for black males to escape the “inner city”
is through sports.

• White people are willing to deal with individual “deserving” black
people, but whites do not become a part of the black community in any
meaningful way (beyond charity work).¹¹

Of course, Oher also brings redemption to the whites who save him. The
film ends with a voice-over from Mrs. Tuohy, a Christian, claiming it
was God’s will that this boy be saved (presumably because his talent on
the field made him more profitable and thus valuable to white people).
The Tuohys, of course, are the good whites, who have to deal with the
prejudice of the individual bad whites they encounter at the country
club and other places. In this way, the racist = bad / not racist = good
binary is also reinforced. The film is fundamentally and insidiously
anti-black.

White racial socialization engenders many conflicting feelings toward
African Americans: benevolence, resentment, superiority, hatred, and
guilt roil barely below the surface and erupt at the slightest breach,
yet can never be explicitly acknowledged. Our need to deny the
bewildering manifestations of anti-blackness that reside so close to the
surface makes us irrational, and that irrationality is at the heart of
white fragility and the pain it causes people of color.



CHAPTER 7



RACIAL TRIGGERS FOR WHITE PEOPLE


_In a cross-racial dialogue at an organization that is trying to
increase its staff’s racial understanding, the participants of color
repeatedly challenge the problematic assumptions in a white woman’s
statements. “I feel like everything I say is thrown back at me!” she
exclaims. “White people are being attacked and blamed, and we have to
defend ourselves or just be used as punching bags. I give up! I am not
saying anything else.”_

_The only black woman on a workplace planning team listens attentively
to her white colleagues for the first hour of a meeting and then asks a
question about their proposal. After the meeting, her supervisor calls
her into her office and informs her that the other women felt attacked
by her._

The factors discussed in the previous chapters insulate white people
from race-based stress. Although white racial insulation is somewhat
mediated by social class (with poor and working-class urban whites being
generally less racially insulated than suburban or rural whites), the
larger social environment protects whites as a group through
institutions, cultural representations, media, school textbooks, movies,
advertising, dominant discourses, and the like. Whiteness studies
scholar Michelle Fine describes this insulation: “Whiteness accrues
privilege and status; gets itself surrounded by protective pillows of
resources and/or benefits of the doubt; how Whiteness repels gossip and
voyeurism and instead demands dignity.”¹ White people seldom find
themselves without this protection. Or if they do, it is because they
have chosen to temporarily step outside this area of safety. But within
their insulated environment of racial privilege, whites both expect
racial comfort and become less tolerant of racial stress.

When ideologies such as color blindness, meritocracy, and individualism
are challenged, intense emotional reactions are common. I have discussed
several reasons why whites are so defensive about the suggestion that we
benefit from, and are complicit in, a racist system:

• Social taboos against talking openly about race

• The racist = bad / not racist = good binary

• Fear and resentment toward people of color

• Our delusion that we are objective individuals

• Our guilty knowledge that there is more going on than we can or will
admit to

• Deep investment in a system that benefits us and that we have been
conditioned to see as fair

• Internalized superiority and sense of a right to rule

• A deep cultural legacy of anti-black sentiment

Most white people have limited information about what racism is and how
it works. For many white people, an isolated course taken in college or
required “cultural competency training” in their workplace is the only
time they may encounter a direct and sustained challenge to their racial
reality. But even in this arena, not all multicultural courses or
training programs talk directly about racism, much less address white
privilege. It is far more the norm for these courses and programs to use
racially coded language such as “urban,” “inner city,” and
“disadvantaged,” but rarely use “white” or “over-advantaged” or
“privileged.”

This racially coded language reproduces racist images and perspectives
while simultaneously reproducing the comfortable illusion that race and
its problems are what “they” have, not us. Reasons that the facilitators
of these courses and trainings may not directly name the dynamics and
beneficiaries of racism range from the lack of a valid analysis of
racism by white facilitators, personal and economic survival strategies
for facilitators of color, and pressure from management to keep the
content comfortable and palatable for whites.

However, if and when an educational program does directly address racism
and the privileging of whites, common white responses include anger,
withdrawal, emotional incapacitation, guilt, argumentation, and
cognitive dissonance (all of which reinforce the pressure on
facilitators to avoid directly addressing racism). So-called progressive
whites may not respond with anger but still insulate themselves via
claims that they are beyond the need for engaging with the content
because they “already had a class on this” or “already know this.” All
these responses constitute white fragility—the result of the reduced
psychosocial stamina that racial insulation inculcates.

I was a full adult, a parent, and a college graduate before I ever
experienced a challenge to my racial identity or position, and that
experience was only because I had taken a position as a diversity
trainer. When you combine this rarity with my lifetime of racial
centrality, internalized superiority, sense of myself as a unique
individual, and expectation for racial comfort that our culture
engenders, I simply never had been called upon to build my capacity to
endure racial stress.

Anthropologist Pierre Bourdieu’s concept of _habitus_ is very useful for
understanding white fragility—the predictability of the white response
to having our racial positions challenged.² According to Bourdieu,
habitus is the result of socialization, the repetitive practices of
actors and their interactions with each other and with the rest of their
social environment. Because it is repetitive, our socialization produces
and reproduces thoughts, perceptions, expressions, and actions. Thus,
habitus can be thought of as a person’s familiar ways of perceiving,
interpreting, and responding to the social cues around him or her.

There are three key aspects of Bourdieu’s theory that are relevant to
white fragility: field, habitus, and capital. _Field_ is the specific
social context the person is in—a party, the workplace, or a school. If
we take a school as an example, there is the macro field of school as a
whole, and within the school are micro fields—the teacher’s lounge, the
staff room, the classroom, the playground, the principal’s office, the
nurses’ office, the janitor’s supply room, and so on.

_Capital_ is the social value people hold in a particular field; how
they perceive themselves and are perceived by others in terms of their
power or status. For example, compare the capital of a teacher and a
student, a teacher and a principal, a middle-class student and a student
on free or reduced lunch, an English language learner and a native
English speaker, a popular girl and an unpopular one, a custodian and a
receptionist, a kindergarten teacher and a sixth-grade teacher, and so
on.

Capital can shift with the field, for example, when the custodian comes
“upstairs” to speak to the receptionist—the custodian in work clothes
and the receptionist in business attire—the office worker has more
capital than does the maintenance person. But when the receptionist goes
“down” to the supply room, which the custodian controls, to request more
whiteboard markers, those power lines shift; this is the domain of the
custodian, who can fulfill the request quickly or can make the
transaction difficult. Notice how race, class, and gender will also be
at play in negotiations of power. The custodian is most likely to be
male, and the receptionist female; the custodian more likely a person of
color and the receptionist more likely white. These complex and
intersecting layers of capital are being negotiated automatically.

Habitus includes a person’s internalized awareness of his or her status,
as well as responses to the status of others. In every field, people are
(often unconsciously) vying for power, and each field will have rules of
the game.³ Habitus will depend on the power position the person occupies
in the social structure. Returning to the school example, there will be
different rules to gain power at the reception desk versus the
custodian’s supply room. These rules do not have to be thought about
consciously—I automatically shift into them as I enter each field. If I
don’t follow these rules, I will be pushed out of that field through
various means. Some of these rules are explicitly taught to us, while
others are unwritten and learned by picking up consistent social
patterns. For example, the rules spell out what we do or don’t talk
about in a given field and how to respond when someone talks about
something considered taboo in that field.

When there is disequilibrium in the habitus—when social cues are
unfamiliar and/or when they challenge our capital—we use strategies to
regain our balance. Habitus maintains our social comfort and helps us
regain it when those around us do not act in familiar and acceptable
ways. We don’t respond consciously to disequilibrium in the habitus; we
respond unconsciously. Bourdieu explains that “habitus is neither a
result of free will, nor determined by structures, but created by a kind
of interplay between the two over time: dispositions that are both
shaped by past events and structures, and that shape current practices
and structures and also, importantly, that condition our very
perceptions of these.”⁴ In this sense, habitus is created and reproduced
“without any deliberate pursuit of coherence . . . without any conscious
concentration.”⁵ In the rare situation in which the white position is
challenged, disequilibrium results.

Thus, white fragility is a state in which even a minimum amount of
racial stress in the habitus becomes intolerable, triggering a range of
defensive moves. These moves include the outward display of emotions
such as anger, fear, and guilt and behaviors such as argumentation,
silence, and leaving the stress-inducing situation. These behaviors, in
turn, reinstate white racial equilibrium. Racial stress results from an
interruption to the racially familiar. These interruptions can take a
variety of forms and come from a range of sources, including

• Suggesting that a white person’s viewpoint comes from a racialized
frame of reference (challenge to objectivity)

• People of color talking directly about their own racial perspectives
(challenge to white taboos on talking openly about race)

• People of color choosing not to protect white people’s feelings about
race (challenge to white racial expectations and the need for, or
entitlement to, racial comfort)

• People of color being unwilling to tell their stories or answer
questions about their racial experiences (challenge to the expectation
that people of color will serve us)

• A fellow white disagreeing with our racial beliefs (challenge to white
solidarity)

• Receiving feedback that our behavior had a racist impact (challenge to
white racial innocence)

• Suggesting that group membership is significant (challenge to
individualism)

• An acknowledgment that access is unequal between racial groups
(challenge to meritocracy)

• Being presented with a person of color in a position of leadership
(challenge to white authority)

• Being presented with information about other racial groups through,
for example, movies in which people of color drive the action but are
not in stereotypical roles, or multicultural education (challenge to
white centrality)

• Suggesting that white people do not represent or speak for all of
humanity (challenge to universalism)

In a society in which whites are dominant, each of these challenges
becomes exceptional. In turn, we are often at a loss for how to respond
constructively. For example, I was once asked to provide one-on-one
mentoring for a white male teacher who had made inappropriate racial
comments to a black female student. When the girl’s mother complained,
the teacher became defensive and the conflict escalated. The incident
ended up in the newspaper, and potential legal action was discussed. I
will call this teacher Mr. Roberts. During one of our sessions, Mr.
Roberts told me about his colleague, a white female teacher, who
recently had two black students at her desk. She prefaced something she
said to one of them with “Girl.” The student was clearly taken aback and
asked, “Did you just call me girl?” The other student said it was OK;
the teacher called all her students girl.

In relaying this story to me, Mr. Roberts expressed his and his
colleague’s anger about having to be “so careful” and not being able to
“say anything anymore.” They perceived my intervention as a form of
punishment and believed that because of the incident with him, students
of color were now “oversensitive” and complaining about racism where it
did not exist. For these teachers, the student’s reaction to being
called “Girl” was an example of this oversensitivity. This accusation is
a familiar white narrative, and in this instance, it was rationalized
for two reasons: First, because the teacher called all her female
students “Girl,” the comment had nothing to do with race. Second, one of
the students didn’t have an issue with the comment, so the student who
did was seen as overreacting.

These white teachers’ responses illustrate several dynamics of white
fragility. First, the teachers never considered that in not
understanding the student’s reaction, they might be lacking some
knowledge or context. They demonstrated no curiosity about the student’s
perspective or why she might have taken offense. Nor did they show
concern about the student’s feelings. They were unable to separate
intentions from impact. Despite Mr. Roberts’s lack of cross-racial
skills and understanding—a lack that led to a racial violation with
potential legal repercussions—he arrogantly remained confident that he
was right and that the student was wrong. His colleague, aware that Mr.
Roberts was in serious trouble about a cross-racial incident, still
maintained white solidarity with him by validating their shared
perspective and invalidating that of the student of color. The teachers
used the student witness who excused the comment as proof that the other
student was wrong. According to them, the witness was the correct
student because she denied any racial implications. Finally, the
teachers used this interaction as an opportunity to increase racial
divides rather than bridge them and to protect their worldviews and
positions.

White fragility may be conceptualized as a response or “condition”
produced and reproduced by the continual social and material advantages
of whiteness. When disequilibrium occurs—when there is an interruption
to that which is familiar and taken for granted—white fragility restores
equilibrium and returns the capital “lost” via the challenge. This
capital includes self-image, control, and white solidarity. Anger toward
the trigger, shutting down and/or tuning out, indulgence in emotional
incapacitation such as guilt or “hurt feelings,” exiting, or a
combination of these responses results. Again, these strategies are
reflexive and seldom conscious, but that does not make them benign.



CHAPTER 8



THE RESULT: WHITE FRAGILITY


_I am coaching a small group of white employees on how racism manifests
in their workplace. One member of the group, Karen, is upset about a
request from Joan, her only colleague of color, to stop talking over
her. Karen doesn’t understand what talking over Joan has to do with
race; she is an extrovert and tends to talks over everyone. I try to
explain how the impact is different when we interrupt across race
because we bring our histories with us. While Karen sees herself as a
unique individual, Joan sees Karen as a white individual. Being
interrupted and talked over by white people is not a unique experience
for Joan; nor is it separate from the larger cultural context. Karen
exclaims, “Forget it! I can’t say anything right, so I am going to stop
talking!”_

The preceding episode highlights Karen’s white fragility. She is unable
to see herself in racial terms. When she is pressed to do so, she
refuses to engage further, positioning herself as the one being treated
unfairly. As NPR’s Don Gonyea points out, a remarkable preponderance of
white Americans believe that they also experience racial prejudice:

A majority of whites say discrimination against them exists in America
today, according to a poll released Tuesday from NPR, the Robert Wood
Johnson Foundation and the Harvard T. H. Chan School of Public Health.

“If you apply for a job, they seem to give the blacks the first crack at
it,” said 68-year-old Tim Hershman of Akron, Ohio, “and, basically, you
know, if you want any help from the government, if you’re white, you
don’t get it. If you’re black, you get it.”

More than half of whites—55 percent—surveyed say that, generally
speaking, they believe there is discrimination against white people in
America today. . . .

Notable, however, is that though a majority of whites in the poll say
discrimination against them exists, a much smaller percentage say they
have actually experienced it.¹

The large body of research about children and race demonstrates that
children start to construct their ideas about race very early.
Remarkably, a sense of white superiority and knowledge of racial power
codes appear to develop as early as preschool.² Professor of
communications Judith Martin describes white children’s upbringing:

As in other Western nations, white children born in the United States
inherit the moral predicament of living in a white supremacist society.
Raised to experience their racially based advantages as fair and normal,
white children receive little if any instruction regarding the
predicament they face, let alone any guidance in how to resolve it.
Therefore, they experience or learn about racial tension without
understanding Euro-Americans’ historical responsibility for it and
knowing virtually nothing about their contemporary roles in perpetuating
it.³

Despite its ubiquity, white superiority is also unnamed and denied by
most whites. If we become adults who explicitly oppose racism, as do
many, we often organize our identity around a denial of our racially
based privileges that reinforce racist disadvantage for others. What is
particularly problematic about this contradiction is that white people’s
moral objection to racism increases their resistance to acknowledging
their complicity with it. In a white supremacist context, white identity
largely rests on a foundation of (superficial) racial tolerance and
acceptance. We whites who position ourselves as liberal often opt to
protect what we perceive as our moral reputations, rather than recognize
or change our participation in systems of inequity and domination.

For example, in 2016, the Oscars were challenged for their lack of
diversity. When asked if she felt the Oscars were “behind the times” for
failing to nominate a single black actor for the second year in a row,
actor Helen Mirren defaulted to white racial innocence in her reply: “It
just so happened it went that way.” She also claimed, “It’s unfair to
attack the academy.” Actor Charlotte Rampling called the idea of a
boycott against the Oscars to draw attention to the lack of diversity
“racist against whites.” In so responding, whites invoke the power to
choose when, how, and to what extent racism is addressed or challenged.
Thus, pointing out white advantage will often trigger patterns of
confusion, defensiveness, and righteous indignation. These responses
enable defenders to protect their moral character against a perceived
attack while rejecting any culpability. Focusing on restoring their
moral standing through these tactics, whites are able to avoid the
challenge.⁴

One way that whites protect their positions when challenged on race is
to invoke the discourse of self-defense. Through this discourse, whites
characterize themselves as victimized, slammed, blamed, and attacked.⁵
Whites who describe the interactions in this way are responding to the
articulation of counternarratives alone; no physical violence has ever
occurred in any interracial discussion or training that I am aware of.
These self-defense claims work on multiple levels. They identify the
speakers as morally superior while obscuring the true power of their
social positions. The claims blame others with less social power for
their discomfort and falsely describe that discomfort as dangerous. The
self-defense approach also reinscribes racist imagery. By positioning
themselves as the victim of antiracist efforts, they cannot be the
beneficiaries of whiteness. Claiming that it is they who have been
unfairly treated—through a challenge to their position or an expectation
that they listen to the perspectives and experiences of people of
color—they can demand that more social resources (such as time and
attention) be channeled in their direction to help them cope with this
mistreatment.

When I consult with organizations that want me to help them recruit and
retain a more diverse workforce, I am consistently warned that past
efforts to address the lack of diversity have resulted in trauma for
white employees. This is literally the term used to describe the impact
of a brief and isolated workshop: _trauma._ This trauma has required
years of avoiding the topic altogether, and although the business
leaders feel they are ready to begin again, I am cautioned to proceed
slowly and be careful. Of course, this white racial trauma in response
to equity efforts has also ensured that the organization has remained
overwhelmingly white.

The language of violence that many whites use to describe antiracist
endeavors is not without significance, as it is another example of how
white fragility distorts reality. By employing terms that connote
physical abuse, whites tap into the classic story that people of color
(particularly African Americans) are dangerous and violent. In so doing,
whites distort the real direction of danger between whites and others.
This history becomes profoundly minimized when whites claim they don’t
feel safe or are under attack when they find themselves in the rare
situation of merely talking about race with people of color. The use of
this language of violence illustrates how fragile and ill-equipped most
white people are to confront racial tensions, and their subsequent
projection of this tension onto people of color.⁶

Sociologist Eduardo Bonilla-Silva, in his study of color-blind racism,
describes an aspect of white fragility: “Because the new racial climate
in America forbids the open expression of racially based feelings,
views, and positions, when whites discuss issues that make them
uncomfortable, they become almost incomprehensible.”⁷ Probing forbidden
racial issues results in verbal incoherence—digressions, long pauses,
repetition, and self-corrections. Bonilla-Silva suggests that this
incoherent talk is a function of talking about race in a world that
insists that race does not matter. This incoherence suggests that many
white people are unprepared to explore, even on a preliminary level,
their racial perspectives and to work to shift their understanding of
racism. This reluctance maintains white power because the ability to
determine which narratives are authorized and which are suppressed is
the foundation of cultural domination. This reluctance has further
implications, for if whites cannot explore alternate racial
perspectives, they can only reinscribe white perspectives as universal.

However, whites do engage in racial discourse under controlled
conditions. We notice the racial positions of racial others and discuss
this freely among ourselves, albeit often in coded ways. The refusal to
directly acknowledge this race talk results in a kind of split
consciousness that leads to irrationality and incoherence. This denial
also guarantees that the racial misinformation that circulates in the
culture and frames our perspectives will be left unexamined. The
continual retreat from the discomfort of authentic racial engagement in
a culture in which racial disparity is infused limits white people’s
ability to form authentic connections across racial lines and
perpetuates a cycle that keeps racism in place.

A cogent example of white fragility occurred during a workplace
anti-racism training I co-facilitated with an inter-racial team. One of
the white participants left the session and went back to her desk, upset
at receiving (what appeared to the training team as) sensitive and
diplomatic feedback on how some of her statements had impacted several
of the people of color in the room. At break, several other white
participants approached me and my fellow trainers and reported that they
had talked to the woman at her desk, and that she was very upset that
her statements had been challenged. (Of course, “challenged” was not how
she phrased her concern. It was framed as her being “falsely accused” of
having a racist impact.) Her friends wanted to alert us to the fact that
she was in poor health and “might be having a heart-attack.” Upon
questioning from us, they clarified that they meant this literally.
These coworkers were sincere in their fear that the young woman might
actually die as a result of the feedback. Of course when news of the
women’s potentially fatal condition reached the rest of the participant
group, all attention was immediately focused back onto her and away from
engagement with the impact she had had on the people of color. As
professor of social work Rich Vodde states, “If privilege is defined as
a legitimization of one’s entitlement to resources, it can also be
defined as permission to escape or avoid any challenges to this
entitlement.”⁸

White equilibrium is a cocoon of racial comfort, centrality,
superiority, entitlement, racial apathy, and obliviousness, all rooted
in an identity of being good people free of racism. Challenging this
cocoon throws off our racial balance. Because being racially off balance
is so rare, we have not had to build the capacity to sustain the
discomfort. Thus, whites find these challenges unbearable and want them
to stop.



WHITE FRAGILITY AS A FORM OF BULLYING


Let me be clear: while the capacity for white people to sustain
challenges to our racial positions is limited—and, in this way,
fragile—the effects of our responses are not fragile at all; they are
quite powerful because they take advantage of historical and
institutional power and control. We wield this power and control in
whatever way is most useful in the moment to protect our positions. If
we need to cry so that all the resources rush back to us and attention
is diverted away from a discussion of our racism, then we will cry (a
strategy most commonly employed by white middle-class women). If we need
to take umbrage and respond with righteous outrage, then we will take
umbrage. If we need to argue, minimize, explain, play devil’s advocate,
pout, tune out, or withdraw to stop the challenge, then we will.

White fragility functions as a form of bullying; I am going to make it
so miserable for you to confront me—no matter how diplomatically you try
to do so—that you will simply back off, give up, and never raise the
issue again. White fragility keeps people of color in line and “in their
place.” In this way, it is a powerful form of white racial control.
Social power is not fixed; it is constantly challenged and needs to be
maintained. We might think of the triggers of white fragility discussed
in chapter 7 as challenges to white power and control, and of white
fragility as the means to end the challenge and maintain that power and
control.

Let me also be clear that the term “white fragility” is intended to
describe a very specific white phenomenon. White fragility is much more
than mere defensiveness or whining. It may be conceptualized as the
_sociology of dominance:_ an outcome of white people’s socialization
into white supremacy and a means to protect, maintain, and reproduce
white supremacy. The term is _not applicable_ to other groups who may
register complaints or otherwise be deemed difficult (e.g., “student
fragility”).

In my workshops, I often ask people of color, “How often have you given
white people feedback on our unaware yet inevitable racism? How often
has that gone well for you?” Eye-rolling, head-shaking, and outright
laughter follow, along with the consensus of _rarely, if ever._ I then
ask, “What would it be like if you could simply give us feedback, have
us graciously receive it, reflect, and work to change the behavior?”
Recently a man of color sighed and said, “It would be revolutionary.” I
ask my fellow whites to consider the profundity of that response. It
would be _revolutionary_ if we could receive, reflect, and work to
change the behavior. On the one hand, the man’s response points to how
difficult and fragile we are. But on the other hand, it indicates how
simple it can be to take responsibility for our racism. However, we
aren’t likely to get there if we are operating from the dominant
worldview that only intentionally mean people can participate in racism.



CHAPTER 9



WHITE FRAGILITY IN ACTION


_A board president has finally obtained agreement from the school to
sponsor racial equity training for his predominately white teaching
staff. But when he hears the workshop’s title, he backs away, not liking
that the term white is used._

_When I was a professor of education, my university was situated ten
miles from a city that is roughly 56 percent black and Latinx. Our
student population was 97 percent white, and many of them did their
internships in the public schools in this city. My department hadn’t
hired a faculty member of color in seventeen years. I repeatedly brought
this up as an issue, but silence repeatedly followed. Eventually, a
white colleague came to my office and angrily told me, “Every time you
bring this up, you are saying that we shouldn’t have our jobs.”_

_A white man works for an Indian tribe. He consistently lets the Native
people he works with know how “exhausted” he is from “seeing injustice.”
He doesn’t know how much longer he can endure the job. His Native
coworkers feel pressured to repeatedly console him and encourage him to
stay._

_I receive a call from a virtually all-white organization that is
interested in racial equity training. They want to know how I will
ensure that the participants will feel comfortable._

_I have just given a keynote talk on what it means to be white in a
society that proclaims that being white means nothing, while remaining
deeply separated and unequal by race. The focus of my talk is on how
race shapes white identity and the inevitable patterns that result. A
white woman who works with Native Americans approaches the event
organizer, who is a woman of color. The white woman is furious. “What
about Native Americans? You left out Native Americans!” She berates the
organizer for several minutes at a volume that I can hear from across
the stage. When I intervene, she is calmer but still chastises me for
leaving out Native Americans—who are “the most oppressed of all.” At no
point does she acknowledge any aspect of the talk that relates to her as
a white person, share any insight she may have gained into her own
whiteness, or consider the impact of berating a woman of color who
didn’t actually give the talk._

As a former professor and current facilitator and consultant, I am in a
position to give white people feedback on how their unintentional racism
is manifesting itself. In this position, I have observed countless
enactments of white fragility. One of the most common is outrage: “How
dare you suggest that I could have said or done something racist!”
Although these are unpleasant moments for me, they are also rather
amusing. The reason I am there in the first place is because I have been
hired specifically to do just that; I have been asked to help the
members of the organization understand why their workplace continues to
remain white, why they are having so much trouble recruiting people of
color, and/or why the people of color they hire don’t stay.

At this point in my career, I rarely encounter the kind of open
hostility that I was met with in my early days as a facilitator. I
attribute this change to the years of experience behind my pedagogy. Of
course, I am also white, which makes other white people much more
receptive to the message. I am often amazed at what I can say to groups
of primarily white people. I can describe our culture as white
supremacist and say things like “All white people are invested in and
collude with racism” without my fellow white people running from the
room or reeling from trauma. Naturally, I don’t walk in and lead with
those statements; I strategically guide people to a shared understanding
of what I mean by those claims. My own whiteness coupled with experience
and strategy puts white people’s overall reception of me light-years
beyond how I was received in the early days.

White people are receptive to my presentation as long as it remains
abstract. The moment I name some racially problematic dynamic or action
happening in the room _in the moment_—for example, “Sharon, may I give
you some feedback? While I understand it wasn’t intentional, your
response to Jason’s story invalidates his experience as a black
man”—white fragility erupts. Sharon defensively explains that she was
misunderstood and then angrily withdraws, while others run in to defend
her by re-explaining “what she really meant.” The point of the feedback
is now lost, and hours must be spent repairing this perceived breach.
And, of course, no one appears concerned about Jason. Shaking my head, I
think to myself, “You asked me here to help you see your racism, but by
god, I’d better not actually help you see your racism.”

Throughout this book, I have attempted to make visible the inevitable
racist assumptions held and patterns displayed by white people
conditioned by living in a white supremacist culture. When these
patterns are named or questioned, we have predictable responses. The
responses begin with a set of unexamined assumptions, which, when
questioned, trigger various emotions, which activate some expected
behaviors. These behaviors are then justified by numerous claims. These
responses, emotions, behaviors, and claims are illustrated in the
following example of a recent eruption of white fragility.

I was co-leading a community workshop. Because an employer had not
sponsored it, the participants had all voluntarily signed up and paid a
fee to attend. For this reason, we could assume that they were open and
interested in the content. I was working with a small group of white
participants when a woman I will refer to as Eva stated that because she
grew up in Germany, where she said there were no black people, she had
learned nothing about race and held no racism. I pushed back on this
claim by asking her to reflect on the messages she had received from her
childhood about people who lived in Africa. Surely she was aware of
Africa and had some impressions of the people there? Had she ever
watched American films? If so, what impression did she get about African
Americans? I also asked her to reflect on what she had absorbed from
living in the US for the last twenty-three years, whether she had any
relationships with African Americans here, and if not, then why not.

We moved on and I forgot about the interaction until she approached me
after the workshop ended. She was furious and said that she had been
deeply offended by our exchange and did not “feel seen.” “You made
assumptions about me!” she said. I apologized and told her that I would
never want her to feel unseen or invalidated. However, I also held to my
challenge that growing up in Germany would not preclude her from
absorbing problematic racial messages about black people. She countered
by telling me that she had never even seen a black person “before the
American soldiers came.” And when they did come, “all the German women
thought them so beautiful that they wanted to connect with them.” This
was her evidence that she held no racism. With an internal sigh of
defeat, I gave up at that point and repeated my apology. We parted ways,
but her anger was unabated.

A few months later, one of my cofacilitators contacted Eva to tell her
about an upcoming workshop. Eva was apparently still angry. She replied
that she would never again attend a workshop led by me. Notice that I
did not tell Eva that she was racist or that her story was racist. But
what I did do was challenge her self-image as someone exempt from
racism. Paradoxically, Eva’s anger that I did not take her claims at
face value surfaced within the context of a volunteer workshop on
racism, which she ostensibly attended to deepen her understanding of
racism.

Let’s start with the common emotional reactions that white people have
(and that Eva demonstrated) when our assumptions and behaviors are
challenged.

FEELINGS

• Singled out

• Insulted

• Attacked

• Judged

• Silenced

• Angry

• Shamed

• Scared

• Guilty

• outraged

• Accused

 

When we have these feelings, it is common to behave in the following
ways, as Eva did:

BEHAVIORS

• Crying

• Denying

• Physically leaving

• Focusing on intentions

• Emotionally withdrawing

• Seeking absolution

• Arguing

• Avoiding

Given that these are strong emotions and reactions, they need to be
justified. What claims do we make to justify these feelings and
behaviors? Some of the following claims suggest that the claimant has
been falsely accused. Others suggest that the claimant is beyond the
discussion (“I already know all this”). But all of them exempt the
person from further engagement or accountability, as Eva’s claims
exempted her.

CLAIMS

• I know people of color.

• The real oppression is class

• I marched in the sixties.

   [or gender, or anything other

• I already know all this.

   than race].

• You are judging me.

• You are elitist.

• You don’t know me.

• I just said one little innocent

• You are generalizing.

   thing.

• That is just your opinion.

• Some people find

• I disagree.

   offense where there is none.

• You don’t do this the right way.

• You misunderstood me.

• You’re playing the race card.

• I don’t feel safe.

• This is not welcoming to me.

• The problem is your tone.

• You’re being racist against me.

• I can’t say anything right.

• You are making me feel guilty.

• That was not my intention.

• You hurt my feelings.

• I have suffered too.

Several of these claims are also made in an email I received through my
public website; the following comments are partly excerpted and
summarized (caps in original email). The writer opens by saying that
according to her assessment of my age, I did not live through the things
that she lived through, and therefore, “I seriously doubt that there is
one single thing you could tell me about race.” She goes on to state her
credentials—how she lived through the momentous events of the civil
rights movement, studied race and gender in college, is familiar with
many famous black feminist writers and black politicians, and has known
many black people throughout her life: neighbors, classmates, and
colleagues. Further, the author suffers from the same illness that a
black friend’s sister died from decades earlier. This shared illness
appears to be further proof of her alliance with black people. She uses
these experiences and relationships as evidence that she has been able
to shed any racism she may have had: “All the things you say whites
‘absorb’? I got them wrung out of me through my life and my education.”
Her next move takes race off the table and replaces it with an
oppression she experiences, sexism: “No, I don’t want to talk about race
any more. I want to talk about GENDER.” She ends by closing down any
further engagement, saying that she likely wouldn’t read any email I
would send her.

I am confident that some of the feelings, behaviors, and claims
illustrated in this email message will be familiar to white readers; we
have either made some version of them ourselves or have heard others
make them. Yet as with so many aspects of racism, we rarely examine or
consider them problematic. So let’s go under the surface and examine the
framework of assumptions many of these claims rest on.

ASSUMPTIONS

• Racism is simply personal prejudice.

• I am free of racism.

• I will be the judge of whether racism has occurred.

• My learning is finished; I know all I need to know.

• Racism can only be intentional; my not having intended racism cancels
out the impact of my behavior.

• My suffering relieves me of racism or racial privilege.

• White people who experience another form of oppression cannot
experience racial privilege.

• If I am a good person, I can’t be racist.

• I am entitled to remain comfortable/have this conversation the way I
want to.

• How I am perceived by others is the most important issue.

• As a white person, I know the best way to challenge racism.

• If I am feeling challenged, you are doing this wrong.

• It’s unkind to point out racism.

• Racism is conscious bias. I have none, so I am not racist.

• Racists are bad individuals, so you are saying that I am a bad person.

• If you knew me or understood me, you would know I can’t be racist.

• I have friends of color, so I can’t be racist.

• There is no problem; society is fine the way it is.

• Racism is a simple problem. People just need to . . .

• My worldview is objective and the only one operating.

• If I can’t see it, it isn’t legitimate.

• If you have more knowledge on the subject than I do, you think you’re
better than me.

Now that we have identified the underlying assumptions that engender
these feelings, behaviors, and claims, let’s consider how they function.

FUNCTIONS OF WHITE FRAGILITY

• Maintain white solidarity

• Close off self-reflection

• Trivialize the reality of racism

• Silence the discussion

• Make white people the victims

• Hijack the conversation

• Protect a limited worldview

• Take race off the table

• Protect white privilege

• Focus on the messenger, not the message

• Rally more resources to white people

These behaviors and the assumptions undergirding them do not in fact
present the claimant as racially open; quite the opposite. They block
any entry point for reflection and engagement. Further, they block the
ability to repair a racial breach. They fan racial divisions as they
seethe with hostility and resentment. In summary, the prevailing white
racial assumptions and the behaviors they engender protect racism.



CHAPTER 10



WHITE FRAGILITY AND THE RULES OF ENGAGEMENT


Given the dominant conceptualization of racism as individual acts of
cruelty, it follows that only terrible people who consciously don’t like
people of color can enact racism. Though this conceptualization is
misinformed, it is not benign. In fact, it functions beautifully to make
it nearly impossible to engage in the necessary dialogue and
self-reflection that can lead to change. Outrage at the suggestion of
racism is often followed by righteous indignation about the manner in
which the feedback was given. After years of working with my fellow
whites, I have discovered (as, I am sure, have countless people of
color) a set of unspoken rules for how to give white people feedback on
our inevitable and often unconscious racist assumptions and patterns. I
have found that the only way to give feedback without triggering white
fragility is not to give it at all. Thus, the first rule is cardinal:

  1. Do not give me feedback on my racism under any circumstances.

If you insist on breaking the cardinal rule, then you must follow these
other rules:

  2. Proper tone is crucial—feedback must be given calmly. If any
emotion is displayed, the feedback is invalid and can be dismissed.

  3. There must be trust between us. You must trust that I am in no way
racist before you can give me feedback on my racism.

  4. Our relationship must be issue-free—if there are issues between us,
you cannot give me feedback on racism until these unrelated issues are
resolved.

  5. Feedback must be given immediately. If you wait too long, the
feedback will be discounted because it was not given sooner.

  6. You must give feedback privately, regardless of whether the
incident occurred in front of other people. To give feedback in front of
any others who were involved in the situation is to commit a serious
social transgression. If you cannot protect me from embarrassment, the
feedback is invalid, and you are the transgressor.

  7. You must be as indirect as possible. Directness is insensitive and
will invalidate the feedback and require repair.

  8. As a white person, I must feel completely safe during any
discussion of race. Suggesting that I have racist assumptions or
patterns will cause me to feel unsafe, so you will need to rebuild my
trust by never giving me feedback again. Point of clarification: when I
say “safe,” what I really mean is “comfortable.”

  9. Highlighting my racial privilege invalidates the form of oppression
that _I_ experience (e.g., classism, sexism, heterosexism, ageism,
ableism, transphobia). We will then need to turn our attention to how
_you_ oppressed _me._

10. You must acknowledge my intentions (always good) and agree that my
good intentions cancel out the impact of my behavior.

11. To suggest my behavior had a racist impact is to have misunderstood
me. You will need to allow me to explain myself until you can
acknowledge that it was _your_ misunderstanding.

The contradictions in these rules are irrelevant; their function is to
obscure racism, protect white dominance, and regain white equilibrium.
And they do so very effectively. Yet from an understanding of racism as
a system of unequal institutional power, we need to ask ourselves where
these rules come from and whom they serve.

Many of us actively working to interrupt racism continually hear
complaints about the “gotcha” culture of white antiracism. We are
sometimes depicted as looking for every incident we can find so we can
spring out, point our fingers, and shout, “You’re a racist!” While
certainly some white people arrogantly set themselves apart from other
whites by acting in this way, in my experience, this is not the norm. It
is far more common for sincere white people to agonize over when and how
to give feedback to a fellow white person, given the ubiquity of white
fragility. White fragility punishes the person giving feedback and
presses them back into silence. It also maintains white solidarity—the
tacit agreement that we will protect white privilege and not hold each
other accountable for our racism. When the individual giving the
feedback is a person of color, the charge is “playing the race card,”
and the consequences of white fragility are much more penalizing.

Racism is the norm rather than an aberration. Feedback is key to our
ability to recognize and repair our inevitable and often unaware
collusion. In recognition of this, I try to follow these guidelines:

1.   How, where, and when you give me feedback is irrelevant—it is the
feedback I want and need. Understanding that it is hard to give, I will
take it any way I can get it. From my position of social, cultural, and
institutional white power and privilege, I am perfectly safe and I can
handle it. If I cannot handle it, _it’s on me_ to build my racial
stamina.

2.   Thank you.

The above guidelines rest on the understanding that there is no face to
save and the game is up; I know that I have blind spots and unconscious
investments in racism. My investments are reinforced every day in
mainstream society. I did not set this system up, but it does unfairly
benefit me, I do use it to my advantage, and I am responsible for
interrupting it. I need to work hard to change my role in this system,
but I can’t do it alone. This understanding leads me to gratitude when
others help me.

White fragility is also evidenced in the need for so many white
progressives to “build trust” before they can explore racism in
workshops, support groups, and other educational forums. Many who are
involved in racial justice education will recognize this white call for
racial trust, which surfaces in a variety of ways: facilitators devoting
time to exercises intended to build trust, creating ground rules and
guidelines to engender trust, and participant justifications for
non-engagement (e.g., “I am not going to share, because I don’t feel
trust here.”). I have asked many colleagues just exactly what my fellow
white people mean by the call for trust. I am confident the need for
trust does not relate to having your wallet stolen or being physically
assaulted, although at a subconscious level, that very well may be what
is at play when the group is racially mixed, given the power of implicit
bias and the relentless racist conditioning whites receive. Still, I
believe that what it comes down to is this: I need to trust that you
won’t think I am racist before I can work on my racism.

Consider the following common guidelines that have “building trust” at
their base:

• _Don’t judge:_ Refraining from judgment is not humanly possible, so
this guideline cannot be achieved or enforced and is functionally
meaningless.

• _Don’t make assumptions:_ The nature of an assumption is that you
don’t know you are making it, so this guideline cannot be achieved or
enforced and is functionally meaningless.

• _Assume good intentions:_ By emphasizing intentions over impact, this
guideline privileges the intentions of the aggressor over the impact of
their behavior on the target. In so doing, the aggressor’s intentions
become the most important issue. In essence, this guideline tells
victims that as long as there was no intention to cause harm, they need
to let go of the hurt and move on. In so doing, this guideline upholds
white racial innocence while minimizing the impact of racism on people
of color.

• _Speak your truth_: The admonition to speak the truth seems to be an
unnecessary guideline. I have not seen a pattern of lying in these
groups. Have I seen defensiveness, distancing behavior, silence,
avoidance of taking risks? Yes. But have I observed people not speaking
their truth? No. More importantly, what if your truth is that you are
color blind? Because no one can actually be color blind in a racist
society, the claim that you are color blind is not a truth; it is a
false belief. Yet this guideline can position all beliefs as truths and,
as such, equally valid. Given that the goal of antiracist work is to
identify and challenge racism and _the misinformation that supports it,_
all perspectives are _not_ equally valid; some are rooted in racist
ideology and need to be uncovered and challenged. We must distinguish
between sharing your beliefs so that we can identify how they may be
upholding racism and stating your beliefs as “truths” that cannot be
challenged.

• _Respect:_ The problem with this guideline is that respect is rarely
defined, and what feels respectful to white people can be exactly what
does not create a respectful environment for people of color. For
example, white people often define as respectful an environment with no
conflict, no expression of strong emotion, no challenging of racist
patterns, and a focus on intentions over impact. But such an atmosphere
is exactly what creates an inauthentic, white-norm-centered, and thus
hostile environment for people of color.

The unexamined assumption underlying these guidelines is that they can
be universally applied. But because they do not account for unequal
power relations, they do not function the same way across race. These
guidelines are primarily driven by white fragility, and they are
accommodations made to coddle white fragility. The very conditions that
most white people insist on to remain comfortable are those that support
the racial status quo (white centrality, dominance, and professed
innocence). For people of color, the racial status quo is hostile and
needs to be interrupted, not reinforced. The essential message of trust
is _be nice._ And according to dominant white norms, the suggestion that
someone is racist is not “nice.”

Guidelines such as those above can also be turned against people of
color. “If you challenge my racial patterns, then you are assuming that
what I did was rooted in racism, and you shouldn’t make assumptions.”
Or, “You are denying my truth that race has nothing to do with my
actions.” Now _you_ are the transgressor. These conditions reproduce the
weight of racism that people of color must constantly carry: putting
aside their own needs to focus on white needs. An antidote to white
fragility is to build up our stamina to bear witness to the pain of
racism that we cause, not to impose conditions that require people of
color to continually validate our denial.

Of course, we would ideally guide each other in this work with
compassion; it is much easier to look at something unwanted within
ourselves if we don’t feel judged or criticized. But what if someone
does literally point a finger and boldly say, “You are racist!”? (This
accusation is a deep fear of progressive whites.) It is still on me to
identify my racist patterns and work to change them. If the point being
made is aimed at that goal, then regardless of how carefully or
indirectly it is being made, I need to focus on the overall point. The
method of delivery cannot be used to delegitimize what is being
illuminated or as an excuse for disengagement.

To let go of the messenger and focus on the message is an advanced skill
and is especially difficult to practice if someone comes at us with a
self-righteous tone. If kindness gets us there faster, I am all for it.
But I do not require anything from someone giving me feedback before I
can engage with that feedback. Part of my processing of that feedback
will be to separate it from its delivery and ascertain the central point
and its contribution to my growth. Many of us are not there yet, but
this is what we need to work toward. I have been in many white racial
justice groups wherein the participants expended much energy making sure
people were kind and compassionate to each other and didn’t “break
trust.” So much energy, in fact, that we could no longer help each other
see our problematic patterns without breaking the norms of the group. So
unless that kindness is combined with clarity and the courage to name
and challenge racism, this approach protects white fragility and needs
to be challenged.

As I have tried to show throughout this book, white people raised in
Western society are conditioned into a white supremacist worldview
because it is the bedrock of our society and its institutions.
Regardless of whether a parent told you that everyone was equal, or the
poster in the hall of your white suburban school proclaimed the value of
diversity, or you have traveled abroad, or you have people of color in
your workplace or family, the ubiquitous socializing power of white
supremacy cannot be avoided. The messages circulate 24-7 and have little
or nothing to do with intentions, awareness, or agreement. Entering the
conversation with this understanding is freeing because it allows us to
focus on _how_—rather than _if_—our racism is manifest. When we move
beyond the good/bad binary, we can become eager to identify our racist
patterns because interrupting those patterns becomes more important than
managing how we think we look to others.

I repeat: stopping our racist patterns must be more important than
working to convince others that we don’t have them. We do have them, and
people of color already know we have them; our efforts to prove
otherwise are not convincing. An honest accounting of these patterns is
no small task given the power of white fragility and white solidarity,
but it is necessary.



CHAPTER 11



WHITE WOMEN’S TEARS


_But you are my sister, and I share your pain!_

The term _white tears_ refers to all the ways, both literally and
metaphorically, that white fragility manifests itself through white
people’s laments over how hard racism is on _us._ In my work, I
consistently encounter these tears in their various forms, and many
writers have already provided excellent critiques.¹ Here, I want to
address one manifestation of white tears: those shed by white women in
cross-racial settings. The following example illustrates both the
frustration that people of color feel with those tears and white women’s
sense of entitlement to freely shed them.

When another police shooting of an unarmed black man occurred, my
workplace called for an informal lunch gathering of people who wanted to
connect and find support. Just before the gathering, a woman of color
pulled me aside and told me that she wanted to attend but she was “in no
mood for white women’s tears today.” I assured her that I would handle
it. As the meeting started, I told my fellow white participants that if
they felt moved to tears, they should please leave the room. I would go
with them for support, but I asked that they not cry in the mixed group.
After the discussion, I spent the next hour explaining to a very
outraged white woman why she was asked not to cry in the presence of the
people of color.

I understand that expressing our heartfelt emotions—especially as they
relate to racial injustices—is an important progressive value. To
repress our feelings seems counterintuitive to being present,
compassionate, and supportive. So why would my colleague of color make
such a request? In short, white women’s tears have a powerful impact in
this setting, effectively reinscribing rather than ameliorating racism.

Many of us see emotions as naturally occurring. But emotions are
political in two key ways. First, our emotions are shaped by our biases
and beliefs, our cultural frameworks. For example, if I
believe—consciously or unconsciously—that it is normal and appropriate
for men to express anger but not women, I will have very different
emotional responses to men’s and women’s expressions of anger. I might
see a man who expresses anger as competent and in charge and may feel
respect for him, while I see a woman who expresses anger as childish and
out of control and may feel contempt for her. If I believe that only bad
people are racist, I will feel hurt, offended, and shamed when an
unaware racist assumption of mine is pointed out. If I instead believe
that having racist assumptions is inevitable (but possible to change), I
will feel gratitude when an unaware racist assumption is pointed out;
now I am aware of and can change that assumption. In this way, emotions
are not natural; they are the result of the frameworks we are using to
make sense of social relations. And of course, social relations are
political. Our emotions are also political because they are often
externalized; our emotions drive behaviors that impact other people.

White women’s tears in cross-racial interactions are problematic for
several reasons connected to how they impact others. For example, there
is a long historical backdrop of black men being tortured and murdered
because of a white woman’s distress, and we white women bring these
histories with us. Our tears trigger the terrorism of this history,
particularly for African Americans. A cogent and devastating example is
Emmett Till, a fourteen-year-old boy who reportedly flirted with a white
woman—Carolyn Bryant—in a grocery store in Mississippi in 1955. She
reported this alleged flirtation to her husband, Roy Bryant, and a few
days later, Roy and his half-brother, J. W. Milam, lynched Till,
abducting him from his great-uncle’s home. They beat him to death,
mutilated his body, and sank him in the Tallahatchie River. An all-white
jury acquitted the men, who later admitted to the murder. On her
deathbed, in 2017, Carolyn Bryant recanted this story and admitted that
she had lied. The murder of Emmett Till is just one example of the
history that informs an oft-repeated warning from my African American
colleagues: “When a white woman cries, a black man gets hurt.” Not
knowing or being sensitive to this history is another example of white
centrality, individualism, and lack of racial humility.

Because of its seeming innocence, well-meaning white women crying in
cross-racial interactions is one of the more pernicious enactments of
white fragility. The reasons we cry in these interactions vary. Perhaps
we were given feedback on our racism. Not understanding that unaware
white racism is inevitable, we hear the feedback as a moral judgment,
and our feelings are hurt. A classic example occurred in a workshop I
was co-leading. A black man who was struggling to express a point
referred to himself as stupid. My co-facilitator, a black woman, gently
countered that he was not stupid but that society would have him believe
that he was. As she was explaining the power of internalized racism, a
white woman interrupted with, “What he was trying to say was . . . ”
When my co-facilitator pointed out that the white woman had reinforced
the racist idea that she could best speak for a black man, the woman
erupted in tears. The training came to a complete halt as most of the
room rushed to comfort her and angrily accuse the black facilitator of
unfairness. (Even though the participants were there to learn how racism
works, how dare the facilitator point out an example of how racism
works!) Meanwhile, the black man she had spoken for was left alone to
watch her receive comfort.

A colleague of color shared an example in which a white woman—new to a
racial justice organization—was offered a full-time position as the
supervisor of the women of color who had worked there for years and had
trained her. When the promotion was announced, the white woman tearfully
requested support from the women of color as she embarked on her new
learning curve. The new supervisor probably saw her tears as an
expression of humility about the limits of her racial knowledge and
expected support to follow. The women of color had to deal with the
injustice of the promotion, the invalidation of their abilities, and the
lack of racial awareness of the white person now in charge of their
livelihoods. While trying to manage their own emotional reactions, they
were put on the spot; if they did not make some comforting gesture, they
risked being viewed as angry and insensitive.

Whether intended or not, when a white woman cries over some aspect of
racism, all the attention immediately goes to her, demanding time,
energy, and attention from everyone in the room when they should be
focused on ameliorating racism. While she is given attention, the people
of color are yet again abandoned and/or blamed. As Stacey Patton, an
assistant professor of multimedia journalism at Morgan State
University’s School of Global Journalism and Communication, states in
her critique of white women’s tears, “then comes the waiting for us to
comfort and reassure them that they’re not bad people.”² Antiracism
strategist and facilitator Reagen Price paraphrases an analogy based on
the work of critical race scholar Kimberlé Crenshaw. Price says,
“Imagine first responders at the scene of an accident rushing to comfort
the person whose car struck a pedestrian, while the pedestrian lies
bleeding on the street.” In a common but particularly subversive move,
racism becomes about white distress, white suffering, and white
victimization.

White men, of course, are also racially fragile, but I have not seen
their fragility manifest itself in cross-racial discussions as actual
crying. Their fragility most commonly shows up as varying forms of
dominance and intimidation, including these:

• Control of the conversation by speaking first, last, and most often

• Arrogant and disingenuous invalidation of racial inequality via “just
playing the devil’s advocate”

• Simplistic and presumptuous proclamations of “the answer” to racism
(“People just need to . . . ”)

• Playing the outraged victim of “reverse racism”

• Accusations that the legendary “race card” is being played

• Silence and withdrawal

• Hostile body language

• Channel-switching (“The true oppression is class!”)

• Intellectualizing and distancing (“I recommend this book . . . ”)

• “Correcting” the racial analysis of people of color and white women

• Pompously explaining away racism and the experiences of people of
color

All these moves push race off the table, help white men retain control
of the discussion, end the challenge to their positions, and reassert
their dominance.

Because racism does not rely solely on individual actors, the racist
system is reproduced automatically. To interrupt it, we need to
recognize and challenge the norms, structures, and institutions that
keep it in place. But because they benefit us, racially inequitable
relations are comfortable for most white people. Consequently, if we
whites want to interrupt this system, we have to get racially
_uncomfortable_ and be willing to examine the effects of our racial
engagement. This includes not indulging in whatever reactions we
have—anger, defensiveness, self-pity, and so forth—in a given
cross-racial encounter without first reflecting on what is driving our
reactions and how they will affect other people.

Tears that are driven by white guilt are self-indulgent. When we are
mired in guilt, we are narcissistic and ineffective; guilt functions as
an excuse for inaction. Further, because we so seldom have authentic and
sustained cross-racial relationships, our tears do not feel like
solidarity to people of color we have not previously supported. Instead,
our tears function as impotent reflexes that don’t lead to constructive
action. We need to reflect on when we cry and when we don’t, and why. In
other words, what does it take to move us? Since many of us have not
learned how racism works and our role in it, our tears may come from
shock and distress about what we didn’t know or recognize. For people of
color, our tears demonstrate our racial insulation and privilege.

I asked the woman of color I refer to in the opening of this chapter if
I was missing anything in this list. This is her response:

It’s infuriating because of its audacity of disrespect to our
experience. You are crying because you are uncomfortable with your
feelings when we are barely allowed to have any. You are ashamed or some
such thing and cry, but we are not allowed to have any feelings because
then we are being difficult. We are supposed to remain stoic and strong
because otherwise we become the angry and scary people of color. We are
only allowed to have feelings for the sake of your entertainment, as in
the presentation of our funerals. And even then, there are expectations
of what is allowed for us to express. We are abused daily, beaten,
raped, and killed but you are sad and that’s what is important. That’s
why it is sooooo hard to take.

I have certainly been moved to tears by someone’s story in cross-racial
discussions. And I imagine that sometimes tears are appreciated, as they
can validate and bear witness to the pain of racism for people of color.
But I try to be very thoughtful about how and when I cry. I try to cry
quietly so that I don’t take up more space, and if people rush to
comfort me, I do not accept the comfort; I let them know that I am fine
so we can move on.



THE MEN WHO LOVE US


In addition to the general dynamics discussed thus far, white women’s
tears in cross-racial discussions have a very specific effect on men. I
have seen our tears manipulate men of all races, but the consequences of
this manipulation are not the same. White men occupy the highest
positions in the race and gender hierarchy. Thus, they have the power to
define their own reality and that of others. This reality includes not
only whose experiences are valid, but _who_ is fundamentally valid. In
the white racial frame, not all women are deemed worthy of recognition.
For example, contrary to popular white mythology, white women—not people
of color—have been the primary beneficiaries of affirmative action. When
forced to do so, white men could acknowledge white women’s humanity;
white women were their sisters, wives, and daughters. And of course,
through these relationships, white women’s increased access to resources
benefited white men. This humanity has yet to be granted to women of
color.

White men also get to authorize what constitutes pain and whose pain is
legitimate. When white men come to the rescue of white women in
cross-racial settings, patriarchy is reinforced as they play savior to
our damsel in distress. By legitimating white women as the targets of
harm, both white men and women accrue social capital. People of color
are abandoned and left to bear witness as the resources meted out to
white people actually increase—yet again—on their backs.

Men of color may also come to the aid of white women in these exchanges
and may also be driven by their conditioning under sexism and
patriarchy. But men of color have the additional weight of racism to
navigate. This weight has historically been deadly. For black men in
particular, the specter of Till and countless others who have been
beaten and killed over a white woman’s claims of cross-racial distress
is ever present. Ameliorating a white woman’s distress as quickly as
possible may be felt as a literal matter of survival. Yet coming to the
rescue of a white woman also drives a wedge between men and women of
color. Rather than receive social capital that reinforces his status, a
man of color put in this position must now live with the agony of having
to support a white woman over a person of color in order to survive.

White people do need to feel grief about the brutality of white
supremacy and our role in it. In fact, our numbness to the racial
injustice that occurs daily is key to holding it in place. But our grief
must lead to sustained and transformative action. Because our emotions
are indicators of our internal frameworks, they can serve as entry
points into the deeper self-awareness that leads to this action.
Examining what is at the root of our emotions (shame for not knowing,
guilt for hurting someone, hurt feelings because we think we must have
been misunderstood) will enable us to address these frameworks. We also
need to examine our responses toward other people’s emotions and how
they may reinscribe race and gender hierarchies. Our racial
socialization sets us up to repeat racist behavior, regardless of our
intentions or self-image. We must continue to ask _how_ our racism
manifests, not _if._



CHAPTER 12



WHERE DO WE GO FROM HERE?


_The equity team has been invited to a meeting with the company’s new
web developer. The team consists of two women, both of whom are black,
and me. The new web developer, who is also black, wants to interview us
so that she can build our page. She starts the meeting by giving us a
survey to fill out. Many questions on the survey inquire about our
intended audience, methods, goals, and objectives. I find the questions
tedious and feel irritated by them. Pushing the survey aside, I try to
explain verbally. I tell the web developer that we go out into the
satellite offices to facilitate antiracism training. I add that the
training is not always well received; in fact, one member of our team
was told not to come back. I make a joke: “The white people were scared
by Deborah’s hair” (Deborah is black and has long locked braids). The
meeting ends and we move on._

_A few days later, one of my team members lets me know that the web
developer—who I will call Angela—was offended by my hair comment. While
I wasn’t paying attention at the time, once I am informed, I quickly
realize why that comment was off. I seek out a friend who is white and
has a solid understanding of cross-racial dynamics. We discuss my
feelings (embarrassment, shame, guilt) and then she helps me identify
the various ways my racism was revealed in that interaction. After this
processing, I feel ready to repair the relationship. I ask Angela to
meet with me, and she accepts._

_I open by asking Angela, “Would you be willing to grant me the
opportunity to repair the racism I perpetrated toward you in that
meeting?” When she agrees, I continue. “I realize that my comment about
Deborah’s hair was inappropriate.”_

_Angela nods and explains that she did not know me and did not want to
be joking about black women’s hair (a sensitive issue for many black
women) with a white woman whom she did not have a trusting relationship
with, much less in a professional work meeting._

_I apologize and ask her if I have missed anything else problematic in
the meeting._

_“Yes,” she replies. “That survey? I wrote that survey. And I have spent
my life justifying my intelligence to white people.”_

_My chest constricts as I immediately realize the impact of my glib
dismissal of the survey. I acknowledge this impact and apologize._

_She accepts my apology. I ask Angela if there is anything else that
needs to be said or heard so that we may move forward._

_She replies that yes, there is. “The next time you do something like
this, would you like feedback publicly or privately?” she asks._

_I answer that given my role as an educator, I would appreciate
receiving the feedback publicly as it is important for white people to
see that I am also engaged in a lifelong process of learning and growth.
And I could model for other white people how to receive feedback openly
and without defensiveness._

_She tells me that although these dynamics occur daily between white
people and people of color, my willingness to repair doesn’t, and that
she appreciates this. We move on._

In chapter 9, I identified the common emotions, behaviors, claims, and
underlying assumptions of white fragility. In this chapter, we’ll see
how those elements would change if we transformed our racial paradigm.

It is difficult for me to imagine that my aforementioned interaction
with Angela would have been as constructive if it had occurred before I
began this work. I simply could not and would not have responded well if
I had been operating from the dominant paradigm. When my coworker let me
know that Angela was offended, I would have been filled with anxiety and
immediately explained my intentions to my coworker, seeking her
understanding and absolution. I would have felt unfairly accused and
seen myself as the victim of Angela’s unfairness. In responding this
way, I would have lost any potential relationship with her, protected my
limited worldview, and stunted my emotional and intellectual growth. Yet
day in and day out, this defensive reaction is what people of color get
from white people, and it explains why they more often than not don’t
even try talking to us.

However, from a transformed paradigm, when we are given feedback on our
inevitable but unaware racist patterns, we might have very different
feelings:

  -------------- --------------
  • Gratitude    • Motivation
  • Excitement   • Humility
  • Discomfort   • Compassion
  • Guilt        • Interest
  -------------- --------------

When we have these feelings, we might engage in the following behaviors:

  -------------- ------------------------------
  • Reflection   • Seeking more understanding
  • Apology      • Grappling
  • Listening    • Engaging
  • Processing   • Believing
  -------------- ------------------------------

What claims might we make when we have these feelings and engage in
these behaviors? Notice that none of the following claims characterize
us as falsely accused or as beyond the discussion; these claims suggest
openness and humility.

• I appreciate this feedback.

• This is very helpful.

• It’s my responsibility to resist defensiveness and complacency.

• This is hard, but also stimulating and important.

• Oops!

• It is inevitable that I have this pattern. I want to change it.

• It’s personal but not strictly personal.

• I will focus on the message and not the messenger.

• I need to build my capacity to endure discomfort and bear witness to
the pain of racism.

• I have some work to do.

These feelings, behaviors, and claims will probably be less familiar to
readers, as they are all too rare. But when our fundamental
understanding of racism is transformed, so are our assumptions and
resultant behaviors. Imagine the difference in our environment,
interactions, norms, and policies if the following list described our
assumptions:

• Being good or bad is not relevant.

• Racism is a multilayered system embedded in our culture.

• All of us are socialized into the system of racism.

• Racism cannot be avoided.

• Whites have blind spots on racism, and I have blind spots on racism.

• Racism is complex, and I don’t have to understand every nuance of the
feedback to validate that feedback.

• Whites are / I am unconsciously invested in racism.

• Bias is implicit and unconscious; I don’t expect to be aware of mine
without a lot of ongoing effort.

• Giving us white people feedback on our racism is risky for people of
color, so we can consider the feedback a sign of trust.

• Feedback on white racism is difficult to give; how I am given the
feedback is not as relevant as the feedback itself.

• Authentic antiracism is rarely comfortable. Discomfort is key to my
growth and thus desirable.

• White comfort maintains the racial status quo, so discomfort is
necessary and important.

• I must not confuse comfort with safety; as a white person, I am safe
in discussions of racism.

• The antidote to guilt is action.

• It takes courage to break with white solidarity; how can I support
those who do?

• I bring my group’s history with me; history matters.

• Given my socialization, it is much more likely that I am the one who
doesn’t understand the issue.

• Nothing exempts me from the forces of racism.

• My analysis must be intersectional (a recognition that my other social
identities—class, gender, ability—inform how I was socialized into the
racial system).

• Racism hurts (even kills) people of color 24-7. Interrupting it is
more important than my feelings, ego, or self-image.

These assumptions might interrupt racism in various ways, such as the
following:

• Minimize our defensiveness.

• Demonstrate our vulnerability.

• Demonstrate our curiosity and humility.

• Allow for growth.

• Stretch our worldview.

• Ensure action.

• Demonstrate that we practice what we profess to value.

• Build authentic relationships and trust.

• Interrupt privilege-protecting comfort.

• Interrupt internalized superiority.

When white people ask me what to do about racism and white fragility,
the first thing I ask is, “What has enabled you to be a full, educated,
professional adult and not know what to do about racism?” It is a
sincere question. How have we managed not to know, when the information
is all around us? When people of color have been telling us for years?
If we take that question seriously and map out all the ways we have come
to not know what to do, we will have our guide before us. For example,
if my answer is that I was not educated about racism, I know that I will
have to get educated. If my answer is that I don’t know people of color,
I will need to build relationships. If it is because there are no people
of color in my environment, I will need to get out of my comfort zone
and change my environment; addressing racism is not without effort.

Next, I say, “Do whatever it takes for you to internalize the above
assumptions.” I believe that if we white people were truly coming from
these assumptions, not only would our interpersonal relationships
change, but so would our institutions. Our institutions would change
because we would see to it that they did. But we simply cannot end
racism from the current paradigm.

The final advice I offer is this: “Take the initiative and find out on
your own.” To break with the conditioning of whiteness—the conditioning
that makes us apathetic about racism and prevents us from developing the
skills we need to interrupt it—white people need to find out for
themselves what they can do. There is so much excellent advice out there
today—written by both people of color and white people. Search it out.
Break with the apathy of whiteness, and demonstrate that you care enough
to put in the effort.

As an analogy, imagine you go to the doctor, who tells you that you have
an acoustic neuroma. Just as she is about to explain what that is and
what your options are, she gets an emergency call and must rush off,
abruptly ending your visit. What would you do? You would very likely go
home, get on the internet, and read everything you could find on the
subject. You might join a discussion group with people who had
experience with the condition. Even if the doctor wasn’t called away and
she explained the condition and gave you some advice, you would probably
still go home and do the research so that you would have more than one
opinion on such an important—perhaps even a life-and-death—condition.
Bottom line: you would care enough to get informed. So consider racism a
matter of life and death (as it is for people of color), and do your
homework.



THE REPAIR


Returning to the example of the racism I perpetrated toward my coworker,
we can see that I followed a series of steps. These steps are based on
the preceding list of assumptions and behaviors (reflection, apology,
etc.) presented above. First, once I was aware that I had behaved
problematically, I took the time to process my reaction with another
white person. It was not Angela’s duty to take care of my feelings or
feel pressure to reassure me. I was also careful to choose someone who I
knew would hold me accountable, not someone who would insist that Angela
was too sensitive. After I vented my feelings (embarrassment, guilt,
shame, and regret), we did our best to identify how I had reinforced
racism. I was then ready to return to Angela. I was clear and open about
why I wanted to meet with her, and asked her if she would be willing to
meet. I was prepared for her to say no; if I could not accept no for an
answer, then I would not have been ready to make an authentic apology.

When Angela and I met, I owned my racism. I did not focus on my
intentions but focused on the impact of my behavior and apologized for
that impact. Nor did I use passive framing such as “_If_ you were
offended.” (Apologies that start this way are subtle efforts to put the
onus on the recipients of our racism. Indirectly, we are saying that the
breach was not inherently offensive—many would not find it offensive at
all—but if you were offended because of your extreme sensitivity, then
we are sorry.) I simply admitted that my behavior was offensive.
Recognizing that I, as a white person, as well as my white friend who
had helped me process my feelings, would most likely not understand all
the dynamics, I asked Angela what I had missed. She was willing to
enlighten me further, and I accepted this additional feedback and
apologized. I made a commitment to do better, and I closed by asking her
if there was anything else that needed to be said or heard so that we
might move forward.

We then did move forward. Today, we have more trust—not less—in our
relationship than we did before this incident. While I regret that it
came at a cost to Angela, it wasn’t the end of the world. Many people of
color have assured me that they will not give up on me despite my racist
patterns; they expect that I will have racist behavior given the society
that socialized me. What they are looking for is not perfection but the
ability to talk about what happened, the ability to repair.
Unfortunately, it is rare for white people to own and repair our
inevitable patterns of racism. Thus, relationships with white people
tend to be less authentic for people of color.



GOING FORWARD


In chapter 4, I warned readers not to depend on people of color for our
racial education and explained why this dependency is problematic.
Readers may have been left wondering how we would get this information
if we don’t ask people of color to give it to us. We can get it in
several interconnected ways. We can seek out the information from books,
websites, films, and other available sources. Many people of color _are_
committed to teaching whites about racism (on their own terms) and have
been offering this information to us for decades, if not centuries. It
is our own lack of interest or motivation that has prevented us from
receiving it.

We can also demand that we be given this information in schools and
universities and that we not be required to take special, elective
courses to be exposed to it. We can get involved with multiracial
organizations and white organizations working for racial justice. And we
can build authentic cross-racial relationships and be willing to watch,
listen, and learn. Sometimes, within the context of these relationships,
we can ask direct questions and ask for explicit information, but this
is not always necessary. Simply by virtue of living an integrated life
and paying attention, we will learn what we need to know.

Still, white people do have knowledge of aspects of race and racism, and
we can easily unearth this knowledge with some minimal reflection. For
example, we can reflect on messages we have received, privileges we
enjoy, how we came to be socialized to feel superior (while denying that
we feel this way), and how all of this may be manifesting in our lives.

When I began this work, I dreaded getting feedback from people of color
on my racist patterns and assumptions. Now I welcome this feedback.
Perhaps the most powerful lesson I have learned in terms of interrupting
my own white fragility is that this feedback is a positive sign in the
relationship. Of course, the feedback seldom feels good—I occasionally
feel embarrassed or defensive. But I also understand that there is no
way for me to avoid enacting problematic patterns, so if a person of
color trusts me enough to take the risk and tell me, then I am doing
well.

Many people of color have shared with me that they don’t bother giving
feedback to a white person if they think the individual is unwilling to
accept it; they either endure the microaggressions or drift away from
the relationship. They do not feel close to white people to whom they
can’t speak honestly about racism, and these relationships always have a
degree of distance and inauthenticity. While we worry that if we have
revealed our racism in any way, the people of color in our lives will
give up on us, I have found the opposite to be true. When we engage with
the feedback and seek to repair the breach, the relationship deepens.
Trying to explain away our racism does not fool people of color or bring
them closer.

Because I will never be completely free of racism or finished with my
learning, what are some things I can do or remember when my white
fragility surfaces? There are several constructive responses we can have
in the moment:

• Breathe.

• Listen.

• Reflect.

• Return to the list of underlying assumptions in this chapter.

• Seek out someone with a stronger analysis if you feel confused.

• Take the time you need to process your feelings, but do return to the
situation and the persons involved.

We can interrupt our white fragility and build our capacity to sustain
cross-racial honesty by being willing to tolerate the discomfort
associated with an honest appraisal and discussion of our internalized
superiority and racial privilege. We can challenge our own racial
reality by acknowledging ourselves as racial beings with a particular
and limited perspective on race. We can attempt to understand the racial
realities of people of color through authentic interaction rather than
through the media or through unequal relationships. We can take action
to address our own racism, the racism of other whites, and the racism
embedded in our institutions. All these efforts will require that we
continually challenge our own socialization and investments in racism
and the misinformation we have learned about people of color. We can
educate ourselves about the history of race relations in our country. We
can follow the leadership on antiracism from people of color and work to
build authentic cross-racial relationships. We can get involved in
organizations working for racial justice. And most important, we must
break the silence about race and racism with other white people.



THE QUESTION OF GUILT


Audre Lorde eloquently addressed her thoughts on white guilt at the
National Women’s Studies Association Conference in 1981:

I cannot hide my anger to spare you guilt, nor hurt feelings, nor
answering anger; for to do so insults and trivializes all our efforts.
Guilt is not a response to anger; it is a response to one’s own actions
or lack of action. If it leads to change then it can be useful, since it
is then no longer guilt but the beginning of knowledge. Yet all too
often, guilt is just another name for impotence, for defensiveness
destructive of communication; it becomes a device to protect ignorance
and the continuation of things the way they are, the ultimate protection
for changelessness.¹

I am sometimes asked whether my work reinforces and takes advantage of
white guilt. But I don’t see my efforts to uncover how race shapes my
life as a matter of guilt. I know that because I was socialized as white
in a racism-based society, I have a racist worldview, deep racial bias,
racist patterns, and investments in the racist system that has elevated
me. Still, I don’t feel guilty about racism. I didn’t chose this
socialization, and it could not be avoided. But I am responsible for my
role in it. To the degree that I have done my best in each moment to
interrupt my participation, I can rest with a clearer conscience. But
that clear conscience is not achieved by complacency or a sense that I
have arrived.

Unlike heavy feelings such as guilt, the continuous work of identifying
my internalized superiority and how it may be manifesting itself is
incredibly liberating. When I start from the premise that _of course_ I
have been thoroughly socialized into the racist culture in which I was
born, I no longer need to expend energy denying that fact. I am
eager—even excited—to identify my inevitable collusion so that I can
figure out how to stop colluding! Denial and the defensiveness that is
needed to maintain it is exhausting.



A POSITIVE WHITE IDENTITY?


There are many approaches to antiracist work; one of them is to try to
develop a positive white identity. Those who promote this approach often
suggest we develop this positive identity by reclaiming the cultural
heritage that was lost during assimilation into whiteness for European
ethnics. However, a positive white identity is an impossible goal. White
identity is inherently racist; white people do not exist outside the
system of white supremacy. This does not mean that we should stop
identifying as white and start claiming only to be Italian or Irish. To
do so is to deny the reality of racism in the here and now, and this
denial would simply be color-blind racism. Rather, I strive to be “less
white.” To be less white is to be less racially oppressive. This
requires me to be more racially aware, to be better educated about
racism, and to continually challenge racial certitude and arrogance. To
be less white is to be open to, interested in, and compassionate toward
the racial realities of people of color. I can build a wide range of
authentic and sustained relationships across race and accept that I have
racist patterns. And rather than be defensive about those patterns, I
can be interested in seeing them more clearly so that I might ameliorate
them. To be less white is to break with white silence and white
solidarity, to stop privileging the comfort of white people over the
pain of racism for people of color, to move past guilt and into action.
These less oppressive patterns are active, not passive. Ultimately, I
strive for a less white identity for my own liberation and sense of
justice, not to save people of color.



IN CONCLUSION


When I give a talk or workshop, the number one question I get from white
participants is, “How do I tell so-and-so about their racism without
triggering white fragility?” My first response to this question is, “How
would I tell you about _your_ racism without triggering _your_ white
fragility?” With this response, I am trying to point out the unspoken
assumption that the person asking the question is not part of the
problem. In other words, the question distances the participant from
racism; it assumes that the questioner doesn’t need feedback or doesn’t
struggle with his or her own white fragility. The person’s question is
not one of humility or self-reflection.

Having said that, I can offer a few strategies for trying to work with
one another on our white fragility. First, I try to affirm a person’s
perspective before I share mine, and when I do share mine, I try to
point the finger inward, not outward. For example, I might say, “I can
understand why you feel that way. I have felt that way myself. However,
because of my opportunity to work with people of color and hear their
perspectives, I have come to understand . . . ” I then share what I have
come to understand with the emphasis on how this understanding relates
to me. While this strategy is not guaranteed to lower defensiveness,
it’s difficult to argue with someone who has framed a response as her or
his own personal insight.

I also give myself some time if I feel at a loss to respond in the
moment. When we have an ongoing relationship with someone, it’s fine to
take some time and return to the issue later. With this strategy, we can
then choose a time when we feel more prepared and sense that the other
person is open. In this case, I might say, “Can I talk to you about
something? I have been feeling uncomfortable about our interaction the
other day but it has taken me a while to get clarity on why. I have a
better sense now. Can we return to our conversation?” I then do my best
to share my thoughts and feelings as calmly and concisely as possible.
Ultimately, I let go of changing the other person. If someone gains
insight from what I share, that is wonderful. But the objective that
guides me is my own need to break with white solidarity, even when it’s
uncomfortable, which it almost always is. In the end, my actions are
driven by my own need for integrity, not a need to correct or change
someone else.



PEOPLE OF COLOR NAVIGATING WHITE FRAGILITY


People of color have occasionally asked me how to navigate white
fragility. I so wish I had a simple formula to offer them! I want us to
stop manifesting white fragility so that people of color don’t have to
ask this question. Still, besides the strategies discussed thus far,
there is another approach that people of color may find useful. Whenever
you—as a person of color—do not want to bear the burden of pointing out
a white person’s racism but do not want to let it go, you might ask a
white person whom you trust to deal with it. While addressing white
racism is rarely easy, white people can certainly bear the brunt of a
hostile response less painfully than people of color can. There may even
be a little less fragility because the intervention is coming from
another white person. This strategy also helps a supportive white person
demonstrate support and practice breaking with white solidarity.

Some people of color have told me that it is useful to know how they
have colluded with my white fragility. In answering this question, I
must first be clear that navigating white fragility is fundamentally a
matter of survival for people of color. The consequences of white
fragility include hours of agonizing as well as far more extreme
consequences such as being seen as a threat and a troublemaker. These
biased assessments often lead to job loss, stress-related illness,
criminal charges, and institutionalization. To choose to survive in any
way deemed necessary is thus an empowered choice. It is white people’s
responsibility to be less fragile; people of color don’t need to twist
themselves into knots trying to navigate us as painlessly as possible.
Still, in helping people of color decide whether or how to interrupt
white fragility, I can share some ways that I have noticed people of
color enabling mine.

Because I am seen as somewhat more racially aware than other whites,
people of color will often give me a pass. While this is certainly more
comfortable for me, it doesn’t hold me accountable or support my racial
growth. I ask my friends of color to trust that I can handle their
feedback, and then it’s on me to demonstrate myself as worthy of that
trust. Although I recognize the risk it takes, I would not have my
current awareness if people of color had chosen to protect my feelings.
Since my learning will never be finished, neither will the need to hold
me accountable.

When a person of color gives me feedback that I consider unfair, I am
tempted to go to another person of color for reassurance that I am a
good person. This search for reassurance pressures people of color to
align with me over one another by agreeing that I have been unfairly
attacked. Empathy with people in distress creates a strong urge to
comfort them, and in my search for this comfort, I am, consciously or
not, taking advantage of this urge. But the search for reassurance from
people of color is inappropriate. My need functions as a kind of
divide-and-conquer wedge. Further, my quest for reassurance upholds
racism by reinforcing the very idea that the feedback was an unfair
attack and/or that there was a correct way to give it and the person of
color in question has broken the rules of engagement. In essence, by
complaining to one person of color about the unfairness of feedback from
another person of color (no matter how diplomatically or indirectly I
try to mask my complaint), I am pressuring a person of color to collude
with my racism.

Equity consultant Devon Alexander shared with me what is perhaps the
most pernicious form of pressure on people of color: the pressure to
collude with white fragility by minimizing their racial experiences to
accommodate white denial and defensiveness. In other words, they don’t
share their pain with us because we can’t handle it. This accommodation
requires a profoundly unfair degree of inauthenticity and silent
endurance. In a vicious racial cycle, white fragility has functioned to
keep people of color from challenging racism in order to avoid white
wrath. In turn, not challenging white people on racism upholds the
racial order and whites’ position within that order.



IN CONCLUSION


The default of the current system is the reproduction of racial
inequality; our institutions were designed to reproduce racial
inequality and they do so with efficiency. Our schools are particularly
effective at this task. To continue reproducing racial inequality, the
system only needs white people to be really nice and carry on, smile at
people of color, be friendly across race, and go to lunch together on
occasion. I am not saying that you shouldn’t be nice. I suppose it’s
better than being mean. But niceness is not courageous. Niceness will
not get racism on the table and will not keep it on the table when
everyone wants it off. In fact, bringing racism to white people’s
attention is often seen as _not_ nice, and being perceived as not nice
triggers white fragility.

Interrupting racism takes courage and intentionality; the interruption
is by definition not passive or complacent. So in answer to the question
“Where do we go from here?,” I offer that we must never consider
ourselves finished with our learning. Even if challenging all the racism
and superiority we have internalized was quick and easy to do, our
racism would be reinforced all over again just by virtue of living in
the culture. I have been engaged in this work in a range of forms for
many years, and I continue to receive feedback on my stubborn patterns
and unexamined assumptions. It is a messy, lifelong process, but one
that is necessary to align my professed values with my real actions. It
is also deeply compelling and transformative.



RESOURCES FOR CONTINUING EDUCATION


This brief list cannot do justice to the scores of excellent resources
available to anyone willing to take the initiative to seek them out; it
is intended as an entry point.



BOOKS, ARTICLES, AND BLOGS


Alexander, Michelle. _The New Jim Crow: Mass Incarceration in the Age of
Colorblindness._ New York: New Press, 2010.

Anderson, Carol. _White Rage: The Unspoken Truth of Our Racial Divide._
New York: Bloomsbury, 2016.

Biewen, John. _Seeing White._ Podcast bibliography. Center for
Documentary Studies, Duke University, 2015.
http://podcast.cdsporch.org/seeing-white/seeing-white-bibliography.

Bonilla-Silva, Eduardo. _Racism Without Racists: Color-Blind Racism and
the Persistence of Racial Inequality in America._ 4th ed. Lanham, MD:
Rowman & Littlefield, 2013. First published 2003.

Brown, Dee. _Bury My Heart at Wounded Knee._ New York: Open Road Media,
2012.

Coates, Ta-Nehisi. _Between the World and Me._ New York: Spiegel & Grau,
2015.

——. “The Case for Reparations.” _Atlantic,_ June 2014.

Dyson, Michael Eric. _Tears We Cannot Stop: A Sermon to a White
America_. New York: St. Martin’s Press, 2017.

Feagin, Joe R. _The White Racial Frame: Centuries of Racial Framing and
Counter-Framing._ New York: Routledge, 2013.

Gaskins, Pearl Fuyo, ed. _What Are You? Voices of Mixed-Race Young
People._ New York: Henry Holt & Co., 1999.

Irving, Debby. _Waking Up White: And Finding Myself in the Story of
Race_. Boston: Elephant Room Press, 2014.

Kamenetz, Anya. “Resources for Educators to Use in the Wake of
Charlottesville.” _NPR,_ August 14, 2017.
https://www.npr.org/sections/ed/2017/08/14/543390148/resources-for-educators-to-use-the-wake-of-charlottesville.

Kendi, Ibram X. _Stamped from the Beginning._ New York: Nation Books,
2016.

Lee, Stacey. _Unraveling the “Model-Minority” Stereotype: Listening to
Asian American Youth._ New York: Teachers College Press, 1996.

——. _Up Against Whiteness: Race, School, and Immigrant Youth._ New York:
Teachers College Press, 2005).

Loewen, James W. _Lies My Teacher Told Me: Everything Your American
History Textbook Got Wrong,_ rev. ed. New York: New Press, 20018.

Menakem, Resmaa. _My Grandmother’s Hands: Racialized Trauma and the
Pathway to Mending Our Hearts and Bodies._ Las Vegas: Central Recovery
Press, 2017.

Mills, Charles W. _The Racial Contract_. Ithaca, NY: Cornell University
Press, 1997.

Moore, Eddie, Ali Michael, and Marguerite W. Penick-Parks. _The Guide
for White Women Who Teach Black Boys._ Thousand Oaks, CA: Corwin, 2017.

Moraga, Cherríe, and Gloria Andzaldúa, eds. _This Bridge Called My Back:
Writings by Radical Women of Color._ New York: State University of New
York Press, 2015.

Morrison, Toni. _Playing in the Dark: Whiteness and the Literary
Imagination._ New York: Random House, 1992.

Oluo, Ijeoma. _So You Want to Talk About Race._ Berkeley, CA: Seal
Press, 2018.

Raising Race Conscious Children. Home page.
http://www.raceconscious.org.

Sensoy, Özlem, and Robin DiAngelo. _Is Everyone Really Equal? An
Introduction to Key Concepts in Critical Social Justice Education,_ 2nd
ed. New York: Teachers College Press, 2017.

Shaheen, Jack G. “Reel Bad Arabs: How Hollywood Vilifies a People.”
_Annals of the American Academy of Political and Social Science_ 588,
no. 1 (2003).

Singleton, Glenn. _Courageous Conversations About Race: A Field Guide
for Achieving Equity in Schools._ 2nd ed. Thousand Oaks, CA: Corwin,
2014.

Tatum, Beverly. _Why Are All the Black Kids Sitting Together in the
Cafeteria: And Other Conversations About Race,_ Twentieth anniv. rev.
ed. New York: Basic Books, 2017.

Van Ausdale, Debra, and Joe R. Feagin. _The First R: How Children Learn
Race and Racism._ Lanham, MD: Rowman & Littlefield, 2001.

Wise, Tim. _White Like Me: Reflections on Race from a Privileged Son._
Berkeley, CA: Soft Skull Press/Counterpoint, 2010.



FILMS


_Chisholm ′72: Unbought and Unbossed._ Shola Lynch, dir. and prod.
REAL-side, 2004. http://www.pbs.org/pov/chisholm.

_A Class Divided._ William Peters, dir. and prod. Yale University Films
for _Frontline,_ PBS. WGBH Education Foundation, 1985.
https://www.pbs.org/wgbh/frontline/film/class-divided.

_The Color of Fear._ Stirfry Seminars, 1994.
http://www.stirfryseminars.com/store/products/cof_bundle.php.

_Cracking the Codes: The System of Racial Inequity._ World Trust, 2013.
https://world-trust.org.

_Eyes on the Prize: America’s Civil Rights Years 1954–1965._ Season 1.
DVD. Produced by Blackside for PBS, 2009.
https://shop.pbs.org/eyes-on-the-prize-america-s-civil-rights-years-1954-1965-season-1-dvd/product/EYES600.

_In Whose Honor?_ Jay Rosenstein, dir. On _POV_ (PBS), premiered July
15, 1997. http://www.pbs.org/pov/inwhosehonor.

_Mirrors of Privilege: Making Whiteness Visible._ World Trust, 2007.
https://world-trust.org.

_Race: The Power of an Illusion._ Larry Adelman, exec. prod. San
Francisco: California Newsreel, 2003.
http://www.pbs.org/race/000_General/000_00-Home.htm.

_Reel Bad Arabs._ Jeremy Earp, dir. Media Education Foundation, 2006.
http://freedocumentaries.org/documentary/reel-bad-arabs.

_The Revisionaries._ Scott Thurman, dir. Making History Productions,
2012. http://www.pbs.org/independentlens/films/revisionaries.

_13th._ Ava DuVernay, dir. Netflix, 2016.
https://www.netflix.com/title/80091741.



ACKNOWLEDGMENTS


I thank Idabelle Fosse, Reagen Price, Marxa Marnia, Christine Sax-man,
Shelly Tochluk, Aisha Hauser, Tee Williams, Dana Buhl, Kent Alexander,
Sincere Kirabo, Malena Pinkham, Myosha McAfee, Resmaa Menakem, Devon
Alexander, Darlene Flynn, Erin Trent-Johnson, Glen Singleton, Reverend
John Crestwell, Özlem Sensoy, Deborah Terry, and Jason Toews for their
invaluable contributions to various aspects of this work.

Thank you to the many people of color whose brilliance and patience has
mentored me over the last twenty-five years. You understand white
fragility and its roots in white identity far more than I ever will.

To my editor at Beacon Press, Rachael Marks, you were a dream to work
with! My sincerest thanks for your perceptive feedback and
encouragement.



NOTES


CHAPTER 1: THE CHALLENGES OF TALKING TO WHITE PEOPLE ABOUT RACISM

1.   Angela Onwuachi-Willig, _According to Our Hearts: Rhinelander v.
Rhinelander and the Law of the Multiracial Family_ (New Haven, CT: Yale
University Press, 2013).

2.   Larry Adelman, _Race: The Power of an Illusion,_ video (San
Francisco: California Newsreel, 2003); Heather Beth Johnson and Thomas
M. Shapiro, “Good Neighborhoods, Good Schools: Race and the ‘Good
Choices’ of White Families,” in _White Out: The Continuing Significance
of Racism,_ ed. Ashley W. Doane and Eduardo Bonilla-Silva (New York:
Routledge, 2003), 173–87.

CHAPTER 2: RACISM AND WHITE SUPREMACY

1.   Luigi Luca Cavalli-Sforza, Paolo Menozzi, and Alberto Piazza, _The
History and Geography of Human Genes_ (Princeton, NJ: Princeton
University Press, 1994).

2.   Richard S. Cooper, Jay S. Kaufman, and Ryk Ward, “Race and
Genomics,” _New England Journal of Medicine_ 348, no. 12 (2003):
1166–70.

3.   Resmaa Menakem, _My Grandmother’s Hands: Racialized Trauma and the
Pathway to Mending Our Hearts and Bodies_ (Las Vegas: Central Recovery
Press, 2017).

4.   Thomas Jefferson, _Notes on the State of Virginia; with Related
Documents,_ ed. David Waldstreicher (Boston: Bedford/St. Martin’s,
2002).

5.   Nancy Leys Stepan and Sander L. Gilman, “Appropriating the Idioms
of Science: The Rejection of Scientific Racism,” in _The “Racial”
Economy of Science: Toward a Democratic Future,_ ed. Sandra Harding
(Bloomington: Indiana University Press, 1993).

6.   Ta-Nehisi Coates, _Between the World and Me_ (New York: Spiegel &
Grau, 2015).

7.   Ibram X. Kendi, _Stamped from the Beginning_ (New York: Nation
Books, 2016).

8.   Thomas F. Gossett, _Race: The History of an Idea_ (New York: Oxford
University Press, 1997); Noel Ignatiev, _How the Irish Became White_
(New York: Routledge, 1995); Matthew Frye Jacobson, _Whiteness of a_
_Different Color: European Immigrants and the Alchemy of Race_
(Cambridge, MA: Harvard University Press, 1999).

9.   John Tehranian, “Performing Whiteness: Naturalization Litigation
and the Construction of Racial Identity in America,” _Yale Law Journal_
109, no. 4 (2000): 817–48.

10. Ignatiev, _How the Irish Became White;_ Jacobson, _Whiteness of a
Different Color;_ David Roediger, _The Wages of Whiteness: Race and the
Making of the American Working Class,_ rev. ed. (1999; New York: Verso,
2003).

11. Roediger, _Wages of Whiteness_.

12. For an astute analysis of this “bargain” between working-class
whites and owning-class whites, see Lillian Smith, _Killers of the
Dream_ (New York: W. W. Norton, 1949).

13. J. Kēhaulani Kauanui, “‘A Structure, Not an Event’: Settler
Colonialism and Enduring Indigeneity,” _Lateral: Journal of the Cultural
Studies Association_ 5, no. 1 (2016), https://doi.org/10.25158/L5.1.7.

14. Stuart Hall, _Representation: Cultural Representation and Signifying
Practices_ (London: Sage, 1997).

15. For a more detailed accounting of this documentation, see Robin
DiAngelo, _What Does It Mean to Be White? Developing White Racial
Literacy_ (New York: Peter Lang, 2016).

16. Marilyn Frye, _The Politics of Reality: Essays in Feminist Theory_
(Trumansburg, NY: Crossing Press, 1983).

17. David T. Wellman, _Portraits of White Racism_ (Cambridge, UK:
Cambridge University Press, 1977).

18. Peggy McIntosh, “White Privilege and Male Privilege: A Personal
Account of Coming to See Correspondence Through Work in Women’s
Studies,” in _Race, Class, and Gender: An Anthology_, ed. M. Anderson
and P. Hill, 9th ed. (Belmont, CA: Wadsworth, 2012), 94–105.

19. Cheryl I. Harris, “Whiteness as Property,” _Harvard Law Review_ 106,
no. 8 (1993): 1744.

20. George Lipsitz, _The Possessive Investment in Whiteness: How White
People Profit from Identity Politics_ (Philadelphia: Temple University
Press, 2006), 1.

21. Ruth Frankenberg, “Local Whiteness, Localizing Whiteness,” in
_Displacing Whiteness: Essays in Social and Cultural Criticism_, ed.
Ruth Frankenberg (Durham, NC: Duke University Press, 1997), 1.

22. Charles W. Mills, _The Racial Contract_ (Ithaca, NY: Cornell
University Press, 1997), 122.

23. Ibid., 1.

24. Ta-Nehisi Coates, “The Case for Reparations,” _Atlantic,_ June 2014,
https://www.theatlantic.com/magazine/archive/2014/06/the-case-for-reparations/361631.

25. Mills, _The Racial Contract,_ 40.

26. Haeyoun Park, Josh Keller, and Josh Williams, “The Faces of American
Power, Nearly as White as the Oscar Nominees,” _New York Times,_
February 26, 2016,
https://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2016/02/26/us/race-of-american-power.html;
“All Time Box Office: Worldwide Grosses,” Box Office Mojo, 2017,
http://www.boxofficemojo.com/alltime/world/; US Department of Education,
Office of Planning, Evaluation and Policy Development, Policy and
Program Studies Service, _The State of Racial Diversity in the Educator
Workforce. Diversity_ (Washington, DC: July 2016),
https://www2.ed.gov/rschstat/eval/highered/racial-diversity/state-racial-diversity-workforce.pdf;
“Number of Full-Time Faculty Members by Sex, Rank, and Racial and Ethnic
Group, Fall 2007,” _Chronicle of Higher Education,_ August 24, 2009,
https://www.chronicle.com/article/Numberof-Full-Time-Faculty/47992/.

27. Harrison Jacobs, “Former Neo-Nazi: Here’s Why There’s No Real
Difference Between ‘Alt-Right,’ ‘White Nationalism,’ and ‘White
Supremacy,’” _Business Insider,_ August 23, 2017,
http://www.businessinsider.com/why-no-difference-alt-right-white-nationalism-white-supremacy-neo-nazi-charlottesville-2017-8.

28. Derek Black, “‘The Daily’ Transcript: Interview with Former White
Nationalist Derek Black,” interview by Michael Barbaro, _New York
Times,_ August 22, 2017,
https://www.nytimes.com/2017/08/22/podcasts/the-daily-transcript-derek-black.html.

29. Lee Atwater, interview with Alexander P. Lamis, July 8, 1981, quoted
in Alexander P. Lamis, _The Two-Party South_ (New York: Oxford
University Press, 1984). The interviewee was originally described as an
anonymous insider; Atwater was not revealed as the person interviewed
until the 1990 edition of the book. This interview was also quoted in
Bob Herbert, “Impossible, Ridiculous, Repugnant,” _New York Times,_
October 6, 2005. Interpolations in original.

30. Joe R. Feagin, _The White Racial Frame: Centuries of Racial Framing
and Counter-Framing_ (New York: Routledge, 2013).

31. Beverly Daniel Tatum, “Breaking the Silence,” in _White Privilege:
Essential Readings on the Other Side of Racism_, ed. Paula S.
Rothenberg, 3rd ed. (2001; New York: Worth Publishers, 2008), 147–52.

CHAPTER 3: RACISM AFTER THE CIVIL RIGHTS MOVEMENT

1.   Martin Barker, _The New Racism: Conservatives and the Ideology of
the Tribe_ (London: Junction Books, 1981).

2.   Eduardo Bonilla-Silva, _Racism Without Racists: Color-Blind Racism
and the Persistence of Racial Inequality in America,_ 4th ed. (2003;
Lanham, MD: Rowman & Littlefield, 2013).

3.   Ibid.

4.   John F. Dovidio, Peter Glick, and Laurie A. Rudman, eds., _On the
Nature of Prejudice: Fifty Years After Allport_ (Malden, MA: Blackwell
Publishing, 2005); Anthony G. Greenwald and Linda Hamilton Krieger,
“Implicit Bias: Scientific Foundations,” _California Law Review_ 94, no.
4 (2006): 945–67.

5.   Marianne Bertrand and Sendhil Mullainathan, “Are Emily and Greg
More Employable Than Lakisha and Jamal? A Field Experiment on Labor
Market Discrimination,” _American Economic Review_ 94, no. 4 (September
2004): 991–1013.

6.   Gordon Hodson, John Dovidio, and Samuel L. Gaertner, “The Aversive
Form of Racism,” _Psychology of Prejudice and Discrimination (Race and
Ethnicity in Psychology)_ 1 (2004): 119–36.

7.   Lincoln Quillian and Devah Pager, “Black Neighbors, Higher Crime?
The Role of Racial Stereotypes in Evaluations of Neighborhood Crime,”
_American Journal of Sociology_ 107, no. 3 (November 2001): 717–67.

8.   Toni Morrison, “On the Backs of Blacks,” _Time,_ December 2, 1993,
http://content.time.com/time/magazine/article/0,9171,979736,00.html.

9.   Robin DiAngelo, “The Sketch Factor: ‘Bad Neighborhood’ Narratives
as Discursive Violence,” in _The Assault on Communities of Color:
Exploring the Realities of Race-Based Violence,_ ed. Kenneth
Fasching-Varner and Nicholas Daniel Hartlep (New York: Rowman &
Littlefield, 2016).

10. Joe R. Feagin, _Systemic Racism: A Theory of Oppression_ (New York:
Taylor & Francis, 2006); Kristen Myers, “Reproducing White Supremacy
Through Casual Discourse,” in Doane and Bonilla-Silva, _White Out,_
129–44; Johnson and Shapiro, “Good Neighborhoods, Good Schools,” 173–88;
Robin DiAngelo and Özlem Sensoy, “Getting Slammed: White Depictions of
Race Discussions as Arenas of Violence,” _Race Ethnicity and Education_
17, no. 1 (2014): 103–28.

11. Kenneth B. Clark and Mamie P. Clark, “Emotional Factors in Racial
Identification and Preference in Negro Children,” _Journal of Negro
Education_ 19, no. 3 (1950): 341–50; Louise Derman-Sparks, Patricia G.
Ramsey, and Julie Olsen Edwards, _What If All the Kids Are White?
Anti-Bias Multicultural Education with Young Children and Families_ (New
York: Teachers College Press, 2006).

12. Jamelle Bouie, “Why Do Millennials Not Understand Racism?,” Slate,
May 16, 2014,
http://www.slate.com/articles/news_and_politics/politics/2014/05/millennials_racism_and_mtv_poll_young_people_are_confused_about_bias_prejudice.html.

13. Leslie H. Picca and Joe R. Feagin, _Two-Faced Racism: Whites in the
Backstage and Frontstage_ (New York: Taylor and Francis, 2007).

14. Ibid.

CHAPTER 4: HOW DOES RACE SHAPE THE LIVES OF WHITE PEOPLE?

1.   Carole Schroeder and Robin DiAngelo, “Addressing Whiteness in
Nursing Education: The Sociopolitical Climate Project at the University
of Washington School of Nursing,” _Advances in Nursing Science_ 33, no.
3 (2010): 244–55.

2.   Melissah Yang, “Kinds of Shade,” CNN.com, September 13, 2017,
http://www.cnn.com/2017/09/13/entertainment/rihanna-fenty-beauty-foundation/index.html.

3.   McIntosh, “White Privilege and Male Privilege.”

4.   Patrick Rosal, “To the Lady Who Mistook Me for the Help at the
National Book Awards,” _Literary Hub,_ November 1, 2017,
http://lithub.com/to-the-lady-who-mistook-me-for-the-help-at-the-national-book-awards.

5.   McIntosh, “White Privilege and Male Privilege.”

6.   Ibid.

7.   The compound closed in 2001 after having been bankrupted by
litigation from the Southern Poverty Law Center.

8.   McIntosh, “White Privilege and Male Privilege.”

9.   Sheila M. Eldred, “Is This the Perfect Face?,” _Discovery News,_
April 26, 2012.

10. Christine E. Sleeter, _Multicultural Education as Social Activism_
(Albany, NY: SUNY Press, 1996), 149.

11. Unless otherwise noted, the information in this list comes from
OXFAM, “An Economy for the 99%,” briefing paper, January 2017,
https://www.oxfam.org/en/research/economy-99.

12. Bloomberg Billionaire’s Index, 2017,
https://www.bloomberg.com/billionaires.

13. World Bank, _Annual GDP Rankings,_ report, 2017,
http://data.worldbank.org/data-catalog/GDP-ranking-table.

14. Bloomberg Billionaire’s Index.

15. Matthew F. Delmont, _Why Busing Failed: Race, Media, and the
National Resistance to School Desegregation_ (Oakland: University of
California Press, 2016).

16. Johnson and Shapiro, “Good Neighborhoods, Good Schools.”

17. George S. Bridges and Sara Steen, “Racial Disparities in Official
Assessments of Juvenile Offenders: Attributional Stereotypes as
Mediating Mechanisms,” _American Sociological Review_ 63, no. 4 (1998):
554–70.

18. Kelly M. Hoffman, “Racial Bias in Pain Assessment and Treatment
Recommendations, and False Beliefs About Biological Differences Between
Blacks and Whites,” _Proceedings of the National Academy of Science_
113, no. 16 (2016): 4296–4301.

19. Zeus Leonardo, “The Color of Supremacy: Beyond the Discourse of
‘White Privilege,’” _Educational Philosophy and Theory_ 36, no. 2
(2004): 137–52, published online January 9, 2013.

20. James Baldwin, response to Paul Weiss, _Dick Cavett Show,_ 1965,
video available at https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=_fZQQ7o16yQ.

21. Casey J. Dawkins, “Recent Evidence on the Continuing Causes of
Black-White Residential Segregation,” _Journal of Urban Affairs_ 26, no.
3 (2004): 379–400; Johnson and Shapiro, “Good Neighborhoods, Good
Schools.”

22. Amy Stuart Wells, quoted in Nikole Hannah-Jones, “Choosing a School
for My Daughter in a Segregated City,” _New York Times Magazine_, June
9, 2016,
https://www.nytimes.com/2016/06/12/magazine/choosing-a-school-for-my-daughter-in-a-segregated-city.html.

CHAPTER 5: THE GOOD/BAD BINARY

1.   Barbara Trepagnier, _Silent Racism: How Well-Meaning White People
Perpetuate the Racial Divide,_ exp. ed. (orig. 2006; New York: Paradigm,
2010).

2.   Omowale Akintunde, “White Racism, White Supremacy, White Privilege,
and the Social Construction of Race: Moving from Modernist to
Postmodernist Multiculturalism,” _Multicultural Education_ 7, no. 2
(1999): 1.

3.   Derman-Sparks, Ramsey, and Edwards, _What If All the Kids Are
White?;_ Debra Van Ausdale and Joe R. Feagin, _The First R: How Children
Learn Race and Racism_ (Lanham, MD: Rowman & Littlefield, 2001).

4.   Maria Benedicta Monteiro, Dalila Xavier de França, and Ricardo
Rodrigues, “The Development of Intergroup Bias in Childhood: How Social
Norms Can Shape Children’s Racial Behaviors,” _International Journal of
Psychology_ 44, no. 1 (2009): 29–39.

5.   Van Ausdale and Feagin, _The First R._

CHAPTER 6: ANTI-BLACKNESS

1.   Frantz Fanon, _Black Skin, White Masks_ (New York: Grove Press,
1952); Toni Morrison, _Playing in the Dark: Whiteness and the Literary
Imagination_ (New York: Random House, 1992).

2.   Michelle Alexander, _The New Jim Crow: Mass Incarceration in the
Age of Colorblindness_ (New York: New Press, 2010); Bertrand and
Mullainathan, “Are Emily and Greg More Employable than Lakisha and
Jamal?”; Philip Oreopoulos and Diane Dechief, “Why Do Some Employers
Prefer to Interview Matthew, but Not Samir? New Evidence from Toronto,
Montreal, and Vancouver,” working paper no. 95, Canadian Labour Market
and Skills Researcher Network, February 2012,
https://papers.ssrn.com/sol3/papers.cfm?abstract_id=2018047.

3.   Susan E. Reed, _The Diversity Index: The Alarming Truth About
Diversity in Corporate America . . . and What Can Be Done About It_ (New
York: AMACOM, 2011).

4.   Alexander, _New Jim Crow;_ Chauncee D. Smith, “Deconstructing the
Pipeline: Evaluating School-to-Prison Pipeline Equal Protection Cases
Through a Structural Racism Framework,” _Fordham Urban Law Journal_ 36
(2009): 1009; Pamela Fenning and Jennifer Rose, “Overrepresentation of
African American Students in Exclusionary Discipline: The Role of School
Policy,” _Urban Education_ 42, no. 6 (2007): 536–59; Sean Nicholson
Crotty, Zachary Birchmeier, and David Valentine, “Exploring the Impact
of School Discipline on Racial Disproportion in the Juvenile Justice
System,” _Social Science Quarterly_ 90, no. 4 (2009): 1003–18; R.
Patrick Solomon and Howard Palmer, “Black Boys Through the School-Prison
Pipeline: When Racial Profiling and Zero Tolerance Collide,” in
_Inclusion in Urban Educational Environments: Addressing Issues of
Diversity, Equity, and Social Justice,_ ed. Denise E. Armstrong and
Brenda J. McMahon (Charlotte, NC: Information Age Publishing, 2006),
191–212.

5.   For the 7 percent cutoff and white flight, see Bonilla-Silva,
_Racism Without Racists._ For declining housing demand, see Lincoln
Quillian, “Why Is Black-White Residential Segregation So Persistent?
Evidence on Three Theories from Migration Data,” _Social Science
Research_ 31, no. 2 (2002): 197–229.

6.   Coates, “The Case for Reparations.”

7.   Menakem, _My Grandmother’s Hands,_ 7.

8.   Ta-Nehisi Coates, “The First White President: The Foundation of
Donald Trump’s Presidency Is the Negation of Barack Obama’s Legacy,”
_Atlantic,_ October 2017,
https://www.theatlantic.com/magazine/archive/2017/10/the-first-white-president-ta-nehisi-coates/537909.

9.   Sherene Razack, _Looking White People in the Eye: Gender, Race, and
Culture in Courtrooms and Classrooms_ (Toronto: University of Toronto
Press, 1998).

10. Carol Anderson, _White Rage: The Unspoken Truth of Our Racial
Divide_ (New York: Bloomsbury, 2016).

11. The ideologies in this list are modified from a list in Özlem Sensoy
and Robin DiAngelo, _Is Everyone Really Equal? An Introduction to Key
Concepts in Critical Social Justice Education,_ 2nd ed. (New York:
Teachers College Press, 2017), 209.

CHAPTER 7: RACIAL TRIGGERS FOR WHITE PEOPLE

1.   Michelle Fine, “Witnessing Whiteness,” in _Off White: Readings on
Race, Power, and Society_, ed. Michelle Fine, Lois Weis, Linda Powell
Pruitt, and April Burns (New York: Routledge, 1997), 57.

2.   Pierre Bourdieu, _The Field of Cultural Production: Essays on Art
and Literature,_ ed. Randal Johnson (New York: Columbia University
Press, 1993).

3.   Bourdieu termed these rules of each field’s game “doxa.”

4.   Pierre Bourdieu, _Distinction: A Social Critique of the Judgement
of Taste_ (Cambridge, MA: Harvard University Press, 1984), 170.

5.   Ibid.

CHAPTER 8: THE RESULT: WHITE FRAGILITY

1.   Don Gonyea, “Majority of White Americans Say They Believe Whites
Face Discrimination,” NPR, October 24, 2017,
https://www.npr.org/2017/10/24/559604836/majority-of-white-americans-think-theyre-discriminated-against.

2.   Kenneth B. Clark, _Prejudice and Your Child_ (Boston: Beacon Press,
1963); Derman-Sparks, Ramsey, and Edwards, _What If All the Kids Are
White?_

3.   Debian Marty, “White Antiracist Rhetoric as Apologia: Wendell
Berry’s _The Hidden Wound_,” in _Whiteness: The Communication of Social
Identity,_ ed. Thomas Nakayama and Judith Martin (Thousand Oaks, CA:
Sage, 1999), 51.

4.   Ibid.; T. A. Van Dijk, “Discourse and the Denial of Racism,”
_Discourse and Society_ 3, no. 1 (1992): 87–118.

5.   DiAngelo and Sensoy, “Getting Slammed.”

6.   Morrison, _Playing in the Dark._

7.   Bonilla-Silva, _Racism Without Racists,_ 68.

8.   Rich Vodde, “De-Centering Privilege in Social Work Education: Whose
Job Is It Anyway?,” _Journal of Race, Gender and Class_ 7, no. 4 (2001):
139–60.

CHAPTER 11: WHITE WOMEN’S TEARS

1.   See, for example, Stacey Patton, “White Women, Please Don’t Expect
Me to Wipe Away Your Tears,” _Dame,_ December 15, 2014,
http://www.damemagazine.com/2014/12/15/white-women-please-dont-expect-me-wipe-away-your-tears.

2.   Ibid.

CHAPTER 12: WHERE DO WE GO FROM HERE?

1.   Lorde, “The Uses of Anger.”



ABOUT THE AUTHOR


ROBIN DIANGELO is an academic, educator, and author working in the
fields of critical discourse analysis and whiteness studies. She
formerly served as a tenured professor of multicultural education at
Westfield State University and a lecturer at the University of
Washington, where she twice received the Student’s Choice Award for
Educator of the Year from the School of Social Work. DiAngelo has been a
consultant and trainer for more than twenty years on issues of racial
and social justice. She has numerous publications and books, including
_What Does It Mean to Be White? Developing White Racial Literacy._ Her
original article, “White Fragility,” which is the basis for this book,
has influenced the national dialogue on race and been cited in the _New
York Times_, _Colorlines_, _Salon,_ the _Atlantic_, and on NPR.

BEACON PRESS
Boston, Massachusetts
www.beacon.org

Beacon Press books
are published under the auspices of
the Unitarian Universalist Association of Congregations.

Text design and composition by Kim Arney

Parts of this book have been adapted from Robin DiAngelo in _The Good
Men Project_ (https://goodmenproject.com): “White Fragility and the
Question of Trust,” October 3, 2016; “White Women’s Tears and the Men
Who Love Them,” September 19, 2015; and “White Fragility and the Rules
of Engagement,” June 13, 2015; from Robin DiAngelo, _What Does It Mean
to Be White? Developing White Racial Literacy_ (New York: Peter Lang,
2016); and from Robin DiAngelo, “White Fragility,” _International
Journal of Critical Pedagogy_ 3, no. 2 (2011): 54–70.

_Library of Congress Cataloging-in-Publication Data_

Names: DiAngelo, Robin J., author.

Title: White fragility : why it’s so hard to talk to white people about
racism / Robin DiAngelo.

Description: Boston : Beacon Press, [2018] | Includes bibliographical
references.

Identifiers: LCCN 2018003562 (print) | LCCN 2018005578 (ebook) | ISBN
9780807047422 (ebook) | ISBN 9780807047415 (pbk. : alk. paper)

Subjects: LCSH: Racism. | Whites. | Race relations.

Classification: LCC HT1521 (ebook) | LCC HT1521 .D486 2018 (print) | DDC
305.8—dc23

LC record available at https://lccn.loc.gov/2018003562
